

Chapter 122




On The Way to The Sea







At this point, Claudine hardly cared if she would turn out to be just as terrible as the man she was willing to call husband. She knew from the beginning that her fate would be tied to this man, no matter how much it tried to change, one way or another, her fate would always be entwined with him.

Moreover, that’s why she refused to let him go. She’ll drag them both through the ground, and tie them together to hell if need be.

“So you see, you’re never getting her back.” Claudine sighed out, leaning back into her seat, “She won’t ever want to go back to a monster like you.”

Matthias chuckled softly, and amusedly at her, giving her a big grin.

“I don’t mind her not returning.” He told Claudine, a genuine smile on his lips with a mad glint in his eye, “She can’t return if she’s dead after all,” He elaborated, his eyes staring hopefully into space…

“If she’s dead she won’t be able to leave me and run away from me.”

A cold chill ran through Claudine’s spine as she narrowed her eyes over to Matthias. Her lips pursed in observation as she continued to eye him warily.

“So you’re saying you’re going to kill her?”

Matthias met her eyes with a manic grin.

“Absolutely.”

Claudine scoffed in disbelief, before looking back at him incredulously.

“Have you finally gone insane?” Matthias only shrugged in reply.

“Who knows? Maybe?” He hummed delightfully, “Probably.”

“So you threaten her life,” Claudine asked him dryly, “That she’ll have to do as you say, or else you will kill her?”

Matthias frowned at the word. He did not like how she saw it as threatening.


“I don’t see it like that.” He answered softly, before going back to the topic at hand. “Besides, breaking off the engagement on your part will not have any negative effects on your family. In fact, it would seem as though it had been my failing. Isn’t this the best solution to both our concerns?”

He then resumed smiling pleasantly at Claudine once more.

“After all, I would end up bearing all the blame and shame for why the engagement didn’t push through. Take it as a compensation for all the trouble it will bring you and your family.”

Claudine breathed out, biting her lower lip in deep thought, before she narrowed her gaze towards Matthias.

“And if I don’t want to? If I decide to keep the engagement even after you bear all the shame and embarrassment, what would you do then? Kill me?”

Matthias chuckled amusingly at her.

“Why would I need to?” He asked her incredulously in amusement. Matthias shook his head lightly and finally stood up to his full height. “I don’t need to kill you to make you suffer a fate worse than death.”

He politely straightened himself up, before smiling pleasantly towards Claudine once more.

“Though I’m quite certain I won’t have to result in those means,” He stared at her knowingly, “You’re intelligence is beyond your usual counterparts after all.”

“Don’t speak as though you know me.” Claudine snapped at him in a harsh whisper, her mind already running a trip down memory lane on the events of her younger days.

The harsh lessons, intensive grooming to be a Duchess. The incessant reminders that she’ll never compare to her father’s bastard sons who will inherit everything, while she will become another man’s responsibility, but still bear the responsibility to her birth family.

She’d cried endlessly before, trying her best to endure everything. The only reprieve she ever got was whenever she’d go to Riette, who had distanced himself forever from her. He had been the only place she could feel herself momentarily breathe in relief once more before going back to her real life.

And the internal embarrassment and knowing that despite everything she did to be the perfect lady, no one, not even her fiance, found her worthy enough. He’ll always covet a lowly orphan, with no manners and influence, compared to her.

Streaks of tears spilled out of her eyes, before she gracefully dabbed them away with her handkerchief.

“You don’t know anything about what I could do.” Claudine told him blankly, eyes staring into space, “You don’t know how much I can do.”


Claudine began to sob, as tears flowed seamlessly out of her eyes. Her cry was echoing even through the doors of her home. Anyone who’d be listening in could only assume it was tears of distress at the knowledge of her fiance heading off into war.

Matthias stood there, looking at Claudine’s wracking form, before he decided to leave.

Once Matthias left the street leading to Brandt’s residence, he couldn’t help but look up at the sky. He laughed to himself as he gazed at the dazzling, bright and beautiful sky overhead. He breathed in deeply and felt his whole body relax with an undertone of giddiness.

And so the days began to roll by, and on the day that was supposed to be his wedding, Duke Matthias von Herhardt reported to duty, and began to serve as commanding officer in the Berg’s Sixth Army.

As his men and companions around him hardened up and braced themselves to face enemy lines, he couldn’t help but feel so excited.

Any moment now, he’ll be going to Sienna.

Any day now, he’ll reach the city of southern beaches and beautiful waves to find his true goal.








Kyle staggered to his feet as soon as the extreme nausea finally subsided. He groaned in pain, his throat and stomach throbbing in the excessive hurling he’d just done. He took a few more steps, before hobbling beneath a tree and sat beneath it with another groan.

He could still smell the disinfectant and antiseptic even if he was a distance away from the field infirmaries set up. There was also a hint of iron in the air, reminding him of just how much blood was being spilled and the ongoing field surgery in one of the tents.

He could see the military doctors flapping the tents open as they rushed in, out and around the barracks. Kyle took a shaky breath as he saw some wounded soldiers walk in and patted his stomach lightly, wordlessly willing it to settle down again.

He was so tired, and it seemed like his stomach had finally tired out as well from all the hurling he did.

“Hey,” a light tap made its way to his shoulders, making Kyle jump a bit as he looked up and saw another military doctor crouching down over at him. “Are you feeling okay?” the doctor asked.

Kyle hoped he hadn’t spaced out long, and began to clamber back to his feet, when the doctor prompted him to stay down.


“No, keep sitting.” the doctor lightly ordered him, and promptly took a seat beside him. Then, wordlessly, the doctor brought over and gave him the bucket he had been holding.

As one of Kyle’s direct supervisors for field experience in their school, the doctor was also responsible for ensuring Kyle and the rest of his classmates would be fine while they were rendering service.

Kyle wasted no time in giving him a heartfelt gratitude and began to rinse his mouth free of the remnants of his vomit, and promptly took a huge swig from his bottled water once he was finished.

Unfortunately their reprieve had been short-lived, when all of a sudden shouts and calls of panicked ‘medic’ were soaring through the air. Some of them had come from the tent.

Some of the patients out of surgery were now waking up.

Immediately, Kyle and his supervisor rose to their feet and quickly resumed their duties.

“How long do you think this will continue?” Kyle asked, a mix of worry and exhaustion could be heard in his voice. His senior-only pursed his lips grimly, their hands quickly working between themselves absentmindedly as they did their work swiftly and efficiently.

“If the current progress continues,” the doctor grunted, eyes quickly scanning their current patient before preparing the things they needed, “We should be able to break into the country in no time. It’s any day now.”

Kyle efficiently assisted in the process, his eyes scanning their surroundings from time to time until his assistance was once more required.

The lush green forests they once arrived in, were now beginning to turn red. But the trees by the borders in Lovita were still of greenish-blue.

“We must keep on persevering, at least we’re not actively engaging enemy forces.” The doctor continued, and patted Kyle on the shoulders in a comforting manner, “If we’re lucky, the war will soon be over, and we can go back home in time for winter.”

Where the doctor marched, Kyle promptly followed, his eyes, ears and hands quick to aid whatever was requested of him. Yet, with every passing day, the more Kyle believed an end could not possibly be achieved despite the encouraging words from his superiors.

Not when everywhere he looked was only pain, destruction, and even death. Even if the war finally ended, everyone’s lives had already been irrevocably changed. If he was already witnessing this much destruction, on a side his betters believed to be winning the war, he dreads to see what the other side’s camp looked like. And his heart hurt at the thought of it.

No one, especially the innocent, ever survived unscathed in wars.


When the declaration of the war came to their university, he was astonished to realize that even the medical students were conscripted to serve in the war effort as well. Even other courses, like engineering and the like, were made to serve through their respective skills.

Quickly the sudden arrival of war was buried in the urgency of serving their empire.

The school systems all over the region were quickly revised to accommodate the war. And in no time, a large number of convening troops and armed forces were being transported to their respective posts.

Kyle had been so scared at the prospect of being in a war. His entire senses were heightened, his anxiety spiking up with every task they were being given. In no time, Kyle quickly realized how soon he needed to adjust to serve in the war.

He had no choice but to do so, lives were on the line.

When he and his group had been deployed to their respective stations, it had already been a battlefield. Kyle was immediately shaken out of his frightened shell, and forced to swallow down his fears to save the lives of those defending their country.

Half of the time he dreaded failing. This was no longer just all theoretical, no longer a certain number on a test saying he failed. If he fails here, someone will die. He only finished one year in medical school, and while it was spent most of the time assisting operations, it hadn’t been this urgent.

And especially not on a massive scale, like the continuous influx of wounded soldiers.

“Both of you, head to the commanding barracks!” Barked a random officer that Kyle vaguely recognized.

“How many officers were injured?” quickly asked by his supervisor as he immediately grabbed a first aid kit.

“I heard the army captain had been shot. Most of the other injuries were minor as well, hence he hadn’t been rushed into the infirmary as the others were.” they quickly grunted in response, “Go on! Make haste!”

Immediately Kyle was quickly led back outside and followed quickly after his supervisor.

Something in Kyle’s eyes immediately changed, and hardened at the mention of heading towards the commander’s tents. He knew it was poor of him to think so, but he hoped deep in his heart…

That whoever had been shot was a familiar face.






Leyla watched as one after another, the large trucks went in and out of the museum’s storage facility. She couldn’t help but watch the entire process with a frown of confusion. She hadn’t really been working in the place for so long, but she couldn’t help but hold on tightly on the strap of her bag anxiously.

This process had been going on for days in the museum. The storage facilities housed many of the museum’s precious specimens and national jewels. The director had made an announcement that they were being relocated, and they had ample measures to secure every priceless artifact in those trucks.

Still, she couldn’t help but feel it was an unusual thing to do.

Once the trucks were gone, the dead silence in the roads resumed and Leyla stopped walking. She paused and observed the roads with a somber expression. The trucks had been the only vehicles to pass through these roads in days.

She remembered hearing the mayor of Sienna give an announcement that the Confederacy had everything under control, and that the tides of war would soon be in their favor. But every day, more and more refugees kept spilling into their borders that Leyla found it to be hardly encouraging when the otherwise was evidently true.

From the refugees she managed to talk to, they had tales of the Berg’s empire fiercely advancing south. Lovita had all but abandoned the northeastern fronts and reappropriated most of their forces down west.

There simply weren’t enough men to defend the capital, and they had little doubt Sienna would soon be forfeited to Berg as well.

Protests had been vocally made by the people in defense of their king, declaring they would not be abandoned. Sienna was a key region in Lovita’s army after all, it was in this city that most supplies for their navy and military were coming from.

Still, everyone had grown weary and a single thing going wrong could trigger everyone into panic quickly. Bill and Leyla were in the same boat as them as well.

She quickly did the groceries, and promptly made her way back home. Unfortunately, everyday the prices hiked more and more, while the supplies became less and less.

Most of the supplies were also being diverted towards the military front in the guise of defending their country. As a result, even some items in the market that used to be everyday items were now becoming scarce to see in stock.

Leyla found herself lying in exhaustion on her bed as soon as she arrived. She would prepare dinner later, but for now, she needed to rest her sore feet. Her back was beginning to hurt lately, and she couldn’t help but feel bloated.


The elation she felt upon releasing the constriction around her abdomen was simply immaculate. Upon further thought, she entertained the idea of wearing looser clothes.

As she kept thinking about one thing after another, Leyla eventually found herself drifting off to sleep without meaning to. She only woke up when a glaring thumping sound had suddenly begun. She quickly awoke with a start, grunting in the suddenness of her awakening and groaning as she sat up.

Had something fallen off the table again?

She rubbed her eyes, yawning off the sleep and blinked the drowsiness away. She let out another quiet sigh, when another blaring sound rang. She frowned and tilted her head in thought.

That sounded like it came from the streets. And followed shortly, were panicked calls of her name.

“Leyla! Leyla!”

She quickly gasped and shot up immediately to her feet! It was uncle Bill!

She rushed out of her room, just in time to see her muddied uncle burst through their front door in a blind panic!

“Leyla!” He immediately sighed in absolute relief, before he quickly urged her to pack some essentials, “We need to go dear, quickly now!” He grabbed a random bag and filled it with whatever they needed, and, “Come on, Leyla!” Bill snapped at her urgently once more when she remained frozen.

Leyla snapped back into action, also gathering things she thought they might need before they rushed out of the small apartment. By the time they reached the streets, another sound had rung all over the streets once again!

And then it clicked to Leyla. They had been oriented about many different alarm sounds.

This one indicated an air strike from the enemy!








Kyle stifled in a groan of distaste upon assisting in treating the injuries of the commanding cavalry officer. In his opinion, while multiple fragments of shrapnel were embedded in his shins, most of his injuries were wildly exaggerated from the prior report.

He couldn’t help but wonder how such a weak willed man ended up commanding a unit of the Emperor’s vital army.


As soon as he was dismissed from assisting, Kyle respectfully turned away and released a quiet sigh, before his eyes landed on a familiar face. Immediately, his eyes hardened into a glare once more and bore holes into the man he wanted to see killed before the enemy.

Unfortunately for Kyle, the bastard was unscathed as ever.

Kyle glanced back and saw the doctor finally disinfecting the area around the wound, and beginning to wrap it up. Kyle could feel eyes on him, and when he turned back around, he saw the Matthias, sitting crossed-legged on his cot, and smoking.

He was watching them with an interested glint in his eyes.

“You medic!” a random soldier shouted at him once he saw Kyle simply standing, “Don’t just stand there! Treat the Major!” he yelled at him and Kyle looked at him and back at the Duke.

The Duke was the major, how wonderful. He thought sarcastically.

Begrudgingly though, Kyle made his way over to him and stopped a foot away from the Duke. They stared at each other for a while, before Kyle decided to break the silence and get it over with as soon as possible.

“Are you injured anywhere, Major?” he asked dryly. Wordlessly, Matthias let out a low puff of smoke before straightening up. He flexed his arm and stretched it, before rolling up the left sleeve of his combat suit.

Kyle’s eyes were immediately drawn to the bloodied spot of the uniform, before a bloodied makeshift bandage was revealed to him.

Kyle could immediately see it wasn’t a minor wound, and couldn’t help the small thought of satisfaction at realizing the Duke won’t be coming out unscathed, even just physically, either. Immediately, he shook the terrible thoughts away and knelt down to prepare for work.

“I need to take a look.” He said, snapping gloves on quickly, and looking for affirmation from the Duke, “This might be a little tender.” He lightly warned, and Matthias nodded at him, before Kyle began to assess the injury.

Still indifferent as ever, Kyle thought dryly. At least his antipathy was always consistent.

They weren’t in the same unit, that much Kyle knew. Still, he couldn’t help but feel a twinge of fury and amazement at the Duke’s complete ignorance of his presence, even as he’s being treated by someone he knew hated his guts.

Kyle wished he could be as apathetic as he was, but he could not. While the war may have taught Kyle to be more tolerable of things he did not agree with, he could not stop the ill wishes he had of the man.


But that doesn’t mean he’ll compromise his morals and work ethic. He knew he was chosen immediately as the Duke’s medic because of the tag in his uniform. Everyone knew that the Etmans were the doctors for Herhardts.

With calm, and practiced motions, Kyle eventually found himself frowning as he assessed the injury.

So the man with the shrapnels wasn’t the commanding officer they were reported about, but the Duke then. This was a gunshot wound, and the other one was just another noisy commander wailing about skin wounds from shrapnel of a grenade.

With complete concentration, and steady hands, Kyle managed to remove the bullet from the hole.

“It’s time to suture it.” Kyle sighed out, before frowning, thinking about the treatment carefully, “I think.” He murmured quietly to himself, reviewing quickly in his mind if it was the correct process in dealing with a gunshot wound.

Despite his obvious hesitation, Matthias seemed to have no qualms in trusting Kyle to do his job, and only had one thing to say to him.

“Do as you want.” Matthias told him with an encouraging nod.


Chapter 123




That Name







“Did it hurt?” Kyle asked impulsively after he was finished disinfecting the area around the wound. Most of the military doctors and medical officers around him had finished up their job around the barracks, and had been summoned to the others who needed them.

The only ones left around him were Matthias and the other commanders who just got treated.

Kyle wasn’t asking because he was concerned about the Duke’s pain. Instead, he simply found it baffling how such a madman could act so aloof and calm as though he was just another bystander in the war.

Perhaps it was because he was used to seeing people suffer that even a bullet in his body wouldn’t make him feel pain at all.

Matthias looked at Kyle without saying anything. All he had to respond to him was a faint smile on his lips.

Almost like mocking Kyle that he was unimportant. Kyle couldn’t help the boiling anger bubbling up in him before tediously stamping his anger down. His grip on the scalpel loosened up, trying to flex his fingers to avoid digging it into the Duke’s neck.

Something about the Duke here was different from the Duke he met previously in front of Leyla and Uncle Bill’s old, abandoned cabin. Almost like he’s back to how he was before Uncle Bill and Leyla disappeared than the wallowing madman he’d lately become.

He’d been receiving word from his father about the Duke’s health developments. Dr. Etman had made it clear he was desperately worried about the Duke’s well-being, and expected Kyle to do the work for him in the field as he was unable to.

It wasn’t that Kyle wanted to do this. On the contrary, he’d love to leave this man to his own devices, and hopefully someone out there was skilled enough to kill the Duke.

But alas, Leyla loved this man. He had no doubt if she were to hear the Duke’s death, she’d be sorrowful and inconsolable.

And so he resolved to just do as he’s told. Not actively seeking the Duke out for his health, but certainly never shirking his duties.


Kyle stepped back with clenched teeth when he finished dressing the wound. Sensing he was done, Matthias promptly stood up from his seat and rolled his sleeves down nonchalantly. He bent down to pick something up, before turning back towards Kyle, with a drink in his hand.

“Join me for a drink.” Matthias offered him with his practiced gentleman smile as he held out the drink for the medical student.

Kyle could almost laugh at his audacity.

“I don’t think the good Major and I are on good enough terms to be sharing drinks together.” Kyle instead replied dryly yet respectfully all the same.

“Then drink with me all the same, even with the bad blood between us.”

Kyle pursed his lips, narrowing his gaze at the Duke. He couldn’t fathom what the point the Duke was trying to make. Was he making light of Kyle’s righteous ire for him? Was he making fun of him?

If so, the Duke had a morbid sense of humor that only worsened every time he heard it. However, Kyle was not in the mood to be ridiculed, and wordlessly took the drink.

Matthias seemed to have smirked and turned around to pick up a glass of his own, and they lightly clanked the glasses together. After that, Kyle threw his head up as he tossed all the alcohol down his throat, drinking it all in one go!

He could feel the brandy sliding smoothly down his throat, leaving fiery tingles in its path. He watched as Matthias pristinely downed his own shot of brandy.

“Major seems to be very happy despite being shot.” Kyle remarked lightly, and Matthias hummed and shrugged.

“Perhaps I am.” He answered, putting the glass face down on the table, and shrugged back on his military coat. “After all, we’re finally breaching Sienna.” He stated with a confident smirk.

The Duke’s velvety voice made the statement sound more appealing, but Kyle could still see him for what he truly is.

Nothing but a madman indeed.

Kyle promptly put down the shot glass the same way Matthias did, barely stopping himself from slamming it down in his disgust of the man. The Duke was moving as smoothly as ever, when Kyle knew how painful it would be to move the wounded arm.

But he acted completely unbothered, not even a little bit derailed by the pain.

Matthias von Herhardt was certainly bred for a war.


He could continue to eat, drink and sleep well despite the number of people he’s seen dead and killed, or killed them himself. It had only taken him a few months to rise from the rank of captain to major, all praising him for his skills and ability.

He even looked like he himself was preening from all the praise he was getting. Kyle had no doubt now why the enemies would call him a demon.

And call it wishful thinking on Kyle’s part, but he seemed not to be the only one to find the Duke especially unnerving. He’d noticed by now how guarded the other officers, even the higher-ranking ones from the Duke, would keep him at arm’s length.

Still, they respected and praised him for his commands and strategies. Being under his command certainly increased the probability of most of them returning alive. The statistics prove as much despite his lack of interest about that certain feat of his.

So why was he excited to go to Sienna? Kyle couldn’t fathom it to be something relating to the war. Matthias didn’t think like that. All he currently had to work with was how elated the Duke was to be getting close to the city.

Seeing him so amused after so much blood had been spilled was odd. Kyle was only thankful he was fortunate enough to not be facing him in the war. However, he had no doubt that if they continued to press their advantage, the Herhardt family would gain another war hero for the empire as soon as the war ended.

“Well then, you are dismissed.” Matthias commanded him, effectively indicating he had no further need for his company. Kyle all but grunted out his frustration and gave him the proper salutations before quickly leaving the Duke’s vicinity.

While he returned to his usual barracks, he looked up at the sky, listening aimlessly to the sounds around him. The foreign sky was so full of beautiful constellations. He hoped with his entire being that Leyla and Uncle Bill would be safe wherever they may be.

And then he hoped the next bullet to hit the Duke, to hit his stone-cold heart next time.








Once the ruckus had died down, multiple people began to pile out slowly from the chapel’s bomb shelter in the basement. Darkness blanketed over the ransacked city, as rubble and ruin surrounded them and filled the streets.

The fear fathering around the bell tower and the town’s square was palpable.

“I can still hardly believe this is what we’ve come to.” Bill muttered out softly in a daze.

Rumors had begun to spread as Berg continued to advance into their lands. First, Vellof, another powerhouse of the Northern Union, would begin to mobilize their fleet to block their reinforcements from sea. And then they’d bombard the cities nearby.

Everyone brushed it off as false rumors spread by the enemies to dishearten their spirits and tried to believe the best scenario was still possible.

Only it wasn’t.

The evidence of the truth was glaring in front of them in the form of ruin and destruction.

“Well, Vellof certainly did a good job in clearing the city. At least we won’t have to hear those deafening bells anymore.” Bill said, trying to cheer Leyla up with a little silver lining. But Leyla could only stare in fear at the collapsed bell tower in front of them.

She turned to Uncle Bill with a stiff smile.

“Yeah, I just,” her frightened eyes stared back at the ruins, “I’m still wrapping my head around it.” Unconsciously, she hugged herself, trying to self-soothe. “It must feel so empty now without the bell.”

She thought her problems were over as soon as she got away from Arvis. They finally have a place to call fully their own. It was cheap, clean and beautiful, but the main problem in the area was the bell.

No one loved to live in a place where a bell would loudly ring to indicate a new hour had passed. But, of course, now there was no more bell to worry about, but did they still have somewhere to live?

Are they ever truly lucky?

Now that she was thinking about something else, she could finally begin to feel herself breathing again.

Suddenly Uncle Bill piped up.

“Come on now, get on my back,” he quickly told her, as he crouched down in front of her, “Let’s see if we can go home.”

Leyla’s eyes flashed with irritation as she glared at her feet. She felt stupid forgetting to put on her shoes. Immediately, she started to decline his offer.

“Oh, no need Uncle,” she immediately said, “These socks are quite thick. They’re like second shoes.”

“Come now, it’s no trouble.” Bill persisted, “Quickly now, at this rate we’ll have to sleep in the streets if you keep dawdling.”

“Please, I can walk.” Leyla kept insisting, telling him she’ll be able to rest after a walk.


Her dress fabric was rather thin. And she’d removed her belly band when she went for a short nap before the warnings of the air strike. She had made sure to be extra careful, and began buying loose-fitting clothes…

But the deep-seated fear of disappointing Uncle Bill still persisted in her.

Uncle Bill only eyed her carefully. He’d had some suspicions lately, but he wanted Leyla to come to it on her own terms. But it seemed like he needed to confront this topic as quickly as he could.

But do current circumstances make the need to be immediate?

Uncle Bill was still at a loss on how to broach Leyla’s trauma. Every time he even thought about addressing it, Leyla would just shut down and refuse to talk about it by steering the conversation into something else.

It was frustrating, and made him more guilty of how an inadequate caretaker he was, still is.

“Such trivialities,” Bill huffed out softly, “Why are you so stubborn about this?”

Leyla hunkered in on herself, fearing she just disappointed him more.

“I’m sorry uncle.” She muttered softly. Uncle Bill eventually sighed, and rubbed her head comfortingly.

“Well then, you sure you can make it with just those socks?” He asked instead, pointing to her woolen socks. Immediately, Leyla wasted no time proving her point by shooting up to her feet and making a show of how unbothered she was.

Uncle Bill only smiled at her determination, and relented to her. He held out his hand for her to take, to which she eagerly did, and clung desperately onto his arm before they walked down their rubbled streets.

Some parts of the surrounding buildings were destroyed in the air strike, but the further from the bell tower then walked, the less the damage seemed to be. It led Bill to think they had concentrated the attack around the center of the town, and not all over.

To keep their spirits up, Bill engaged his foster daughter in conversation, playfully berating the piloting and targeting skills of Vellof pilots, even going as far to compare their incompetence to the chef in front their apartment, who only cooked dismal food at best.

“Don’t worry Leyla,” Bill said, “I doubt they’d return again.”

It was a lie. These things never happen just once.

“I’m sure you’re right, uncle!” Leyla quickly agreed.

They knew they were lying, but to believe otherwise would only make them resign to their fates.

“Hey uncle,” Leyla piped up, biting her lip nervously.

“Hmm?”

“Why don’t we talk about what we like instead?”

“Oh?” Bill piped up, “What we like?”

“Yes, talking about that will make me feel better. So let’s talk about that instead.”

Uncle Bill laughed, shaking his head at how childish she was being lately.

“Silly child, what do you mean?”

“I’ll go first!” Leyla piped up, continuing on without listening to her uncle’s further teasing.

“The first thing I really like is Uncle Bill!” She proudly declared, and smiled widely at him. Uncle Bill’s eyes wrinkled as he smiled back at her.

“Well then, I really like the kid living with me.” Leyla blinked at him, before pouting.

“Kid?” she asked him, “But it’s been a while since I grew up already.”

She huffed indignantly at him.

“I’m not a child, but an adult.”

“Oh, don’t mistake age to be an indication of whether or not you’re an adult already,” Uncle Bill pointed out, patting the hand on his arm comfortingly. “You’ve still got ways to go before you’re truly grown up.” He sighed out softly, smiling kindly towards her.

And so on it went, listing down their favorite things from birds to flowers to trees, ice cream, mystery novels, and even the first snow they had.

All these Bill already knew about her, but was quite content listening to her babble on animatedly about why she loved them so. But whenever she’d ask him in return what his favorites were, he’d only ever answer one thing.

Leyla.

His most beloved treasure. The one who gave purpose to him.

Eventually after a long while, Leyla began pouting again, gripping onto his arm tightly in frustration.

“Uncle, be serious! I can’t all be your favorite!” She whined bashfully, and he only laughed at her heartily. He only shrugged and smiled through her scoldings.

It was true.


When he first heard the siren for the airstrike, his thoughts immediately went to Leyla. The deep-seated tiredness in his bones from a full day of work was immediately replaced with an adrenaline rush of worry for Leyla.

He ran like crazy for home, knowing Leyla was there by now, and in no time dragged her with him as they went to the shelter.

Was this how parents usually feel for their child?

Perhaps.

He couldn’t help thinking that even if he died in that instant, it would have been fine to him knowing that Leyla was safe. If his death meant saving Leyla, he would give his life up happily to ensure it.

He only hoped that after he passed, she would live well for herself instead.

Looking into her eyes, she still held that childlike innocence that brought both happiness and ache in his heart. Finally, unable to hold her gaze any longer, he looked ahead, watching whatever may come their way.

So many things could go wrong right now, and Bill wasn’t sure about which he should worry about most?

Was it the war out of their doorsteps? Him continuing to be an incompetent father? Or the duke they ran away from, one he desperately wanted to be killed in this war?

“Uncle?” Leyla’s hand was waving in front of his face. He must have been spacing out. Up ahead, he could finally see their apartment. At least it was still intact. He turned to Leyla, wiping the worry off his face and smiled at her.

“Ah, I feel so much better after that talk of favorite things Leyla,” he told her, “Thank you for that bright idea.”

Leyla beamed proudly at him, seemingly oblivious to his lies.

“You’re welcome uncle,” She smiled brightly at him, “I feel so much better now too!”

He hoped she could keep smiling as brightly as that, even when he’s gone from her side through death.






As soon as news of the cavalry battalion successfully securing the bridges and roads had reached them, they wasted no time barking out commands for all their brigades to start preparing in the north and east of their forces.

Major Matthias von Herhardt, and his infantry company had been tasked in breaking through the center of the enemy’s center fortress, which had taken a beating from the airstrike. As they advanced, roars of the mortars cracking and breaking walls ensued, until they finally stopped.

They reached the stand-off of their war.

Matthias waited for the dust around them to settle, with sharp eyes staring at the covered enemies before they struck and dealt significant damage on enemy forces again.

All around them were sounds of walls being knocked down, shells flying overhead and hitting their targets. The walls that once stood to protect the city for many years, had crumbled down to rubble.

The fortress was captured, and his entrance to Sienna was cleared. Matthias suspected that they could take over Sienna in a matter of fifteen days, give or take. A month is the latest.

Still, he was close. He couldn’t help but feel giddy at the knowledge of this.

“We’re almost through!” shouted the scout in report over the massive sounds around them.

Tensions were being raised as they kept pushing their advantage, successfully invading the enemy fortress and dismantling their defenses one after another.

Everyone around Matthias grew silent as they looked at their commanding officer. And then a loud trumpet sound rose above the rest of the cacophony.

Matthias began to walk into the enemy’s destroyed base with an indifferent expression.

Their assignment was to seize the fortress, and secure it by taking no prisoners. Once done, they would raise the flag of their empire on the highest peak, indicating it’s been successfully acquired by the Berg Empire. And then Sienna would be theirs…

And Leyla, his.

A smile found its way to his lips at the thought of her. Her name slipped from his lips like poison velvet.

He looked in the direction of the far south, knowing that’s where his end goal would be.

When reports of Vellof pilots bombarding Sienna reached him, most of the army cheered at knowing their enemy forces had greatly lessened. But Matthias couldn’t shake the worry of someone killing Leyla.

He needed her to be alive. It wouldn’t work if he weren’t the one to kill her after all. No one can touch her, nor harm her but him. He didn’t care if they were allies or enemies in this war. Or even if it was a god he had to fight, Leyla was his in all sense.

She was his sole purpose in life. Where she goes, he’ll follow, whether she wants him to or not.

She may see him as a monster, or the devil incarnate, it didn’t matter to him. She was his.

His Leyla.

























Chapter 124




Only One Purpose




The marching sound of his infantry troops crossing the bridge echoed ominously in the empty streets.

Matthias had since broken off part of his company into two groups, who now both stood on standby on either side of the fortress’ broken entrance. The rest continued their climb into the opening they made forcefully.

Looking over the village, the smell of soot and rotting flesh filtered through Matthias’ senses. It was like a mass graveyard, filled with the dead enemy.

His sharp gaze quickly swept over the broken buildings, all turned to rubble and dust. And then his eyes glanced over at the chapel, which was missing both its spire and roof. Still, its walls remained standing tall, and would provide excellent cover.


How fortunate that a foreign country’s god would give them their own protection. He had no doubt even Lovita’s own enemy forces would see this as a blessing, especially the religious ones amongst their ranks.

Matthias pushed on, running down several more stone walls, crushing beneath it the fallen bodies of their enemy forces. He was only following instructions, never mind it led him straight to where he needed to be. Immediately his company began spreading out, rounding the perimeter of the chapel at an efficient speed.

Matthias observed the chapel, and his men’s placement, before pulling the pin out of the grenade and launching it near the stained glass, before it shattered into a thousand more pieces. A distant scream could be heard, as more of their enemy soldiers resurfaced and rejoined the fray.

Matthias had no love for any deity, as such it was easy for him to destroy such a sacred place. So he merely raised his gun, trailing it at his enemies and pulled the trigger, feeling nothing as they dropped dead like flies around him.

They were inconsequential to his goal after all.



They thought the sound of bells ringing from the square would be over after the bell tower had been destroyed. But alas, once more it resumed, followed shortly by loud sounds of heavy machinery and firearms!

By now, the museum had been closed. Leyla still found everything so surreal the more the days progressed. But she wasn’t even worrying about her current loss of job.

No, it was the war that was getting closer and closer to their doorsteps with each passing day they spent was what’s been bothering her the most. She knew she didn’t have reason to, but her mind kept making up the worst possible scenarios that could happen to her.

What if an air strike would happen again?

What if the Berg army finally breaches the borders of Sienna?

How long will the war last? Will they still be alive to see it?

A gentle touch awoke Leyla up, and she woke up with a slight startle before realizing it was only Uncle Bill, who’d gently nudged her awake. She didn’t even realize she’d fallen asleep, her mind too preoccupied with morbid thoughts. Nevertheless, it didn’t feel like she’d been sleeping.

“Uncle?” she mumbled out sleepily in question, and Uncle Bill gave her a small smile.


“I’m sorry, I didn’t mean to wake you.” He apologized softly. He must have just gotten back. Leyla smiled back at him and began to sit up, grasping his hand on her shoulder, and squeezing it in a comforting manner.

“It’s okay,” Leyla said hurriedly, “You’ve finished early?” She took a quick glance at the clock, “You must have, it’s not even dinner time yet.”

“No, I’m not finished yet, we’re on lunch break though.” Bill chuckled softly before gently putting a box on the bed beside her. “I just stopped by to give you something.”

As soon as she saw the box, Leyla beamed up at him in excitement!

“Is it for me?” she eagerly asked, “What is it?” She wondered out loud, and Bill couldn’t help but chuckle in seeing her glee. Then, bringing it closer to her, she could smell the faint scent of peaches in the air!

After the air strike, he was fortunate that his work wasn’t entirely rendered out of commission, and thus returned to work. But everytime he left for work, he couldn’t help but worry and feel guilty at leaving Leyla all by herself at home all day.

She wasn’t showing him any signs that would usually give him worry. But still, leaving her alone all day, every day, can’t stop him from feeling so anxious.

This was the only thing he could think of to brighten up her day momentarily.

If he could only stop the war, and make her dreams come true by himself, he would do it. Make sure she’d find someone good to her, and loved her, he would find them. But he’s long known how limited his power in this life truly was.

He’s only Bill Remmer. And as a lowly peasant, he could only bring her favorite fruits right now.

“Eat up okay?” Bill lightly reminded her, to which she eagerly nodded at him.

“Of course!”

“And don’t just keep saying yes to everything I say, make sure you eat them for real, and eat well alright?” Bill lightly chided at her. “It’s times like this that you need to make sure you’re healthy and energized enough. So eat like a cow alright, I told you that before, didn’t I?”

Weeks kept passing, and more and more he could see the way Leyla’s features sharpened, her face turning hollow, and bones jutting out more prominently against her skin. Why was she so thin?

Was she starving herself again?

Oblivious to his worries, Leyla only laughed at him, and reiterated she will. But, such naivety and innocence still, Bill couldn’t help but think; he wondered what would happen to her as soon as he wasn’t there to look out for her.

In some ways, she was still a child.

“Good, make sure you do just that.” Bill hummed, “And don’t worry about dinner, I’ll make sure to buy us both some good food later.”

“Ooh, fancy!” Leyla giggled, “Are we having a feast later?”

“A feast, eh?” Bill hummed thoughtfully before smiling, “Why not? Let’s see if we can have a feast later.” He patted Leyla’s head, lightly ruffling her hair and grinned upon seeing her indignation.

“Okay then,” Leyla smiled at him, before her expression turned serious, “If we have a feast later on, I will tell you something too.” Leyla’s eyes turned sombre as she stared off into space…

“Yes, I have something to tell you.” She whispered softly, but still loud enough for Bill to hear. Her grip on his hand tightened up some more, and Bill took the chance to assess her more carefully.

He could tell this would be a serious matter. He’d only ever seen such a determined expression on her quite a few times before.

In Leyla’s mind, she resolved to come clean to him tonight. She no longer wanted this constant guilt in her chest about hiding something this big to her uncle.

She wanted to stop being so afraid of his judgment. She won’t be a coward anymore.

“Well then, I best get going by now.” Bill said, squeezing her hand back in a comforting manner, prompting her to finally loosen up her grip on him. “Take a good and long rest alright?”

Leyla watched as her uncle turned around to leave, and the cold feeling washed over her. Why did she say that? What had she been thinking!?

“Uncle!” She called out and Bill turned back around, with an inquisitive look on his face.

Leyla only gave him a bright smile.

“Don’t worry about tonight, I was only joking!” She laughed it off, “Have a safe trip okay?” She then reached out to put on her glasses back on.

Bill let out a dry sigh at hearing her words, and waved back at her with a small wave goodbye.

“Still a kid, quite the kid you still are.” She could hear him lightly chide her as he turned around to leave. “Well then, I’ll see you soon, Leyla.”



Another shot of a bullet rang through the air as it hit its mark! Another soldier of their opposing forces dropped dead on the ground, his gun clattering loudly against the rubble beneath him. Major Herhardt finally lowered his gun once more, eyes devoid of remorse or glee.

The war wasn’t important after all.

“We’ve got a runner!” someone shouted, pointing to a pair of enemy soldiers who were making a hasty escape. Matthias’ eyes narrowed towards them, before he spotted a war horse tied loosely close by.

Matthias raised his gun, pointing it towards the horse, and pulled the trigger.

The window behind the horse shattered into a million pieces, effectively spooking the animal, before it took off running. The Lovita soldiers tried their best to intercept the horse, but were immediately surrounded by Berg forces.

Matthias signalled his men to hold their fire, leisurely approaching them. As he came to them, his eyes were drawn to the middle-aged man, who held his head up, looking to the skies in complete resignation.

Judging by his uniform, he was the commander of the fort defense. Matthias at least graced him with a common courtesy of respect for his rank.

“This battle is over.” Matthias spoke in the native tongue of Lovita. It was decidedly rough on his tongue, but at least he was fluent enough to be understood. “Won’t you agree with me?”

The commander sighed, eyes darting quickly over to Matthias, before raising his gaze up towards the skies again. Surrendering now would only mean that the battle indeed was over. And if he were to surrender now, there was a high chance the rest of his remaining men would survive, even amidst capture.

But what would that mean to Sienna?

Steeling his resolve to face his imminent fate, he breathed in deeply before huffing out a single prolonged breath…

In no time, he pulled out a gun and pointed it directly to Matthias!

Sharp cries of soldiers around them echoed all around as a single shot was heard once more.

“MAJOR!”



Leyla half-heartedly ate the peach Uncle Bill had gotten for her. She had little to no appetite right now, but she didn’t want to disappoint him further. As soon as the sweet, saccharine juice hit her tongue, she immediately felt hungry…

She didn’t expect it to be this savory. She eyed the other fruits as she eagerly bit into more of the fruit.

‘Should I eat more?’

she wondered in between bites, as the juices dribbled down her chin.

‘I probably should save some for later though.’

Eventually, her hunger won out and she immediately reached for more of the peaches, when an unfamiliar sound soared through the stillness of the town! Leyla’s hand stilled, a breadth away from another peach.

Her hand wavered and lightly nudged the peach, prompting it to roll off the table. Something unsettling was churning in her stomach.

It was impossible…

But she couldn’t shake the feeling away. She couldn’t help but feel cold dread wash all over her as the alarms rang again…

‘No! Please no!’

A scream broke out, not too far away, followed closely by a loud explosion, and the ground beneath her shook!

Leyla screamed, holding onto the corners of the table as her entire apartment shook from the impact!

Frames fell down, and the cabinets clattered as more and more explosions rang out from all around her!

Finally, Leyla managed to crawl underneath the table, holding onto the legs for dear life as the shaking grew stronger with each passing second!

The explosions were drawing closer and closer to her! More screams were heard out in the streets as everyone hurried to a bomb shelter!

Leyla’s heart was beating so loudly against her chest, that she could hear it pounding in her ears! She knew she needed to get out quickly, and race to the nearby bomb shelter, but her body was currently frozen in fear!

‘Think Leyla! Think!’ she admonished herself, ‘What do you have to do!?’

Her minds raced back to that time Uncle Bill pulled her out of her frozen state, and immediately brought them back to the nearby chapel where they all huddled in until the bombing was over.

She could do that. She did it once before, she could do it again!

A loud explosion suddenly appeared, and the building across from hers blew up into pieces! Leyla wasted no time more in crawling out from under the table and rushed outside, bringing nothing but adrenaline as she raced outside for safety!

As she rushed out of the building, she heard a fighter jet whizzing through the air loudly! Then, another roof went missing from across the street!


Leyla’s legs felt weak upon seeing the wreckage in front of her, but she couldn’t stop! And so with shaky legs, she continued down the flight of stairs, hoping for the next bomb to not land right on top of her!



A smoking pistol remained, and a gurgling sound came from the Lovitan commander. Matthias stood over the dying man with cold, and unimpressed eyes, his gun still aimed perfectly to where the commander had been kneeling.

The commander’s gun was soon soaked with his own blood in no time.

Feeling he was dead enough, Matthias pocketed back his pistol and turned to his men as though he did not just kill a man. However, even Matthias’ men became unnerved about his indifference. Some swallowed down the uncomfortableness of the moment.

“Like I said, this battle is over.” He reiterated and turned towards the Lovitan general, who remained. He held out his hand for him to shake as though they were just finishing a business transaction.

The general squeezed his eyes shut, muttering about their god to show mercy and looked up to the skies to pray once last time. Then, with a despairing sigh, he quickly removed his effects and surrendered them to the young Berg major.

An official recognition of defeat.

He had no doubt another airstrike would happen, this time closer to the beaches of Sienna.

Matthias looked towards the defeated general, stepped back a few paces away, and bowed towards him. The Lovitan General rose to his feet and straightened up his posture.

“I apologize about your commander.” Matthias hummed respectfully, looking down on the bloodied corpse between them. He then gestured to his men, and immediately, the General was cuffed, and led towards the square.

The general was now their prisoner of war.

Upon seeing this, cheers from the Berg army erupted loudly! Then, they began to celebrate their short-lived victory before they began preparations to occupy the whole of Sienna.

Matthias felt somewhat detached from the whole thing. The war wasn’t important.

Victory, glory, and honor? None of that mattered, none of those ever meant anything to him. He was only ever here for one thing, one important thing most of all, and the only one that mattered above everything else for him.

If winning the pointless war for his emperor was the way to do it, so be it.

All he needed was Leyla.

His Leyla.

A small curve of a smile made its way to his lips at the thought of her.

He watched as his men tore down Lovita’s flag and replaced it with their own, declaring the city to be on Berg’s property. His commanding officer was now making a big fancy speech to boost more of their force’s morale, but Matthias didn’t need them.

His morale is boosted every time he knew he was closer to seeing Leyla again.

She would belong to him again, in every sense of the word, and he could now keep her safe in the way he deemed fit.

Any moment now, he’d have her again. This was his fate. He couldn’t help but feel amused. People said you could die any time in times of war, but Matthias never felt more alive than right now! He knew air strikes were still being held around Sienna, and there was no way to guarantee her survival…

But he knew his Leyla was a survivor. Therefore, she’d find some way to be safe and remain safe until he was there to see her again.

Besides, he’d issued an order to provide safe haven to any of the civilians they’d encounter along the way. His men knew not to harm anyone that wasn’t an opposing soldier. But, of course, if they were met with resistance, Matthias gave them a go-ahead to do what must be done.

‘Ah, Sienna,’

Matthias thought with a confident smirk, ignoring the dried blood splattered around his face.

‘You’re mine, any moment now.’


Chapter 125




Nothing Would Change Until Forever







The bombing soon stopped, but the people remained frozen from where they’ve been. It lasted a lot shorter than before, almost as if Vellof’s air strike was only supposed to be a warning. A show of power over them.

Still, the sounds of children crying echoed throughout the silent, quivering crowd. The basement was still as dark and stuffy as before. Then, followed shortly by the despairing sounds of children, were the despondent sighs of the adults around them.

Among the adults in the shelter was Leyla. She had reached the shelter in time, and now she was huddling in on herself, nervously twiddling with her fingers. Her whole body was aching, having scraped her knee quite a few times as she ran for the shelter. She barely felt them as she was running, but with the sounds stopping, and with herself safe and sound, the pain was finally catching up to her.

At least the tightened coil around her stomach was finally loosening up.

The entire run from her apartment to here was entirely a blur. All she remembered was bumping into some of the panicking crowd here and there as they all scrambled for shelter, and tried to get out of the streets!

At one point her glasses got thrown off, further delaying her from finding shelter as she tried to locate them quickly enough before resuming her run just in time for an explosion to go off not too far from behind her!

Luckily she had shoes on when she left, but unfortunately lost one of them as she ran to safety. Her socks were soaked, and she’d scraped her feet a couple times from the unsuspecting rubbles here and there, but at least she was still alive.

She didn’t know how long she had been staying here.

“We must hurry and leave! They’re coming back!” shouted some of the younger men who volunteered to be on the lookout. A slight rumble emerged from the gathered crowd in the chapel’s basement.

Leyla felt a faint sense of relief about the announcement, and was one of the few who rose to their feet. Eventually, she found herself approaching the basement stairs, where she could see a faint light radiating from.


She hadn’t seen a glimpse of Uncle Bill at all, even as she walked over the huddled crowd. She needed to find him quickly. It was the only thought running through her head as soon as the bombing sounds stopped, and the fear seeping into her bones left her.

“Are you alright?” a light touch gently jolted her out of her thoughts, and Leyla turned around hastily and saw a stranger looking over at her with great concern.

Leyla could only meekly smile and nod in confirmation, before awkwardly making her leave and following the few people who went up to survey the surface after the bombing.

The faint smell of rubble and explosives still lingered strongly in the air. And even more structures were reduced to ruins as they emerged. It lasted quicker than before, sure, but the damage was far greater as well, especially in the surrounding areas, compared to the ones in the square.

Her glasses started fogging up, and Leyla scrambled to wipe the moisture away with trembling hands before shakily putting them back on. There were pinpricks in her eyes as she kept blinking back the tears.

She faintly realized that one of her glasses had cracked amongst the commotion. She felt a small solace with that. At least she couldn’t see the destruction as clearly as before.

But where was Uncle Bill? Was he okay?

He’d been off to work near the ports and informed her that there was also shelter there nearby in case an emergency would strike. Should she meet him there instead?

Or perhaps he was already headed home? The houses across the street had been bombed, but last she knew, their building apartment had been missed. It would be far easier for her, and her feet to just wait for him there.

She stood still for a moment, before hesitantly walking back down the direction of their apartment. She walked unevenly back, still the thought of seeing Uncle Bill the only thing driving her to move.

She wanted to hurry up and see him!

“Leyla!”

She paused, her heart leaping in her chest as she heard a familiar voice! She quickly turned around, and found relief in finally seeing a familiar face!

It was Uncle Allen.

A sinking dread settled in her stomach as she saw he was alone. She’d been certain he’d gone with Uncle Bill to the ports today, why was he alone?

Upon seeing her worry, Uncle Allen tried to get her to calm down for a little, and they exchanged brief hugs.


“Uncle, have you seen Uncle Bill? Did he go home first?” She asked him, “You two must have emerged from the shelter in the ports then, what a relief.” She sighed as he steadied her, letting her grasp his arms tightly.

Leyla looked in the direction she knew their apartment was.

“That means I must go home quickly now, he might be very worried about me then! It was great to see you alive and safe.” She hurriedly bid adieu, but he only grasped her hands firmly, and gently once more.

Leyla looked back at him, and saw a somber expression on Uncle Allen’s face.

“My dear, I need you to be prepared for what I’m about to tell you, but listen to me, alright?” He started to say gently, but Leyla heard the crack in his voice, and she could feel the bone-chilling dread seep back into her bones.

“Your Uncle Bill, he’s currently in the hospital.”

It was like a rug had been swept under her feet, and Leyla absentmindedly dropped to her knees upon hearing the news! Luckily, Uncle Allen managed to brace her, slightly stopping her from dropping into the rubbled ground beneath them.

Leyla burst into wails, her hands gripping onto Uncle Allen like a lifeline as he tried to calm her down.

“There’s still time, Leyla, hush now,” he tried to tell her, “We can still hurry up and see him, shh.”







There was a buzzing in his ears as his eyes blinked in and out of consciousness.

Where was he? Why was everything a blur?

It felt like he was being submerged in water. Yet it was odd, he could still feel himself breathing…

The next thing he registered was the numbing pain around his body. He can’t even move his fingers. What happened to him? Why was everything so…

Faint?

He could faintly hear a sound beyond the buzzing, slowly getting closer…

“-cle!”

Was someone calling? Who were they yelling for?”

“Un— ill!”

Why did they sound so familiar?

“UNCLE BILL!”

His eyesight shifted back into focus, and he saw a head of golden hair, and a familiar and pleasant face hovering above him.

Were her glasses cracked? He should probably find her some new ones as soon as he can. He gave her a beaming smile…

How odd. He couldn’t move his body as well as he could right now. He wanted to get up and hug her. Why was Leyla crying? Did something bad happen to her again?

He tried moving his hand to wipe her tears away like he usually would, but his arms felt heavy, and painful. Perhaps he should try speaking to her to ease her worries instead?

He tried opening his mouth, and speaking his reassurances to her…

But no matter how hard he tried, he could only wheeze incoherent sounds out. His voice wasn’t coming out as it usually did. Leyla’s eyes darted from him and to the nurse in the room.

Why was a nurse in their house?

Was he still in their house?

Was Leyla sick?

He tried speaking once again to ask Leyla what had happened, but the pain around his throat kept worsening.

And then the memories came flooding back like a tidal wave!

Bill had been in the warehouse by the ports, doing his tasks when an explosion suddenly erupted on top of them! He’d been carrying a box of ammunition, getting them ready along with the others to load them into Lovita’s warships!

When the evacuation order was issued, every one of the workers began panicking and rushing all around him! Bill tried to get away from the stampeding crowd as best as he could, but eventually got swept into the middle of the crowd rushing out of the warehouse!

Just as he finally got outside, another resounding explosion blew up nearby, and a domino of explosions was heard as a bomb dropped into one of the ammunition boxes!

Bill had gone back in time, and saw Arvis’ greenhouse exploding in front of him.

This was all his fault. So he thought in those moments.


If he hadn’t been so petulant about new technology and actually bothered to learn about it, he wouldn’t have driven Leyla into the arms of such a vile man…

They wouldn’t have had to escape from Arvis, and get trapped in a war!

And then he blacked out as something hit him. After that, all he remembered was the sudden pain erupting everywhere in his body.

Was he being drugged with painkillers? It sure felt like it. Everything was so sluggish, but his eyes returned to see Leyla’s tear-filled ones.

‘Don’t cry,’ he wanted to tell her, ‘You shouldn’t cry for anything else, but happiness.’

She looked at him some more, before she began to sob uncontrollably once more, and Bill’s heart ached to see how much he was hurting her. He could faintly feel her grip on his hand, and wondered how tightly she was holding onto him.

‘This is just a bad dream,’ he thought to himself, ‘Once I wake up, everything will be fine, and Leyla will be happy and safe.’ So he wished wistfully, as he blinked owlishly at Leyla.

Another person was coming up to Leyla, and Bill watched silently as they exchanged words, and Leyla’s eyes hardened as they moved to remove her from his side.

Bill wanted to frown and chide the person himself.

Was he a doctor?

‘Damn you doc,’ Bill huffed out angrily upon seeing them try to remove Leyla beside him, ‘Let Leyla stay, she doesn’t have to leave!’ He wanted to argue, but his vocal cords were still too painful.

He could hardly hear what they were talking about, but could faintly hear the sobs and wails by Leyla. He wanted to tell her he’d be okay, and to look after herself…

But he couldn’t do anything.

Even until now, he was still so useless to her.

‘Hush now Leyla, don’t cry,’ he thought, ‘I’ll be fine, you’ll see. Just sit right there and keep taking care of yourself, okay? Don’t be like ol’ Uncle Bill here. Can’t even bear a little pain.’

“I’m sorry.” The doctor began, as he turned to face Leyla.

Leyla looked at him sharply and wanted to shout she’ll pay for whatever surgery fee they had!

She just wanted them to heal her uncle now.

“A surgery won’t help him at all.” He began to explain, “Frankly, we consider it a miracle he’s still conscious, not to mention alive.”

Leyla sniffed, blinking back her tears as she narrowed her eyes to the doctor.

Are they saying what she thought they were saying?!

Immediately, Leyla started shaking her head in disbelief, unwilling to hear more of the doctor’s excuses!

Surely they could still do something! So they brought Uncle Bill to the hospital after all!

After she’d calmed down, and been led quickly to the hospital, she’d been taken aback by how terrible of a state her uncle had been in!

His clothes were soaked with blood, his body wrapped around in makeshift support and bandages, and laid unconsciously on a hospital bed! She’d been given a rundown of what happened, but she didn’t want to believe it had been this bad!

Just as the air raid began, and the people by the ports began to evacuate in an unruly manner, her uncle had been one of the unfortunate few who got caught amongst the flying debris from the explosions around the warehouses.

“No!” Leyla exclaimed, “There must be something you can still do!” She argued persistently, ignoring the gestures of nearby nurses to stay seated.

“I’m sorry, but this is our limit.” The doctor told her softly, “Perhaps it’s best you say your goodbyes now, we’ve no doubt he was only holding on this long enough to see his daughter.”

Leyla wanted to cry upon hearing that.

This couldn’t be happening! This was all a bad dream! This was a terrible, stress-induced dream!

She’d wake up soon, and see her Uncle alive and well, reminding and checking up on her to take care of herself, and she’d retort back at him to do the same!

“No please, you have to save him!” She begged, now kneeling in front of him, and holding onto his white robes for dear life, “You have to save him, please!”

“Miss, I really am sorry I can’t do more than this.” The doctor said, gently guiding her back to sit beside Uncle Bill, “But it’s best to say everything now, before it’s too late.”

A nurse came up beside her, and gave her a glass of water.

Leyla was still reeling over the news about her uncle, and faintly felt the water touch her throat. She immediately gave the glass back to the nurse, and went back to gently holding onto her uncle’s hand…

“Uncle, please, stay with me okay?” She whispered, trying to stifle in her sobs, “You stay strong for me okay, and I-I’ll go find a better doctor,” She gulped down, clearing her throat as she hastily, yet gently combed back his blood soaked hair from his forehead.


“And then when you’re all better, we’ll go back home okay? Don’t worry about the money, I can always find it anywhere.” She whispered to him, “Just s-stay, please….” She sobbed…

“Please don’t leave me!” She whispered, her breath turning shaky as her hands shook from where she was caressing her uncle.

She could see him blinking back his eyes, but the struggle was there. She could see how hard it was for him to keep looking at her.

He groaned once again, with incoherent thoughts, and Leyla shushed him softly…

“Shh, uncle, save your strength, you still have a lot of healing to do.” She whispered, kissing his bloodied temple desperately. She tried to ignore the taste of iron on her lips as she wetted them.

Unable to watch her any longer, the doctor began to pull her aside, and began to stress once more how it was more beneficial for both of them to say goodbye now.

“Miss, even if you were to find a doctor who can guarantee they could still save him, he’d live the rest of his life in pain, and paralyzed. It’s best you can say goodbye now, and that way, he’ll be able to die at least comfortably.”

‘Die…’ Leyla thought, ‘They finally said it, huh?’

Ever since she arrived, she’d been avoiding ever thinking about that word. But now the doctor said it…

And it was all she could think about.

She didn’t want it. But it was the glaring truth in front of her.

Uncle Bill was about to die, and there was nothing she could do about it.

The doctor was right. She’ll regret not doing more later, but for now, she wanted her uncle to regret nothing. And so Leyla cried out for a couple more seconds, before schooling her features into a pleasant smile, before taking back her seat beside her uncle.

She hoped she could relay all her love and gratitude forever meeting him.

“Uncle,” She called out softly, and watched as Uncle Bill’s eyes shakily turned towards her, “Do you remember, when you used to tell me I’d be a great adult one day? You still believe that?” Do you still trust me?”

All of a sudden, Bill could hear her clearly now. And he wanted to chuckle at how ridiculous her questions were.

She was already the greatest adult he’d ever met, and he’d always believed and trusted her, without a single doubt in his mind.


Instead of a laugh though, he could only cough out in response, and Leyla gently rubbed soothing circles over his chest. Finally, a nurse came by to lightly dab a cloth around his mouth, wiping away the blood he’d coughed out.

“Well, if you still believe that, then I can do anything.” Leyla continued, smiling shakily towards him, “After all, Uncle is so smart, and he never lied to me. So I can do anything, s-so long as you still believe in me.”

Her voice cracked in that last part, and her lips began to wobble.

But she needed to keep talking. To say everything before her chance was gone.

And so she told him her thoughts ever since she first came to him, on that day they met when he was planting rose seedlings in the gardens of Arvis.

The happy days they spent together seemed like a lifetime ago. Arvis and her childhood all of a sudden began looking so bright, and innocent, and happy.

Yes, she had been happy back then, being surrounded by the smell of freshly cut grass, and blooming flowers. Everyday has been a joy to live in…

Because she knew when she’d come home, she had Uncle Bill to fall back on.

A sob escaped from her lips, and Leyla brought up her blood-stained hand to cover back her sobs.

‘I can’t do this! I don’t want to do this!’ She screamed in her mind, as she tried to stop the tears from flowing.

What would happen to her now?! She can’t live without Uncle Bill! She can’t! He can’t leave her alone!

Yet, there was still so much she wanted to do with him!

Suddenly, movement came, and Leyla watched as Uncle Bill struggled to sit up, before unceremoniously rolling off the bed!

“Uncle!” She exclaimed, but eventually sighed in relief when two male nurses managed to catch him before he fell to the floor. They placed him back securely onto the bed, and Leyla watched as her uncle’s tears slid down his cheeks…

Leyla smiled at him through the tears, gently cupping his cheeks with shaky hands as she tried to keep him still.

“I am s-s-so blessed… that you became my family.” Leyla sobbed out shakily, “And I never… felt so happy… as I did… everyday… with you…”

Leyla choked back on a sob as she laid her head on his chest, her hand gently grabbing onto his limp one and kissed his knuckles.


“You were always my real family. And if we were to be born again, I wished to be with you again, from the start.” She whispered shakily, kissing his knuckles deeper as she tried to keep her tied down to her…

“And we’ll keep being family, won’t we?” Leyla asked him softly, “Even when we’re parted momentarily, won’t we?” She asked him, looking at Bill desperately.

Bill’s eyes crinkled like he always did when he smiled at her.

Of course, they would always be family.

Bill’s eyes began to blur once more, his sight on Leyla fading in and out of focus as black spots danced in front of his eyes.

“Then I hope to see you soon, okay?” Leyla continued, getting up to gently touch their foreheads together, “We might be separated in this life for now, but I’ll make sure to keep being reborn to you.” She whispered, and nuzzled against him…

“I love you…” She whimpered, and planted a long, and heart-felt kiss on his forehead, “So much… father.” She sobbed.

Leyla pulled away to look at his eyes.

Bill’s eyes were wide as he looked into her general direction, before his eyes crinkled in happiness once more.

Perhaps it was true about what they say about dying.

Your life would begin flashing right in front of your eyes, and Bill could only see the happiness he found taking care of Leyla.

Watching Leyla grow.

Teaching her things she needed to know, things she wanted to know.

Seeing her flourish, and take steps towards her dreams.

Seeing her smile, laugh and cry.

Every single thing they did together, whether as mundane as eating their dinner every night, or as exciting as walking down the riverside underneath starry skies…

Seeing her rush towards him, in her childhood, in her teens, and even now as an adult, whenever she’d see him return. It was such unbridled joy that he relished seeing it!

Everything was so much brighter with Leyla. As long as they were together, he knew everything would be alright soon…

But that was the thing, wasn’t it?

Being together would soon be a thing of the past.

He couldn’t leave her sobbing her heart out, without a few words to tide her over as he’d leave her alone for an indefinite amount of time.

‘Please God,’ Bill prayed, ‘Let me say this last thing for her.’

“I…”

Leyla gasped as she hastily wiped her tears, and looked eagerly towards her father. He was speaking!

“I…love…you,” her father’s eyes drifted over to hers, and his lips curled up into a beautiful smile that had Leyla smiling back over to him. “My… daughter.”

Because Bill understood now.

As much as he might have failed her, he was still her father in every sense of the word. He clothed her, fed her, and sheltered her when no one would. He taught her, and helped her grow. He guided her, and although Leyla had been great enough on her own…

They found happiness in each other.

Relief spread throughout him as he said those words to her. And so he breathed in deeply, as his eyes fluttered closed.

When he’d wake up, he’d be back to his peak condition, and Bill would waste no time in buying them both a feast to celebrate being a family. After all, he promised Leyla not to worry about dinner.

They’d have a feast for two soon enough.

And maybe he’d splurge some more, and buy them drinks to last a whole night! Or maybe not…

Leyla’s living for two now, alcohol would be detrimental for their health. Maybe an apple juice instead?

How about peach juice?

Do peach juices exist?

And Bill breathed out with a wide smile…

“I love you… my daughter…” He whispered once more, feeling his entire body lighten up, as the pain eventually left his body.

What an amazing feeling it was.

His daughter, of course she was.

It was his absolute truth, and nothing would change it at all. It would remain to be true, until forever.


Chapter 126







A Day When Everything Is Beautiful






News about Sienna’s fall spread like wildfire throughout the whole city. In no time, numerous flyers and posters were being rained upon the conquered people and posted everywhere in their ruined homes.

The forces for occupation would soon be arriving.

But Leyla could care less about what was happening in front of her. Everything was still like a dream…

No, a nightmare. All she wanted was to wake up.

She was swaying mindlessly as she walked around the corner of a street, absentmindedly blending in amongst the huddling crowd. She caught sight of the poster and found nothing shocking. It was just as she expected to see.

It was a declaration of surrender, urging everyone to comply with the Berg army as peacefully as possible, and they will be provided with shelter. It also contained a set of guidelines to follow as soon as the occupational forces arrived.

Government offices would seize control of the occupying forces, and double as a storage unit for their ammunition and weapons. Communications would also be set up in them. Any retaliation will be met with an equal hostile force, and no one could leave unless they have an authorized pass to do so, which can only be granted by the highest commanding officer in the force.

All around her was a mixture of fear, frustration, and anger. But Leyla still felt so removed from everything…

The war barely entered her mind as something important.

Nothing left was important anymore. So why should she even care if Sienna was still part of Lovita, or Berg? It was all pointless.

She felt herself get pushed around left and right, still mindlessly walking towards the apartment she once shared with her father.


She trudged up the stairs, limbs so heavy, but her mind so far away from reality. She barely remembered when she reached her apartment. She only realized she had already arrived when she found herself seated at an empty dining table for two.

She stared at the seat across from her, the numbing pain in her chest returning, but the tears long dried up in her eyes.

Her father’s funeral had not been too long ago, but it felt like forever since he had gone and left her behind.

She knew she was wide awake, but everything made less sense than it did before. It all still felt so surreal. She couldn’t even find the motivation to do anything every day, but her body would move without her thinking about it.

She felt like a dying plant, desperately being watered every day to bring it back to life…

But nothing was worth living anymore.

Not unless it meant visiting her father by the makeshift cemetery they had ever since his funeral. It was the only thing that could get her out of the house.

Cold air blew into the hole in her apartment, from where a window once was. She should probably have gotten it fixed by now, but she couldn’t find enough care to even bother.

The skies were a lot bluer without the glass. Normally, she would describe this one to be a beautiful day. It was a crisp autumn morning, the rubble cleared from the streets as busy constructions could be heard outside and by the neighbouring rooms…

But everything felt so faded to her.

She was so… lonely.

She didn’t want to be alone again.

“Uncle…” she called out, her voice raspy from the prolonged unused. “Uncle Bill!” She called out again, a lot louder this time, before giggling to herself.

Why was she amused? She didn’t know, she just felt like laughing.

“Uncle Bill!” She called out for again, in a sing-song voice, before laughing by herself again when only silence met her.

Thump… thump… thump…

She could hear familiar footsteps heading towards her in response, and she turned around to look at the closed door to his room, expecting it to open any moment now! She grinned expectantly as she looked at his room.

But nothing came.

Her grin grew stiff on her lips, but there was nothing but silence around her and her apartment. She turned back to look at the table in front of her and began drawing circles with the gathered dust on top of it, absentmindedly humming.

She missed the annoying sounds of the bell tower. If there was such a loud sound like that every hour, she wouldn’t feel this empty inside.

Anything was better, no matter how annoying the sounds would be, than this complete silence deafening her.

She could always leave Lovita. But Leyla found no energy to do so.

Instead, she found herself plopping back into her bed, eyes drawn to the glass-less window in the room. The window was fortunate enough to not get wrecked into a hole, but the glass remnants still littered on the floor.

She’d been extra careful to avoid them.

It was another thing she needed to get fixed but, what was the point?

Ah yes, winter was coming upon them soon.

Leyla blinked owlishly, eyes slowly gazing up on the plain ceiling above her.

Huh, when was the last time she bought groceries? She couldn’t remember. Food must have run out by now too. What did she eat last?

Was it two days ago? She was certain it had been stale bread. She had to force it down her throat, barely able to swallow and taste it.

The familiar pangs of hunger came over her at the thought of food. Still, she found no reason to get up from the bed. By now, most of the people of Sienna had been confused, their lives uprooted so quickly from what they used to know.

Any day now, the occupational forces would be arriving and making the necessary changes to officially declare Sienna as a city of Berg.

Suddenly, she remembered seeing a grocery store on her way back from the cemetery. But it had also been wrecked in the war, so she doubted she could buy food from there. She knew it was irresponsible of her to be starving herself, especially in her condition but it is what it is.

Oh, Uncle Allen.


She remembered Uncle Allen and his family evacuating from Sienna as soon as her father’s funeral had been finished. They were headed straight for the capital before more forces arrived and prevented them from leaving.

He had apologized profusely to Leyla, even asking her to come with them, but Leyla couldn’t find it in herself to flee. And so they bid each other goodbye, with Uncle Allen apologizing once more for having to leave her alone…

But Leyla could not begrudge them for leaving.

He had been kind enough to offer them shelter when they left Arvis, despite having little to no contact with Bill Remmer. Kind enough to get them back on their feet, so there was nothing for him to apologize for.

She didn’t want to burden him further by tagging along. Not when it hadn’t been too long ago since they first met. Additionally, she couldn’t leave her father’s resting place.

Before he left, he did stop by one last time, leaving her substantial rations and supplies she might need in the immediate future. It was all he could do for her after all. One last piece of grace for their short time together.

Uncle Allen couldn’t even look her in the eye when saying goodbye, Leyla couldn’t help but feel terrible about it. So she thanked him for thinking about her, and wished him safer travels.

And just like that, she lost another family in her life.

Eventually she found herself fishing out the supplies he’d left her, grabbing hold onto a bottle of pickled apricot. Amongst the other things he’d left her with was a box of her father’s things, which he managed to salvage from the wreckage of the warehouses.

She couldn’t find it in herself to open it. She didn’t want any more reminders that he was gone.

And so she popped open the bottled glass of pickled apricot and began to eat it messily, her hunger driving out the care for table manners as she gobbled one after another. She didn’t even bother using any utensils, just using her hands to fish each piece out of the container.

Sweet juices dribbled down her chin and arms, and Leyla found herself smiling as she ate the sweet food…

A hand went up to her cheeks, checking to see if she was crying. It was dry, save for the juice remnants now sticking on her cheeks. This could be like crying too, she supposed.

How selfish it was of her, to keep eating like this. But it did nothing to ease the hunger and exhaustion in her body.

How selfish it was of her to still try so hard to survive, when there was nothing worth living for anymore.



Sienna’s defeat came easier than predicted, with the Lovitan Army immediately losing their morale as soon as their fortress had been breached. It was almost as though they were banking on it to hold up the entire defense of the city.

As soon as the Berg Army broke through, they immediately began to retreat further into the city, effectively trapping themselves for slaughter. As soon as a full-scale exchange of fire and explosions took place, everything began to collapse at an immense pace.

More and more forces of the Berg Army filtered through the opening, quickly overwhelming the Lovitan forces defending the line…

And soon enough, even the Mayor of Sienna had immediately waved the white flag. He stood in front of the gate, welcoming them amicably as he could despite the clear despair in his expression.

His people would be guaranteed safety with their surrender after all. Sienna was only just a place. He would surrender Lovitan control to keep them safe, and would follow every order they would be given.

It was the best choice they had with the hand they were dealt with.

Matthias was amongst the commanding officers who rode on top of a military car. His eyes raked critically at the odd-looking city in front of him.

He could see exactly where the bombs from the air strike had been dropped, and how much damage was done to the city, but generally, the city seemed to be calm enough. He even noted how brighter and serene the surroundings were compared to the foggy sunlight in Berg’s cities.

The procession of the Berg Army continued on, slowly traveling across the city to showcase their arrival.

Some soldiers could be seen stopping by the square and immediately enjoying the spoils of war.

One by one each commanding officer stepped down from their vehicles, Matthias following not too far after them. He held loosely his officer cap in one arm during the ride, before putting it back into place as he got out.

He got up last from the stairs, before standing in attention, looking all elegant and pristine in his blue-grey Bergian uniform. So unlike the cruel titles he earned for leading the assaults against the Lovitan army.

How could a cruel man have the face of an angel?

His superiors began their speech, with Matthias instinctively tuning out everything they were saying.

He’s heard it a lot of times before. It was the same speech with every territory they occupied.

It wasn’t anything important to listen to anyway. It didn’t concern him enough.

Sienna was also warmer than he expected. But that was fine.


He achieved his goal a lot faster than he expected, but he found his arrival falling a little bit short in expectation. It was a little disappointing despite the beautiful day outside.

Matthias eventually found himself finally relaxing into his stance. His path had been cleared after all. All that’s left to do, was find his Leyla.

Immediately, his eyes began to rake over the gathered civilians in the square. Faces were all despondent and angry, but Matthias barely bothered to remember them. He flashed them all his practised smile, further alleviating him from the monstrous deeds he’d done in front of these unsuspecting civilians.

Upon noticing his smile, the officers beside him began shuffling in nervousness. But he didn’t mind it one bit. He wasn’t interested in them, but he couldn’t hide his glee at knowing he would finally have his Leyla once more.

Still, it must be so out of place for him to suddenly be smiling, wouldn’t it?

As the speech ended, the crowd began dispersing out as quickly as Matthias expected. He loosely took off his cap once more, before steadily stepping down the stage, with no sign to indicate he was in a rush to get down.

He was still as perfect as ever in appearance. All neat and elegant, even in the eyes who see him as a foe.

The war made him bulk back up to his usual body form. He was no longer thin and hollow, but lithe and stronger. In no time, he made a complete recovery while serving in the war, and even his men were amazed at how quickly he bounced back from his seemingly deadly illness.

“Major!” a random soldier began to call out, halting Matthias in his steps as he waited for his subordinate to catch up, “I found her!” He panted out quickly as soon as he stopped beside him, but the random soldier looked particularly proud of himself.

Something darkened Matthias’ eyes at the news, making the soldier cower slightly as Matthias turned his eyes on him. A cold chill ran down his spine as he met those icy blue eyes.

“I -I,” he began to stutter, but Matthias quickly cut him off.

“Where?” he all but snapped at the soldier as he inquired for her.

The soldier couldn’t help but find himself stammering with his words, sensing an odd urgency with his major.

“I-I’m quite sure I saw her,” he scrambled to take out the portrait of Leyla he’d been given, “Yes, Leyla Lewellin! I-I’m sure this is the one who left Berg, and moved to Sienna last spring!”

He then gave him a piece of paper, with a single address written on it.




Leyla had been back in bed, lying like the dead, before finally rousing herself up by the time noon came around.

She found herself fishing out more supplies from Uncle Allen’s parting gift, this time munching on some hard black bread, and boiled beans. She finished both off with a mug of warm water, mixed with some sugar.

It wasn’t enough to satisfy her hunger, but at least she wasn’t feeling as weak as before.

She went back to her room, looked for a clean pair of clothes, and began to wash up and change. A glance outside at the hole in her wall let her know that the day today was warmer than yesterday had been.

She stepped closer to her missing window, eyes looking down at the street in front of her. It was said that today would be the day the Berg Army would be arriving.

Perhaps it was that, but the streets were quieter than before, further making her loneliness more prominent in the absence of distracting sounds. They had been guaranteed their safety if they surrendered, but understandably, everyone was still apprehensive about their presence and afraid.

Huffing out tiredly at seeing no more movement outside, Leyla hummed to herself again, fetching a clean pair of thick, woollen socks, before putting on some shoes. Knotting the laces on tightly, she got ready to go outside.

The weather was warm, so there was no need for her to wrap a shawl around herself.

She didn’t bother locking the door behind her as she stepped out of her apartment in her new routine of visiting her father.

As soon as she reached the streets, her eyes squinted at how bright the sun was today. She placed a hand up to cover her eyes, and huffed out tiredly as she stood in place.

Should she even bother going out today?

No, Leyla thought after a couple more minutes, she needed to see him.

Being outside was much better than keeping herself locked up in silence all day in her empty apartment. It frightened her how alone she truly was without her father. At least in the streets, she could keep her mind more preoccupied.

The noises in the street outside her apartment usually gave her a small respite, but today there was none of that. Everyone was too preoccupied with the arrival of the occupational forces. It was too stifling to stay inside any further.

She’d be better off outside in the heat of the sun.


She hugged herself around her abdomen, trying to recall what her favourite things had been before. She couldn’t help but laugh mirthlessly as one by one, each favourite thing returned to her.

She lost them all in a blink of an eye.

Leyla began to chuckle, holding a hand up against her mouth to prevent herself from being too loud! As soon as her laughter began to die down, it was only then Leyla noticed a second pair of shadows following hers on the ground.

Leyla stared at it for a moment, before looking up ahead of her. Judging by his silhouette, it was an officer, slowly trailing behind her.

And then he stopped, eventually disappearing from behind her. Once again, Leyla found herself alone.

Leyla stopped as well and looked behind her, seeing not a trace of the officer. She tilted her head in wonder.

Did she miss the announcement of a curfew?

Something other than numbness entered Leyla’s body once more. She couldn’t feel anything else but emptiness since her father’s death.

It was fear, but she couldn’t fathom why. And then she spotted him, just off a distance.

It was the officer who’d been following her. She couldn’t see his face clearly, but she could feel his eyes on her. He stood eerily still and made Leyla uncomfortable despite the distance between them.

She could feel her heart beating loudly against her chest.

This feeling…

This trepidation…

It was so…

Familiar.

‘No,’ Leyla thought, feeling her breath leave her the more she watched the unknown officer in return. ‘It’s impossible…’

She was only paranoid. Of course, it was a ridiculous paranoia she conjured up after being alone for so long!

The longer she stared, the longer her memories began to warp around his form and unclear face…

Her past melded along with her present. Falsely making him familiar to her. But Leyla refused to entertain more of this line of thought.

It was simply ridiculous of her to even think about it again!

She hastily turned around, unwilling to entertain more of her bad thoughts. She didn’t want to know who that officer was. She needed to leave quickly, and be done with what she needed to do.

As soon as she began walking once more…

The officer moved with her as well.














Chapter 127







Like A Child or A Devil






He couldn’t find it in himself to hurry up. In fact, he was perfectly content to keep watching over her from afar.

As soon as the officer gave him her address, he couldn’t help the fast beating in his heart.

At last! He finally has her again!

He felt like he was about to burst into complete happiness. But eventually, he needed to calm down. He had a reputation to uphold, also, it was imperative he keeps a calm mind.

And so without further adieu, he went to the address, and as soon as he saw her, he immediately recognized her.

She was as beautiful as he remembered. There was no other woman that could ever hold a beauty like hers after all.

She was certainly his Leyla.


And so he followed, before realizing he shouldn’t spook her too soon. He didn’t want her being alerted to his presence too early. He wanted to savour more of her, even if it meant he’d just look at her from afar…

For now.

But then she stopped and turned around to look at him.

Oh, how wonderful. Had she somehow sensed their connection with one another? Surely this was a sign she was meant for him, wasn’t it?

He was just about to call out for her too, to close the distance between them when she abruptly turned away and began to walk away…

Away from him again.

But it was fine, he’ll let this slight insult to him go for a while. She looked quite adorable, scurrying away from him like that. He also needed to prepare a few things too before he’d even begin keeping her safe…

Before he’d wrap his hands around her neck and snap it until it broke.

And so he followed her slowly, quite content in giving her a headstart away from him.

Matthias was in no hurry after all.

It had just been last spring when Matthias was doping himself up with a myriad of sleeping pills despite his good doctor’s advice. He could almost feel himself floating with each step toward her.

What an ecstatic feeling it was!

He watched as she eventually reached the end of an alley, before pausing once more. Matthias paused as well and watched as her body trembled around her, and saw a beautiful stretch of white sands and an emerald sea behind her.

Such a beautiful sight it was.

Leyla, on the other hand, found herself at a loss on what to do. Her feet were frozen in place, and she began to feel faint, but she didn’t want to stop!

She wouldn’t dare look back either!

It was clear to her, by now, she was indeed being followed, despite how calm the officer was in trailing after her.

She had been such an idiot, turning into an alleyway and expecting to find a few people huddling in it, that she could seek shelter with them from the unknown officer shadowing her.


The only thing she could find was a beach, populated by nothing other than the seagulls flying overhead!

Everything was dead empty! Just like the streets.

Why was he even following her? Was he after her because she was disobeying a decree or something!?

If so, he wouldn’t have just stood there when she stopped and had approached her already to give her a reminder or even arrested her for her disobedience.

But he didn’t.

Instead, he kept following her.

And it confused her to no end, making her feel all the more frightened.

Why? Why was he following her?

She wanted to cry in frustration! The trepidation in her made her feel so clammy all over!

He wasn’t even running after her. He was just walking. And it unnerved her to no end at all. Why was he just walking if he was following her?

There was no way, and an army man like him didn’t have the speed and strength to catch up to her and capture her already. She couldn’t even run properly! Her foot was still healing from the last air raid they had!

Could it be-?

‘No!’ She scolded herself again.

It wasn’t that! She refused to believe it!

But the unsettling feeling was still there.

This wasn’t even the first time her mind had played tricks on her! Ever since they escaped from Arvis, reality and illusion mixed and matched around her from time to time. There was no doubt in her that the latest events in her life made it worse for her!

This was just like that. She was only imagining things again!

But why did it feel so real? Why did it feel like something really was following her!?

Surely it was just a mistake, wasn’t it?

Everyone’s gut feeling usually makes mistakes. This was just like that.

She chanced a glance behind her, and immediately caught sight of a tall, dark-haired man…


‘Duke!’ her mind screamed, and her heart dropped before she turned back to the beach, and began to walk further away from the illusion once more, ignoring the way her body shook at the mere thought of him.

She eventually reached the wet sand, hearing the soft waves crashing into the shore. The sand crunched beneath her shoes, and she found herself with nowhere to hide.

Unless she’d rather brave the open sea than look behind her.

She watched as the waves bubbled up in the sand, retreating back and forth beneath her. It calmed her down somewhat, watching this rhythmic motion. She might not be able to run anymore, but perhaps she can wake up from this realistic dream.

It was time for her to open her eyes once more.

She closed her eyes, and breathed in deeply, trying to bask in the sea breeze and warm sunlight around her. She quickly made a short prayer, before turning slowly around, to face her fears, and see it to be nothing but an illusion.

She had been prepared to see nothing. Even prepared to see a complete stranger, ready to arrest her. But now that he stopped close enough to be seen clearly…

It was undeniable now.

It wasn’t a dream, not even an illusion as she watched his familiar face look brightly onto her as the autumn sun framed his form majestically in front of her.

Matthias von Herhardt.

It was really him.

And all of a sudden, her reality turned into a nightmare.








Matthias was barely listening to the sounds of waves crashing behind her, his mind too preoccupied by the lovely woman in front of him.

Ever since she turned around, neither of them felt the need to break the stillness between them. He was quite content to look at her and drink in her presence in front of him after so long!


He watched as the wind whipped around them haphazardly, spraying a few grains of sand over their clothes every now and then. It was a cool sea breeze, framing their bodies, further making Leyla look so enticing to him.

The hem of Matthias’ trench coat fluttered towards Leyla, making a physical connection between them.

He loved it.

Seeing her in the flesh. She was still as beautiful as ever, but he never doubted her to remain so. Her golden locks still whipped around her beautiful face ever so beautifully, like the soft fluttering of wings of a canary!

Her green eyes, still glistening so brightly in the daylight.

His eyes began skimming down her body intensely, before stopping at the only change he could see on her.

Her body, which used to be shapely and slender, was no longer just that. She was significantly thinner than before, her bones protruding sharply when he last saw her…

And in place of her slender stomach…

Was now bulging and round.

His eyes narrowed at the sight of it. Eyes solely trailed on her stomach, the wind around them whipped faster than before.

Leyla shivered under his gaze, arms unconsciously coming up to hug herself, and in a poor attempt to hide her stomach from his view.

She looked beautiful with her stomach all swollen like that.

And then Matthias grinned at her, his eyes twinkling in glee before he barked out a laugh at seeing her squirm in front of him.

There was no one else she could run! He truly has her now.

Yes, his mind was so clear right now. It was almost like he’d been waiting to wake up to see and savour this moment.

He’d gone willingly into a place of madness, into war and participated freely and eagerly to reach this moment! Time with her never existed. Everything was so still and serene when it was just the two of them.

And now he was out of the waters he’d long been subdued in.

Ever since he had almost drowned in the Schulter River, everything had been so…

Muddled.

But now, everything has returned to its vibrant hues! He could almost describe the sun above them as sparkling, but not more than Leyla was. Even the foreign sights before him were utter masterpieces.

And he could finally hear the birds singing around them once more.

Leyla. Matthias smiled so widely.

Finally, his little bird had been returned to him.

And so he straightened up, mind clear as day at what he needed to do. Leyla’s eyes shook and watered as she watched his stance change from a relaxed pose, to an elegant posture with purpose.

But his eyes held a dark glint in them that did not match the serenity he was trying to show her.

She felt her mouth go dry with every step he took toward her, her breathing falling short with every huff. Her body shook at the prospect of being in his arms once more!

Her stomach was churning uncomfortably. What was he planning to do to her?!

Instinctively, her arms wrapped around her swollen belly tighter.

He looked as beautiful as before, far from the nightmare he truly was, but she couldn’t help but feel so overwhelmed by his presence. Especially now he stood in front of her, with nothing preventing them from being together again.

“Hello Leyla.”

Matthias smiled genuinely at her, a malicious glint ever so present in his eyes as he watched her cower further in front of him. He couldn’t help but laugh in unbridled happiness once more!

From anyone else, his laughter sounded as innocent and pure as a child’s.

But in Leyla’s ears, they sound a lot more like the devil’s.








“Should I have stopped him?” a random soldier murmured to himself, “I heard she was quite pregnant too.” He fretted worriedly as he kept pacing back and forth in the safety of his barracks.

He couldn’t help but quake in fear at the gravity of what he’d just done!

“You didn’t know what he would do.”


“Yeah, and even if you did, how are you going to stop him? March into the Major’s tent and rescue the damsel?”

“That doesn’t mean I don’t have to do anything!” exclaimed the young soldier, resuming his pacing while his brothers-in-arms listened to his worries.

“Goodness, what situation have we gotten into.” grumbled another of his brother-in-arms.

“I don’t know, okay?!” blew up the pacing soldier, “I don’t know!”

He felt like sobbing.

He had been just given an order, by Major Herhardt himself. It had been a simple task, and he’d been desperate to please his commanding officer and eagerly took the assignment with no further questions.

After all, good soldiers follow orders, not question them.

And so he did as he was ordered, and managed to gather information on the woman he was asked to look for. He even secured her address and gave it without a second thought to his major. All this time, he thought it had been a distant relative the Major had, someone he wanted to check up on!

But lo and behold, terrible rumours began spreading like wildfire around the camp as soon as the Major took his leave with the flimsy piece of paper he’d written the address on!

The Major had kidnapped a woman!

Everyone brushed it off at first.

The Major? Creating a scandal amidst a war? Surely not, it was not in his character after all! He might have been brutal during the execution of their orders, but surely he wouldn’t dare harm a civilian!

He had a respectable reputation after all. And he hardly seemed interested in anything, much less in women in the short time they’ve spent under his command!

But eyewitnesses begged otherwise. They’d seen him in broad daylight whisking away a pregnant woman in his arms, before leading her into his establishment!

He’d been seen, arms full of a protesting woman, walking with no care by the square, before entering the current hotel, which had been turned into a makeshift quarters for all commanding officers.

Several witnesses, both Lovitan civilians, and Bergian soldiers would swear to see the same thing. But the Major had been unbothered by the wandering eyes towards them, arms still held on tightly onto the struggling woman he’d wrapped up in his trench coat.

She looked soaking wet beneath the huge coat on her.


At first, they thought it had been a child he’d randomly stumbled upon. She looked rather small in frame, all covered up. But those closer to witnessing him carry off the person could swear it was a full-grown woman and a pregnant one at that!

What could he even want with a pregnant woman?

No one knew. They all stood by and watched as both people disappeared into his room, and hadn’t emerged ever since.

The soldier couldn’t help but be riddled with guilt. The woman had been struggling greatly in the Major’s arms after all. And he’d been the one instrumental to let it happen!

He couldn’t turn a blind eye to it. He needed to rectify his misdeed and confront the Major into releasing her!

This wasn’t right.

He’d tried to intercept him as he’d encountered the Major as he’d arrived, but the cold glare he got made him cower in fear.

“Get out of my way.” That had been his order, and like a coward, he did as he was told. And the Major wasted no time brushing past him, the protests still loud against the soldier’s ears as he squeezed his eyes shut in shame.

The door to the Major’s room was slammed shut, and locked from outsiders. It was the last thing he knew before he found himself fretting back to his barracks in guilt and worry.

He had an inkling feeling about what could happen behind closed doors, especially in a war. But he didn’t want to think his commanding officer could ever do such a thing!

He was the epitome of honour and grace. There’s no way he would do it.

“Should I get someone with a higher rank than him?” he asked no one in particular and someone scoffed.

“Oh yeah, and what do you think they’ll do?” they shot back at him, “It’s Herhardt, you fool.”

“Yeah, ranks among the army mean nothing when you’re an aristocrat.” Agreed another.

A blanket of despair settled over them as the conversation grew silent in their deep thoughts.

“Argh!” shouted out in frustration by the soldier as he struggled to not make more of a commotion, “I don’t understand it! He never showed any interest in any girls we’ve encountered before! Why go overboard now!?”

Curious about what all the fuss was about, Medical Officer Etman entered the barracks. Everyone stopped and turned at the newcomer.


Kyle had been rather busy going here and about the entire camp, doing his duty and assisting wherever he was called to. As such, he was once again late to the news about the current scandal in the camp.

“What is it? Are you hurt?” Kyle immediately inquired, and everyone eyed him nervously, before another soldier immediately piped up.

“Hey, don’t you know Major Herhardt well?” they immediately asked, and Kyle couldn’t help but feel his entire mood sour at the mention of the Duke.

To be honest, he’d been doing well lately in ignoring the fact he’s in the same area as the Duke. It helped when he’d been quick to volunteer to assist in places he knew would take him as far away as possible from the Duke.

“I don’t know if I know him as well as I should.” Kyle remarked dryly, “What is this all about?” He asked anyway, his curiosity getting the better of him. “What is it?”

He asked again, noting the nervous glances that were being exchanged.

“Did something go wrong?”

“Well,” started the soldier right across from him, “We were wondering if he’d always been like that.”

“What?” Kyle frowned in confusion, “Like what?”

“You know, someone who likes kidnapping pregnant women and dragging them kicking and screaming into their room, that sort of thing?” piped up another in a nonchalant manner.

Kyle felt his stomach drop at the sudden question.

“What?” he couldn’t help but ask in disbelief. “What nonsense are you talking about!?” He asked, louder than before, looking around the soldiers in urgent inquiry.

One of the soldiers scratched their head awkwardly .

“I’m guessing this is unusual for him then, seeing as you’re so surprised by the news.”

“What?” Kyle asked again, looking around, so lost in what happened in his absence.

This time it was the guilty soldier who piped up.

“Oh it really is all my fault!” He fretted, “If I’d known this would happen, I wouldn’t have done it! Oh this is absolutely terrible!”

“What are you on about?!” Kyle frowned at him, “What did you do?”

The soldier fidgeted with his fingers, before sighing out.

“It happened as soon as we headed into Sienna,” he began…


The Major had randomly pulled him aside, and gave him a woman’s name, alongside with a picture of her to help aid his search. He was tasked to get her whereabouts, and like a people pleaser he was, he went and did so eagerly!

It didn’t even register to him how odd the whole order was!

Something unsettling was churning in Kyle’s gut the more he listened to his story.

“The woman,” he interrupted him mid-tirade, “Do you remember her name?”

“What?”

“The woman the Major asked you to find!” Kyle snapped, and grabbed him by the shoulders, “Do you remember her name!?”

“Y-yes of course!” He stammered, “I-I, uh, it was- I think it was Rey, no, uh- May, uh-”

“Leyla?” Kyle asked him, “Was it Leyla Lewellin?”

Everyone’s eyes turned to him wide at the new name they just discovered. The soldier’s eyes widened in recognization, and immediately nodded frantically in confirmation!

“Yes! Yes, that’s the name-!” He yelped all of a sudden when Kyle’s grip on his shoulders tightened up, “Uh… do you, by any chance… know her?” He nervously asked the medic.

Kyle’s head bowed low as his breathing turned slowly ragged. His fingers clenched open and close, flexing occasionally on the soldier’s shoulders.

‘That damn bastard!’ Kyle seethed in his thoughts, ‘I should have known this was why he’d been so eager to be assigned in Sienna!’

All this time, Matthias had been working towards a singular goal. All this time, he used the war as a means to get what he wanted.

He can’t believe Matthias found Leyla. All the more, he can’t believe Leyla had been hiding in Sienna!

“Etman, Etman are you still with us?” concerned voices floated into his ears as Kyle finally looked up at the soldiers huddled around him, “We lost you for a moment there.”

“You absolute piece of shit!” Kyle seethed out loud with gritted teeth, and the soldiers unexpectedly cowered away from the medic.

For some reason, they could tell it wasn’t directed to any of them.

All of a sudden Kyle jumped from his seat and stormed out of the barracks.

With adrenaline and rage pumping in his veins, Kyle wasted no time running towards the Major’s room.


Chapter 128




Time of Heaven And Hell







Silence befell the occupants in the room as soon as the door had been locked shut. Leyla cowered in both fear and silence, curling in on herself in a poor attempt to hide from Matthias’ view, yet he kept looking at her in a funny way.

Shivers wracked through her body, her arms tightening up all the more around her swollen belly.

“W-why are you here?” She asked him softly in a shaky voice.

This wasn’t another of her hallucinations after all. This was the truth. This was real.

Matthias had found her.

This was worse than a nightmare. Only he could ever make that possible. No one else scared her more, nothing else frightened her to the core as deeply as one Matthias von Herhardt.

Her monster had finally caught up to her. And he had come for her.

“Why am I here?” Matthias piped up, giving her a wide grin, “Why? I’m here to kill you, of course.” Matthias smoothly told her, his domineering form blocking the only exit in the room ominously.

Chilling air settled around Leyla upon hearing those words; her body shook worse as they began to weigh heavily on her shoulders as she looked up and saw his happy face looking so serenely at her.

She felt frozen in her spot.

“I told you this before Leyla,” He gently tutted toward her, stalking slowly closer to her huddled form, “I don’t do businesses that would bring me more loss than profit.” He hummed chidingly towards her, with a smirk firmly on his lips.

“You running away proved more troublesome that calculated Leyla,” he sighed, looking extremely disappointed in her, “By killing you, I would effectively cut out any more losses I might incur.”

His eyes scanned her frightened expression carefully, before he chuckled softly a few seconds later.

She looked simply adorable, all meek and frightened of him.

He forgot how simply exhilarating it was to see her so weak in front of him.


Leyla watched as his eyes glinted brightly against the dark, his blue eyes appearing more dangerous than before. Leyla found her words caught in her throat as she listened to him chuckling.

The sounds of his laughter were like velvet to her ear, but ice in her heart.

“Ah Leyla, of course when I planned that, I didn’t expect…” his eyes trailed down her face, and towards the poorly hidden belly from his view, “Such a wonderful surprise from you.” He cooed affectionately towards her. “To be honest it still quite baffles me-”

He moved to approach her, when Leyla jumped up and crossed over the bed to place more distance between them!

“Get away from me!” She screeched, “Don’t you dare touch me!”

‘I’m not her anymore!’ Leyla screams at him in her mind.

‘I’m not your mistress anymore!’

If possible, she wrapped her arms more protectively over her stomach.

He watched thin, wiry arms encircle around her belly, absentmindedly thinking how easy it would be just to break them apart. If he were to do that, would he see more of those beautiful tears flow out of her green eyes?

Ah, even now, her eyes glistened so beautifully like that last time he saw them before she escaped from him.

“Hush Leyla,” Matthias smiled at her, “Don’t shout so loudly now, you’ll disturb the others.” He continued to coo at her, swiftly crossing the distance between them in a few, long strides.

Leyla was backed up against the wall, and in no time he was framing an arm beside her to cut off her escape, while another cupped her cheek insistently.

Once more, she slapped it away, frustration building up in her instead of the usual fear.

“It’s not yours!” She hissed at him, pushing against his broad chest to keep him away from her. Matthias laughed at her poorly formed lie.

“Is it really?” He asked her lightheartedly, and kept leaning into her, effectively ignoring her feeble attempts to distance herself.

“Yes!” She exclaimed in panic, “I found a husband, and we’ve married shortly after finding each other here!” She proclaimed and Matthias tilted his head at her in intense regard.

She met his gaze with an equal fiery look, and his lips curled up into an impressed smirk.

She just got all the more amusing. He can’t wait to see how far he can push her now.

“Okay,” Matthias hummed, finally pulling away from her, much to Leyla’s confusion.

She watched as he turned around to turn on the lamp on the bedside table right next to the sofa in the room. It bathed the room in a soft orange glow, revealing the curtains to still be drawn, and left the room still dimly lit up.

He turned toward her once more, and Leyla wanted to shrink further in on herself, as he gently steered her towards the sofa. Leyla sunk further into the backrest, wishing for this nightmare to end.

But there was nowhere else to run.

Matthias breathed in deeply, meditating shortly as he closed his eyes, before looking down on his Leyla.

Her eyes were red from the kicking and screaming, the tears long dried up on her cheeks. Her body was still trembling, whether from the wetness or fear of him, it didn’t matter.

This was a woman who did a poor job in a children’s play.

And yet it was with those same eyes, she managed to deceive him.

He smiled encouragingly at her, his hands hidden behind his back.

“Tell me Leyla, what’s his name?” He asked her gently, “This… husband of yours.”

Leyla’s eyes shifted nervously towards him and then around. A pinkish tongue darted out of her lips nervously as she wetted them, before pursuing them together in a thin line, unwilling to give him more of a response.

Matthias knelt down in front of her, placing himself firmly between her legs as he scooted closer. Leyla flinched at his sudden proximity but gentle, calloused palms gripped her chin firmly, bringing her closer to him.

“I want you to think long… and hard about your answer,” Matthias whispered to her, before a click was heard in the silence. She watched as Matthias swept his other hand through his hair, and let out an involuntary whimper…

Matthias smirked at her, before displaying his pistol on the bedside table beside them.

“Whoever he is, I will kill them too.” He hummed with a pleasant smile.

Leyla tried avoiding his eyes, but he kept her firmly facing him, before his touch turned soft once more, caressing her face gently.

“It’s not your child!” she yelled at him, “It’s mine alone! Mine!” She exclaimed loudly, “There is no father! It’s entirely mine!”

“Oh?” Matthias chuckled amusedly at her declarations.

“It’s mine! There is no father! Mine alone!”

The wider Matthias’ grin grew, the loudly Leyla protested it to be hers alone, and no father was ever involved in its creation.

“What an odd woman you truly are,” Matthias praised as soon as she stopped her proclamations, “Leyla, are you saying you’re a holy maiden? Pregnant alone by a god’s will?” He smiled amusedly towards her.

Leyla watched him warily, the curiosity in her wondering what was going through his mind.

“I suppose it could be considered that as well,” he murmured softly before cupping her cheeks tenderly, his grin widening as she flinched under his touch, “What a great honor it is, to be your god.”

And Matthias’ shoulder shook as he began to laugh softly in great happiness.

Despite how soft and caring he was towards her right now, his eyes still held a cold, malicious glint in them as he continued to keep his eyes on Leyla.

Her attempts were futile. Nothing could hide from him the truth of what really was. Despite Leyla’s persistent protests, he knew she was his. They both were.

Including his child in her belly.

He resumed caressing Leyla’s face before his hands stilled around her face. He sighed eyes, trailed on her face.

Leyla met his gaze, body trembling as the pressure of his hold on her gradually grew in pressure. She let out a gasp once she realized his hold on her was gradually becoming tighter.

“Leyla,” he sighed out, and her hand shot up to grip him on his wrists. Trembling fingers feebly prevented his hold on crushing her.

Ignoring her, Matthias held her jaw in one hand, while the other hand busied itself caressing every curve and slope on Leyla’s face. The cute swoop of her button nose, the plump trembling lips, ample cheeks all flushed in front of him…

The familiar motions he had caressing her face gave Leyla some somersaults in her gut, a warm sensation pooling in the pit of her stomach with every caress. Her trembling eyes eventually relaxed, as she turned enraptured in his gaze.

Just as Matthias thought progress had been made between them, a sudden commotion came right outside his bedroom, and he narrowed his gaze in the direction of his locked door.

“LEYLA! LEYLA, ARE YOU IN THERE!?”


A familiar voice filtered through the door. Despite it being muffled, Leyla at once recognized the voice, her body filling with a warmth she wanted nothing more than to sink into.

There was banging against Matthias’ rooms, and more other voices, but Leyla latched onto that one voice…

“Kyle…” she murmured softly, wide eyes now trailed on the door. “Kyle, is it really-?”

Why was he here? Had he been conscripted in the war too!? Was he alright? Was he injured? Did he partake in the war, take up arms and use it against the Lovitan army?

“Stop.” Matthias snapped, something ugly in him rearing up at her loss of attention on him.

His grip on her jaw tightened, as he forcibly turned her eyes back on him.

Always, always it was Kyle.

KYLE, KYLE, KYLE….

It grated on Matthias’ nerves how he had to try so hard to get her to see him, and yet one move from such a lowly person, someone far beneath his status and influence could garner hers so easily!

When will he be worthy enough in her eyes to pay attention to instead?

He wasn’t just anyone vying for her attention. He was someone who could be deemed as the emperor’s equal, thanks to the generation of Herhardts before him. And yet in front of her, nothing was worth it.

In every way, she kept humiliating him, refusing to give him the time he deserved from her.

Then and now, she always was like this.

“Leyla, oh my Leyla,” he sighed wistfully pressing their foreheads together, “Don’t do that, again. Do that again, and I won’t promise to hold back anymore.” He pulled away and touched her lips with his hands…

“If you dare utter his name again,” he eyed her carefully, eyes turning dark as his gaze dropped to her lips, “If even a whisper of his name is out your lips, and I might just put a bullet through his head this time.”

Leyla gasped, her grip on his wrists tightening up as she frantically began to shake her head in protest.

“So for his sake,” Matthias groaned, pressing their foreheads together once more, a hand cupping the back of her head to keep them connected as he leaned against her hard, “Don’t ever say his name in my presence again.”

Leyla paled in front of him, Matthias’ coldly holding her trembling gaze. But he was dead serious.

He wasn’t one to make idle threats after all. And Leyla knew that best of all.


Her body trembles grew worse, but eventually she nodded shakily at him, wordlessly accepting his condition. Matthias hummed contentedly at her, nuzzling her affectionately before pulling away.

Gentle hands carded through her tangled locks, much like he was praising an obedient kid. Her breath hitched upon the motion.

She hated how such a touch from a cruel man gave her a small sense of comfort.

And then he stopped patting her on the hand, and swiftly turned on his heels, leaving Leyla to sink back down on the sofa, curling her legs up to her chest as best as she could. She watched Matthias approach the commotion by the door and turned her head away.








“Private Etman, cease this at once!” barked a nearby commanding officer, as a couple of other soldiers tried to pull the young medic away from the Major’s door.

But Kyle could care less how he was violating every chain of command in the army. His vision tunnelled only into the locked door in front of him, demanding loudly and wildly for an audience with its occupants!

“LEYLA!” he screamed through the door, head angling against it to listen into what was happening in the room, “YOU SON OF A BITCH! WHAT ARE YOU DOING TO HER!?” Kyle screamed, fists pounding against the sturdy door.

“PRIVATE!”

Hands scrambled to pull him away, but Kyle yanked himself back, firmly plastered against the door!

“LET GO OF ME! LEYLA!”

A sudden click echoed in front of them, and everyone, including Kyle, stilled. The door was now unlocked.

They watched with bated breaths as the knob twisted open, to reveal Major Herhardt.

Cold eyes scanned the entourage that had formed in front of his room, before Matthias’ eyes landed on a seething Kyle Etman to the very front of everyone.

Wordlessly, Matthias stepped outside, and closed the door back shut behind him. He watched as Kyle’s body began to tremble, but unlike his Leyla, whose body trembled with fear of him, this was pure, unbridled anger.


Suddenly, Kyle lunged at him, hands fisting on his color, as the others scrambled to pull him away from the Major.

Matthias was smirking subtly, at him, completely hidden from everyone else in the hallway.

“Where is she, you bastard!? Did you kidnap her, huh!?” Kyle accused him openly.

“Private Etman, this is entirely unbefitting of someone of your stature! Control yourself this instant!”

“No!” Kyle looked up around Matthias, “LEYLA! LEYLA, I’M HERE!”

“You heard your commander, Etman,” Matthias calmly replied to him, “It’s best you return to your barracks.”

“You asshole!” Kyle continued to seethe at him, “You knew didn’t you? All this time, you knew she was here, and that’s why you wanted to be in charge of this whole thing, didn’t you!?”

Matthias only stared him down, unbothered completely by anything he was saying.

“All this time, pretending you were sick, and then using your power and position to get to her, and now this!” Kyle exclaimed, pointing towards the closed room behind him, “You just go back and treat her like another one of your objects. How dare you do that? Even now, you’re still the same monster as you were.”

The soldiers around them watched with apprehension the exchange between the two men. It was clear to them that Etman felt so strongly about this, but the Major was a picture perfect calm, which also made them believe things weren’t as bad as it was being portrayed…

A click, and then a pistol was trailed against Kyle’s forehead.

“MAJOR!” barked a random soldier in the room, but Kyle held his ground, even as he shook in place at the obvious threat to his life. Soldiers grabbed him in both arms, trying to get him to back off, but Kyle struggled to stay in place.

“You’re very loud, and unruly Private Etman,” Matthias sighed out, before holding an index finger against his lips, “Please do not make any more noise, less you frighten the child.” He told him, taking back everyone in the hallway.

A frown made its way to Kyle’s expression in confusion. Matthias watched it, holding the other’s gaze long enough to send him a smug smirk.

“You’ll frighten my child.” He told the young doctor-to-be.

Matthias watched as the fight in Kyle’s eyes was once more doused in front of him as the realization soon sank into him. Matthias could feel a sense of victory seeing such devastating expression on him a second time.


It was a look of someone who had lost hope. Much like the look he remembered seeing these past few months of both enemies and comrades alike the longer the war took place. But Matthias’ eyes held a spark of triumph, and glee…

Like he only just began to live now.

A hush silence gathered around them as everyone else was taken aback.

With his pistol still trained on Kyle’s forehead, Matthias finally stepped back, watching the fire and life slip out of Kyle’s eyes, who turned dead silent as soon as the revelation had come.

New footfalls came, and Matthias looked to the side and saw some military police finally come. The soldiers stepped to the sides to make way as they watched Private Etman sink to the ground. The police wasted no time in subduing the Private.

They slapped him with charges of insubordination and disrespect of the chain of command. They cuffed him, and dragged him up to his feet and away from everyone gathered in the hallway.

One of them met Matthias’ eyes and nodded respectfully at him before they left dragging Kyle with them.

Everyone in attendance grew still and silent, eyes trailed warily on the Major who was still a picture-perfect calm, and composed soldier. Once both the military police and Kyle were gone from sight, Matthias wasted no time turning on his heels and entering his room.

A shut, and a click…

The door was locked from outsiders once more.

As soon as he entered the room, Leyla stumbled a couple steps back as their eyes met. In her mind she was screaming to demand for Kyle’s well-being, but she bit her lips to keep herself from saying his name.

Her body shook, and eyes watered as she held the Duke’s gaze, unable to voice out her utmost concerns.

Satisfied with being together, and with her keeping her word, Matthias gently approached her, hushing her softly, before pulling her into a warm hug.

She staggered away from him, but Matthias ignored it, simply gathering her up quickly in his arms, and holding her firmly against his chest. He cradled her against his chest, swaying their bodies back and forth in gentle rocking motions.

Having her in his arms really made him feel complete. Almost like the final puzzle piece falling into place.

And he loved it.


All tuckered out of a fight, and finally giving into his wishes, Matthias gently steered her towards his bed, laying her on the center, before kneeling at her feet.

In no time, practiced hands slipped her wet socks and shoes off her tired feet. His calloused hands cradled her feet, lightly assessing the damage it accrued over their time apart with a slight hum, before gently placing them on the bed.

She’d been ready to drown in the sea just to escape him. Luckily Matthias could predict her every movement and managed to grab her just in the nick of time before she grew wetter than she already was.

Such a beautiful woman. It was truly a shame she hated him so much.

Both happiness and pain surged in him at the sight of her, with a dash of both disillusionment and joy once he held her in his arms again.

She was still stubbornly quiet, teeth digging into her lips. Matthias reached out, and lightly brushed a thumb on her plump lips. She shouldn’t wound such a kissable part of her face. He smiled down on her, watching as her eyes turned glassy.

Hands then trailed down to cup the beautiful stomach carrying their child. And Leyla gasped, and cringed, turning away from him.

Ah, how he really loved her.

He loved her so much, he was prepared to kill her to never lose her again.

Even now, all thin and swollen from their child, she still looked as dazzlingly beautiful as a queen.

What a time for heaven and hell to meet on the same plane indeed.


Chapter 129




Chain




“Come now, stop being stubborn,” Matthias tutted softly once he saw the food prepared for her remain untouched.

Leyla remained unmoving on her spot, eyes refusing to look at him.

“What a selfish woman you truly are, Leyla. Thinking of no one but yourself.” Matthias continued, sighing out in disappointment, before he rose from his seat to approach Leyla.

It had been clear in a short time to Leyla that no amount of resistance from her would ever convince him that having her with him was more of a loss than releasing her. As such, she was resolved to become as lifeless and as boring as a doll towards him instead.

And so she refused to eat, drink, and even talk at all. She moved when he moved her, and stared off into space even as he forced her to look at him.

She would only exist and sleep in his presence.

“Think about our child.” He hummed beside her.

“My child…” Leyla’s raspy voice softly protested. “You’re not the baby’s father… you’ll never be a father.”

It was soft, and raspy, the first time she spoke again since she’d been threatened not to utter Kyle’s name again. It was also a testament to how dry her throat had become when he was not forcing drinks and food down her throat.

It’s only been half a day since they met again, but already it felt like the nightmare was endless with him around.

Despite the continued rejection of his paternity to their child, Matthias ignored her as he busied himself to forking up some food to feed her. Satisfied, he smiled at her as he firmly held up the fork, filled with food, against her lips.

“I’m willing to take full responsibility for you and our child, Leyla.” He hummed softly, “I’m sure you know very well how well I can provide for both of you.”

“I don’t care!” Leyla hissed at him, “It’s my child. It won’t have anything to do with you. So I don’t need your responsibility.” She huffed out, turning her chin away from the food he was holding up for her.


“If you don’t want my responsibility, then how about my will?” Matthias grinned at her when she turned back to glare at him, “After all, aren’t I your god? Isn’t my will supposed to be done?”

He gently placed the fork down her plate, as his hands dropped to take hers in his.

“After all, it was also my will that created this child.” He smiled lovingly at her. He then led her hand towards the plate, curling her fingers on the fork, guiding it as it dug through the delicate meat on her plate.

Satisfied she was partially cooperative once more, the grip on the fork tightening up, Matthias sent her another pleased smile before going back to his own seat to finish his meal.

Leyla stared at him as he leisurely dined across from her. In her indignation, her grip on the fork tightened up, and she threw it down on the floor as she shot up to her feet, dragging some food along with it as it spilled across the floor.

It fell onto the floor with a dull thud. Her eyes burned holes into him with rage. Matthias sighed in disappointment once more, raising his head to meet her gaze before frowning at the spilled food on the floor.

“If you’re going to kill me, then do it!” Leyla demanded, “Don’t sit there and feed me like a pig for slaughter! Just kill me already!”

She heaved as she demanded him to do as he promised, and Matthias let out a despondent sigh, before standing up once more and bent to pick up the fork she threw away. He placed it back on the table, eyes still holding her gaze.

“Oh believe me, I plan to do just that.” He said soothingly towards her, “After all, I’ve turned quite desperate lately.” He mused with a light smile that didn’t really reach his eyes.

“I did plan to do it as soon as I found you but, unexpected surprises came.” Matthias smiled as his gaze dropped to her stomach, “If you were still on your own, you would be dead by now, Leyla. But alas, our child doesn’t deserve to die with you. So you’ll have to live on a little longer, wouldn’t you agree?”

Swiftly, he turned around to leave the room, grabbing the fork in tow. Leyla heard the familiar sound of a lock clicking into place, and knew she’d be unable to leave the room.

She was trapped like a mouse in a puzzle box. She immediately walked away from the table, standing firmly in front of the window and looking outside at the army slowly turning Sienna into part of Berg.

Shortly after he left, he came back, in his hands now a new and clean fork. A shiver went down her spine upon his entrance, ears straining to hear his every movement.

In the reflection of the mirror, she could see him grabbing a steak knife on the table.

“Without you looking at me, I suddenly feel so confident.” Matthias mused to her, and she couldn’t help but shake with rage.


“Get out! Get away from me! Let me out already!” She demanded incessantly, but Matthias let her rage on, before responding in a calm manner.

“Oh Leyla, I thought you were smarter than this.” He hummed, the fork now placed on the table, right next to her still full plate. He now toyed with the steak knife in his hand.

Leyla eyed him warily. He gestured to the bedside table.

“There’s a gun right there, all this time.” He hummed, before clicking his tongue in disappointment at her having missed it.

He eyed her, and the window behind her.

“Do you really plan to go like that?”

“What choice do I have? I don’t plan to go back with you! Never!” She screeched at him, stepping away from the window this time, and putting more distance between them…

“I don’t want to be your mistress! I’ll never return with you!”

Matthias suddenly chuckled, shaking his head, before sighing out. He looked at Leyla for a moment.

“Are you so certain that’s really what I want?” He asked her with a smile. Leyla stilled in place, her brows frowning as she wondered what he was getting at. “Do you really think that I’m the same man as I was? So easily tricked by a mere mistress?”

Leyla’s thoughts drew to blank at his words.

This was different. This man was different.

This wasn’t the Matthias von Herhardt she’d grown to know and observe. This was so different from how she once knew him, and it made her so confused! His eyes landed on her stomach once more.

“Leyla, don’t you know you’re killing the baby?” He hummed thoughtfully, as she clenched her fists on her side. He then chuckled lowly at her, before his eyes turned cold. His fingers balanced the knife between them.

“What do you want from me?” Leyla hissed at him in a whisper, eyes trailed on the ground. She moved again, her back to the window once more, pressing up against it.

Matthias shrugged at her, effectively dropping the knife with a dull thud onto the floor.

“Eat first, then we’ll discuss what I intend to do to you afterwards.” He commanded her with a smile, holding out a hand as he gestured for her to take her seat back on the table like the gentleman he portrayed himself to be.

“After all, I need to feed my child, don’t you?” He asked her with a tilt, and Leyla glared at him with a thinly veiled disgust.

“It’s not your child.” Leyla declared, “No matter how many times you say it, I’ll keep denying it.”

“Leyla,” he sighed out, “I fully understand, and intend to do as I promised to kill you. But it’s quite difficult to do so while my child is still inside you. Rest assured, as soon as it’s out of you, your wishes will be granted.” He smiled at her serenely.

A clink, and he looked down to see the knife on the floor.

He clicked his tongue in slight distaste, lightly kicking the fallen knife away from him, before taking a second knife on the table, and began to cut out her steak for her, himself.

“As such, these are difficult times we have ahead, so eat up.”

“I don’t mean to be rude, but it upsets my stomach to eat food with the likes of you around me.” Leyla huffed out, turning her cheek away from him as he cut up her food for her. The glistening in the corner of her eyes made Matthias bark out a laugh.

He wondered what else he could say.

So indignant, and stubborn, she resembled a spoiled little puppy who had yet to encounter the harshness of the world around it. Ah, but Matthias did not feel too bad about it. He forgot how refreshing it was to witness someone act so blatantly disrespectful of him.

It’s one of the things that made her so interesting to him. Ah, if only she knew it was her stubborn refusal and rejection of him that only drove him further mad about her, then she would have long abandoned such treatment of him.

“Then how about you act?” He dropped down, to whisper it right next to her ear, “You’re good at acting, aren’t you?” He teased her, and Leyla whipped her head around, face flushing in hardly concealed anger at his words!

Matthias then grabbed his cup of water and took a sip from it, soothing his throat.

“To be honest, I was quite amazed at how effectively you managed to pull it off.” He praised her, “Who knew you could act so perfectly like that?” He smirked at her and Leyla shot back to her feet!

“Quiet! You don’t know what I’ve felt going through it!” She exclaimed, clasping both hands around her ears. But Matthias only blinked at her in confusion.

“Why are you so mad? It was a compliment, really.” Matthias pointed out to her, but she only stubbornly shook her head, arms still covering her ears in protest. “After all, it was of your own brilliant acts that our baby had been conceived.”

“It’s mine! Not yours! Never yours!”

“In fact, you were acting so well at being in love with me, perhaps we could call it our love child isn’t it?”

“Stop it!”

“Yes, though you were acting, it was the principle of the acts wasn’t it?”

“I said stop!”

“You were acting you love me, so it was a child made out of love, isn’t it?”

“I said stop it! Stop talking about my baby!”

Matthias grew quiet as he watched Leyla curled into herself, hands still pressed firmly against her ears, eyes squeezed shut in front of him. His long, slender fingers circled the rim of his water glass as he observed her, waiting for her to eventually calm down again.

Tears fell from her eyes, and Leyla began to sniffle and whimper softly in front of him. Matthias chuckled, shaking his head slightly, before dropping down beside her on one knee, lowering himself further to whisper in her ears…

“So act like it again.” He told her.

She acted like she loved him so well because she wanted so badly to run away and escape him, didn’t she?

“Give me another of your world-class acts, because this time, not only your freedom, but your life depends on it as well.” He murmured against her, kissing her lightly against the back of her ear.

“I won’t,” she sniffled, “You can’t make me do anything anymore with your cruel tricks.” Leyla seethed at him, and Matthias quirked up a brow.

“Tricks?” Matthias asked incredulously, before laughing in amusement, “Ah my Leyla, this isn’t any trick, but a mere toleration of your continued existence.” He sighed out.

“Either way, I won’t drink even a single drop of water until you let me free.” She hissed at him, “No matter what you do, or what’s at stake, I won’t do a single thing to prolong my life.”

Even now, he still managed to get underneath her skin, to make her feel like bugs were crawling in her veins. He still had the power to humiliate her completely.

And maybe that will always be true. Because she couldn’t change her past, no matter how hard she tried.

She would always be the woman he’d violated, coerced to be with for the whole of winter and some more to be his lover. For her to be so shamelessly and horribly paraded like his trophy…

There was nothing else he had to hold over for her.


“You should get changed.” Matthias suddenly piped up, interrupting Leyla’s morbid thoughts. He then stood up to his full height. Just as he was about to move away to get her a change of clothes he wanted for her, he paused and turned back to her.

“Did you know that Kyle is currently imprisoned right now?” He casually asked her, and Leyla’s eyes snapped up to him, all wide and full of worry. “Yes, because of you, that I had to take drastic measures.”

“What?” Leyla asked dumbly, before she struggled to rise back to her feet, “Prison? You locked him up in prison? How could you do that!?”

Matthias frowned at her with a slight pout.

“It’s unfair how you’re blaming me for this Leyla,” he reasoned out, “After all, it wasn’t my influence that led him to be insubordinate, and attacking his superior, isn’t it?”

“Liar! It’s your fault!” Leyla shot back at him, tears falling from her eyes and Matthias smirked at her before shrugging.

“Either way, he’s still in jail, and ah,” Matthias suddenly piped up, “Probably starving as well.” He told her with a smile. “So you see, it’s not my fault he got dragged to prison, that’s yours.” He told her.

“But the starvation, that’s my doing.” Matthias smiled at her proudly, before sitting on his chair and leaning back against the backrest to recline himself as he crossed his legs.

“You see I specifically gave them an order to not give him any food yet.” He elaborated for her, “I’m only going to order them to give him as much as you eat after all. So if I don’t see you eat, or drink anything then… neither does Kyle Etman.” He finished off with a smirk in her direction.

Leyla eyed him hatefully, tears flowing freely down her face as she stood before him.

“Are you even human?” She couldn’t help but ask in a soft voice.

First he dangled her father’s freedom in front of her.

Now he dangled Kyle’s health and life above her head once more.

“Always, always, you keep doing this to me…” She whispered to him. Her hands grabbed onto the edge of the table, knuckles turning white with quiet rage. “First Uncle Bill, and now…” she bit her lips, preventing herself from uttering Kyle’s name.

Matthias blinked.

Bill Remmer.

Now that’s a name he hadn’t heard for a while now. And the first he’d heard from Leyla since meeting her again. But Matthias schooled his expression back to indifference, when Leyla slammed her palms over the table, its contents rattling against the sudden impact.


He watched as her body wracked in front of him, before he saw her hands fist the tablecloth’s seams. It wasn’t difficult to predict what she would do next.

In no time, Leyla pulled on the tablecloth, dragging every plate, food and drinks on the table, sliding them off and wasting them all so she won’t be able to eat anything at all! The utensils clattered noisily on the floor, plates and glasses shattering to pieces as they hit solid ground.

She eyed Matthias hatefully as she did so. He could only hum in thought at it.

“Poor Kyle Etman,” He mused out loud before sighing as though he didn’t want to do it, “I guess he’ll be starving then.”

He flicked his napkin to lightly dab on the sauce that splattered on his clothes before he stood up and started to turn away from her. She watched as he went up and out the door, closing it behind him softly.

It was soon followed by a series of sounds of locks and chains clicking into place, before she heard his footfalls begin to fade…

And then cold silence began to keep her company once more.

She sank back down into her plush seat, body shaking with barely contained rage, frustration and fear.

In the warm light of the afternoon sun, Leyla remained alone in the storm she had made around her. She wrapped her arms around her, trying to emulate the way her father used to wrap her safely in his arms and squeezed her eyes shut, hoping to block out the mess she was trapped in.








Sometime later, a soldier on-duty passed by the locked door in the hallway. It had once been the Major’s assigned room, but now, with all the hastily made locks, and chains outside, it might as well be a makeshift prison.

Word on the street was the Major was keeping a pregnant woman inside it. And no one would enter, or leave it, aside from him, and him alone. Whenever the Major left, he’d ensure all the locks were secure and in place.

Ever since he’d arrived in Sienna, he hadn’t been the same aloof Major. Others theorized he’d finally gone mad with the war.

Trepidation began to fill him, as his shaky hands reached out towards the locks, eyes darting left and right to make sure no one was coming.

There were orders issued not to enter. But this time, he’d been ordered to do differently.

“It’s only for a little bit,” he whispered reassuringly to himself, “Yeah, just a small peak.”

Softly undoing every lock and wrap of chains, he slightly cracked open the door to the room, quietly clearing his throat in his nervousness. As soon as he peeked his head in, a woman, who’d been sitting in front of the windows turned around.

His eyes first trailed onto the mess on the floor, looking absolutely aghast at the state of the room.

“This is…” He muttered softly, before locking eyes with the only person in the room. She looked paler than she should have been.

He gulped, his grip on the meager meal he’d brought tightening as she narrowed her eyes towards him critically. He held it out for her, like a peace offering…

“H-here,” he stuttered, “Eat this at least.” He softly offered for her, eyeing her baby bump nervously, “If not for you then your child at least.” He added softly.

When she still eyed him warily, he decided to continue.

“Don’t worry, Major Herhardt doesn’t know I’m here.” He added, as a small consolation. She might have been under the impression he was ordered to give it to her.

He was. But he wasn’t about to say it to her lest she might not eat it some more.

He didn’t understand what this all was for, nor why she was even being detained. The rest of their problems would be solved if the Major would only let this woman go. Either way, there was nothing he could do but follow orders.

“Don’t worry, he doesn’t know I’m here. You won’t get in trouble for eating it.” He encouraged when she still refused to move from her spot, “I promise he doesn’t know.”

Meekly, he placed the food onto the table, backing away slowly.

“I’ll be back in half an hour to get the plates. Eat well then,” he whispered to her as he backed out of the room, grabbing hold of the knob to close the room back up.

His task was done, and the food the Major had ordered to be given to her had been successfully delivered, if not received. She was still looking at his retreat, before her eyes looked down on the silver domed covered meal.

He paused, wondering if perhaps he should stay instead to watch her eat? Or should he just come back later to check up on her instead, like he said?

“Hey…” a soft voice called out to him, and he looked up immediately to see the woman now anxiously fidgeting in front of him.

He made a small, startled noise, before calming himself down.

“Kyle,” she whispered, “Is he really in prison, right now?”

The soldier blinked, before trying to recall the ones recently tossed to prison.

“Kyle, Kyle… oh, Kyle Etman? The medical private?” he inquired further to clarify, and she gave him a terse nod.

“Yes, that’s him.” She confirmed softly, “So… is he really in prison?”

He frowned at the question in confusion, before eventually nodding at her.

“Yeah, he did get tossed into jail recently. Something about insubordination and attacking a commanding officer.”

Silence reigned between them once more, and the soldier squirmed. He didn’t have a good feeling about interacting more with this woman. It was best he left now before he’d inadvertently insult or slight anyone powerful.

“Well, eat up. I’ll be back shortly.” He hastily bid goodbye, before she piped up once more.

“Can you give this to Kyle, instead?”

The soldier paused just as he was about to close the door behind him. He opened it back up to look at her incredulously.

“What?”

“Can you give the meal to him instead?” She asked him again, in her hands now the tray he’d left on her table.

“I, uh…”

So many things could go wrong if he were to give in to the woman’s wishes. Firstly, he’d directly disobey orders, undermining his superior’s authority. He could very well follow Kyle Etman to jail for disobedience as well!

They might even have cells right next to each other!

“I, I don’t know.” He murmured, “I could get in real big trouble if I do that.” He told her apologetically, and watched as her shoulders sagged.

“I, yes, that’s true.” She huffed out in resignation, “I’m sorry for asking you to do it. Thank you though, for the meal.” She told him with a slight smile.

He gave her a terse nod, and softly shut the door on her, quickly replacing and securing the locks back into place.


Before he could close the door though, he watched as she approached the meal, and uncovered it to reveal a piece of sandwich and a can of soda. He couldn’t help but feel slightly affronted by the poor meal he had prepared.

It was a far cry from what he knew the noble officers ate, however, it was impossible to have the meal changed to something more substantial for a woman of her condition instead.

He only hoped she would eat it as soon as he left.










Chapter 130




Tasted Like Heaven







Eventually, Matthias returned once more to the chained room. And once he did, he noted that Leyla was still by the window, looking more tired than before.

The room around her had also grown dark as the sun had finally begun to set for the day. The fire in the room remained unlit.

He locked the door behind him, stalking slowly towards her as he flicked on the lights in the room.

Unexpectedly, she was the one to break the silence before.

“I ate.” She muttered towards him in a defeated manner, just in time for him to finally draw the curtains to a close. He then turned to face her once more.

“A soldier,” she continued, “Brown hair, brought me a sandwich. So I ate that.” She supplied helpfully.

And he hummed, nodding along in disinterest towards her.

“And what of it?”

Leyla made a small affronted noise, before sighing out.

“So, give Ky-him some food too.” Leyla huffed out, the name almost slipping back from her lips.

Matthias stared down at her before chuckling and leaning back against the windows.


She had expected him to see her attempt at something ridiculous, but she still couldn’t help but feel insulted by his nonchalant demeanor.

“I’m not making this up.” She insisted to him, “If you want then you can go and check-”

“I believe you.” Matthias told her, eyes crinkled in delight towards her before sighing out, “Unfortunately, just because you ate something doesn’t mean I’d give him any food.” He hummed out in slight satisfaction.

Leyla’s mouth dropped open in disbelief before she hit her fist on the table.

“You promised me!”

“I did, but eating wasn’t my only condition,” he reiterated, smiling smugly at her, “Don’t you remember?”

“ – if I don’t see you eat, or drink anything then… neither does Kyle Etman.”

Finally, he dropped his smug smile upon seeing Leyla turn speechless and pale at his reminder. Unless he’d seen her eat anything, Kyle won’t be getting any food, even if she did eat without him.

Her body shook once more, as her eyes darkened, trailed solely on the messy floor around them.

“How do you even live with yourself?” she couldn’t help but ask incredulously, “How can you keep being so… so… cold-hearted and cruel!? What does that benefit you!?”

Matthias only kept staring at her blankly.

“Where did the once honorable Duke Herhardt go?” She asked him in a mix of disappointment and disbelief.

Finally, she managed to convince herself to approach him. With shaky steps, she grew bolder, wanting her words to pierce him where she wanted it to hurt.

“Look at you, abandoning your pride in upholding your empire, running away because you grow tired of them,” she scoffed, looking up at him in pure disappointment, “And now here you are, abandoning your newly married wife to play hero in the battlefield.”

Matthias’ lips curled up in a minuscule smile.

“Oh, I don’t know. But is that what you think?” he hummed curiously towards her. He reached up to remove his hat, placing it gently on the swiped clean table.

He couldn’t find it in himself to even be angry at her. Far from it, he found it difficult not to feel so relaxed and amused with her nearby.

Leyla looked at him as though he was crazy, and maybe he was.


Their time apart had made her forget how he truly was to her. He was someone whom she hated with every fiber of he being, and will continue to keep on hating and hating and hating until—

“What are you thinking of doing to me?” She asked him instead, “What are you planning to do? Are you just going to keep teasing me like this? Torture me as revenge for daring to escape you?!”

She stepped back, hands cradling her belly gently as she looked at him.

“You’re so eager to tie me down to you, but did you ever stop to consider whether you deserve to even have this?” She asked him hatefully, “Did you ask yourself whether you’re worthy or not to be a father?”

When Matthias remained silent, she scoffed at him, and hugged her arms around her belly.

“And that’s why this child will never be yours.” She spat at him, “You don’t even deserve to mention my child at all.”

She turned away from him as soon as she felt tears threatening to spill from her eyes.

“So I don’t care, in my life and in my child’s, you do not even exist.” She declared to him, “So don’t bother taking responsibility. I’d rather you let me go, and for you to go back home to your Duchess!”

‘Don’t cry.’ Leyla scolded herself once more, ‘He doesn’t deserve your tears.’

She knew she shouldn’t expect anything from him. And she resolved herself to never do it.

She’d long made up her mind that nothing would of that fact. This decision of hers had been long in the making, cemented firmly as soon as she’d been reunited with Matthias.

But she was also so… terrified.

Something in her heart was skipping indecipherably, that she couldn’t help but look forward to what his plans were. And she couldn’t stand it, always raising her expectations of him, just for him to trample it down so carelessly as if she mattered next to nothing!

“Think about this in a logical way then Leyla,” Matthias remarked back at her, “What can a woman of your stature even do in a time of war? How could you even raise that kid by yourself?” He asked her, the cold, amused glint in his eyes long gone, now replaced with cold seriousness.

“We’ll do just fine, no thanks to you!” she retorted back at him, “A war’s compared to nothing next to living with you!”

His hands shot out to grip her tightly by the shoulders, making Leyla gasp half in surprise and the rest in complete fright!

“L-let go!”

“Leyla Lewellin.” Matthias growled at her.


“Keep your dirty hands off me!” She screamed, slapping his hands away before bodily freeing herself from him.

Matthias stared at her, then to his hands, and then back. He then laughed at her.

“My hand, you think,” he chuckled in disbelief, “You think my hand is dirty?”

“Yes!” she exclaimed, “There’s no way it isn’t!”

She wrapped her hands around herself, rubbing her arms furiously as though to physically rub his scorching touch off of her.

“I hate it! I hate it! I hate you!”

Leyla’s muffled screams of hate for him could be heard out in the empty hallway. Shouting with all her might how it’s always made her body crawl whenever he touched her, and it will keep making her feel so disgusted with herself forever and ever.

“Are you finally satisfied with my answer?” She asked him, panting heavily, to a silent Matthias after her enormous tirade.







“Kyle! Hey, Kyle Etman!”

His name echoed in the rubble walls of his makeshift prison. As soon as he’d been dragged away from the major, he was lumped into a solitary prison, beneath the basement of the hotel, which also doubled as a warehouse.

Kyle was currently leaning against the rough, cold stone behind him. His eyes trained solely on the tips of his shoes, but did not really see anything. His mind was leagues away from his prison, but now he’d been brought back with a call of his name.

When he looked up, he saw the familiar face of his military doctor supervisor behind bars.

“L-Lieutenant!” Kyle stuttered, scrambling to get up, wincing when he realized his legs had grown numb in his immobility. He staggered closer to the bars, “Why, I don’t, here?” he huffed out tiredly.

The doctor merely looked at him somberly and sighed.

“I’m here because I grew worried about you.” The doctor sighed deeply, gesturing for Kyle to sit back down, before lowering himself as well. Off at the corner of Kyle’s prison cell, was an untouched meal.

The meal was barely substantial, but it was what was given as a standard to anyone then as prisoners.


“You should still be eating, even in prison.” He told Kyle, “It’s times like this you need to keep your strength up. You don’t want to make things worse for yourself Kyle. Think about your health.”

“The duke’s — no, the woman the major took back to his room,” Kyle asked instead, “Is she alright? Did they release her?”

The doctor blinked at him unsurely.

“I, Etman,” the doctor sighed, before shaking his head in response, “No, as far as everyone knows, she’s still with the Major.”

The doctor pursed his lips thoughtfully, before continuing.

“He’s had her locked up in his room, the door barred and locked from the outside to prevent her from leaving.”

Kyle scoffed at the information, half expecting the outcome, while the other half was still in disbelief at the audacity the Duke had in handling Leyla like a pet.

She was a person. And he kept treating her like less than one.

“He really is a crazy guy.” Kyle grumbled.

“Stop that Kyle,” the doctor chided him, “We’re in a battlefield. Whatever your personal differences are with the Major, let it go! He’s still your superior.” He reminded him, “So eat up, and then bow your head in apology to him, and then you’ll get released from this poor cell.”

The advice was well-meaning, and made out of concern for him, Kyle knew. But his heart and mind were in complete agreement that he wouldn’t ever apologize to the Major.

“No.” Kyle declared, “I won’t bow my head to apologize to that kind of man. Never.”

“I don’t understand you Kyle, you’re usually very level-headed.” The doctor sighed out in frustration, throwing his hands up in the air before looking back at the imprisoned young medic.

“Who is she even to you Kyle, huh?” he asked him, “Why are you so adamant to go against the Major for her?”

He’d heard the rumors through the grapevine. Kyle Etman had up and attacked the Major out of nowhere, demanding the release of the woman, and was ready to be killed for it. Apparently the Major had held up a gun to his head before the authorities arrived to haul him away.

But the Duke was well-known to be a respectable man back in the empire. He was the best aristocrat, second only to the members of the royal family. Kyle was the son of his family’s doctor. One would assume the two would be close but alas…

A woman stood between them.


It was a scandal sure to grab the attention of anyone who’d caught wind of it. But none of the concerned parties would budge, nor indulge in any information about the entire situation, as such, theories about the three only grew wilder with every silence they kept.

Kyle was tight-lipped as ever, much like the Major. Both refused to shed even a little light over what’s really been happening aside from what’s already been witnessed.

“Still, you should at least eat.” the doctor sighed out in resignation, “You understand me, Kyle?” he reminded, but received only further silence.

As the younger medic’s stubbornness won out, the doctor finally got up, patting the bars slightly like it was Kyle’s shoulder before eventually leaving the young man back to his thoughts.

His shadow grew with every distance growing between them on top of the cooled dinner by the corner. When the doctor looked back to see if Kyle had heeded his words…

He was still in the same spot as he had left him.








Matthias remained in his silence as he regarded Leyla. He showed no indication as to what his thoughts truly were despite Leyla repeatedly and earnestly disrespecting and insulting him right in his face.

As soon as she was done spouting filth about him, he took a step towards her.

Leyla’s hands fisted around her skirt, squeezing them tightly between her palms, but remained resolutely in place. She was done cowering.

And then her mind flashed back to Claudine.

She tried to shake the feeling and memory away, but she remained persistent in the forefront of her mind.

She could still remember, as clear as day, the humiliation and shame she felt upon her revelations. How she knew all this time, what had been happening behind her back!

It made Leyla feel more miserable and dirty, especially so when she knew she couldn’t deny a single accusation thrown at her.

She thought she’d forgotten everything that’s happened by now.

But what a fool she’d been.


She had known that when she left, the wedding of the two of them had been fast approaching. There was no doubt in her mind that they were finally married by now. It had been set to be around late Spring to early Summer after all.

It was also around the same time she began to experience sudden bouts of morning sickness, leaving her all exhausted and in pain right afterwards.

She remembered heaving whatever contents were left in her stomach over the toilet, and when finished she would sit limply on the stone, cold tiles on the bathroom floor. If she’d be at work at the time, she’d hide away in the corner of the museum’s warehouse.

She had been desperate to not be found out that she was pregnant.

As the bump grew, so did the sorrow in her heart. Nothing could erase the ache in her heart. It could be numbed temporarily, like when she’d eat what she wanted, or when she passed by a newly wedded couple cradling a baby to their breast…

But it remained persistently constant.

And then the war came, and that sorrow for her growing child took a backburner, replaced only with the terrible fear of the war right in their doorsteps. Everyday she would rub a hand over the growing bump…

‘We’d be okay.’

Words she’d whisper or think about to her child.

The Duchess, she knew, had no doubt been showered with praises and well-wishes on her wedding day.

Someday soon, she too would raise her own children.

Visions of how the duchess’ children would grow to be made Leyla feel like something was squeezing out of her chest. A whisper of how her child could grow up to be, bringing sweet temptation into her thoughts…

But she shooed it away fervently.

‘I’ll love you twice as much,’ she thought. So they will be okay.

She’d endured worse days before. She can endure them again in the future.

All she knew was that she never wanted to be in the shadows of such a man once more, even more to never let the child grow in her, live through the pain and humiliation she suffered around his presence.

She was determined to not let it live like she did.

Matthias approached her, stopping only at arm’s length away from her. He still looked so calm and composed, and Leyla felt herself beginning to cower, her shoulders hunching in to make herself appear smaller.

But she kept her eyes locked on his.

“Leyla, how do you expect to raise a child of someone you accuse to disgust you?” He asked her plainly.

“Shut up!” Leyla yelled at him, arms back to wrap around her belly, “It won’t care about you!”

She grew tired of his incessant persistence to be responsible for her child. He was giving her a false sense that he was growing desperate, but she knew him to feel nothing but pleasure for himself.

Matthias appeared to be thinking deeply.

“You must love it a lot, then.” He surmised after a moment, eyes looking at her abdomen, before raising them back up to meet her glare. His lips then split into a smile, before he burst into low chuckles.

“A cruel man, and a woman who loves his child.” He kept chuckling as the words slipped out his mouth.

Leyla squirmed minutely farther from him.

And then he sighed, the laughter dying down, and his eyes unnervingly blank.

“So amusing.” He murmured.

“Have you turned crazy?” Leyla asked with a scoff, and he shrugged nonchalantly.

“Why not?” he asked her with a serene smile. Unbridled joy was shown on his face, which made Leyla grit her teeth tighter in anticipation at his next actions against her.

Did it really not matter?

Was there really no escape from this man and his power?

“Do you think this is all I’ve come for here?”

The sudden question from him threw her back. What was he going on about now?

“This, seeing you like this…” he continued, a faraway look in his eyes, “It really tickles me happy to see it! It’s like I’ve grown vulnerable around you!”

He praised so melodramatically, making Leyla take a couple more steps away from him.

“Wh-what are you on-”

“Hate me all you want! Insult me, Leyla!” He dared her, his grin turning manic, before he held out his hands in a motion to grab her…

But didn’t lunge at her to do so.

“But you’re mine, Leyla.”

“No, I’m not.” Leyla denied.


“Oh but you are!” Matthias insisted, “It’s what’s happening right now after all,” he grinned at her, before his eyes dropped down to her stomach, “Because I’m going to have that kid of yours.”

A gentle wave came over him, and he was back to his own bubble of serene happiness.

Leyla could hardly believe her ears. There was no way she’d continue to listen to such a madman! And now he was smiling like a child about to be given his present!

His eyes went back up to meet hers, and she flinched back.

“I decided not to kill you, Leyla.” He told her with a smile, “So I will let you go, and you can run wherever you want to. I won’t stop or find you again.”

Leyla frowned, feeling a cold dread settle in her bones once again.

“But you’ll need to leave your child behind, before I’ll give you your freedom.”

Matthias had finally given her his stipulation, and Leyla began to frantically shake her head, unwilling to give in to his conditions!

“No! No!” She screamed, “Let me go! Let me go! You won’t take it from me!”

With every scream, Leyla grew frantic, she threw her hands up flailing and hitting whatever she could grab her hands on towards him. At one point she found herself pressed up against him, and she doubled her efforts.

She kicked, and screamed and scratched at his shoulders, arms, and whatever part of his pressed up against her…

But Matthias had a clear hold on her, and she couldn’t break free.

“Shh, calm down Leyla, shh,” he kept muttering softly, arms caging her against his chest as she flailed and wailed. “Think of our child, you don’t want any harm to come to it, don’t you?”

Eventually the struggling in his arms died down, and silent sobbing could be heard. Satisfied enough that she’d been weakened after her tantrum, Matthias finally allowed himself to pull away, before cupping a hand onto her wet cheeks.

He repositioned themselves into a hug, Leyla leaning limply in his arms and rocking them both back and forth in a slow dance. His hands drew lower, finally able to rest his palm against the swell of her stomach.

Leyla hiccuped, and began to sag against him. She’d grown exhausted.

He looked down at her red-rimmed eyes and flushed face and smiled affectionately on her while soothingly rubbing her belly. He hadn’t smiled as wide as this since she disappeared from him last spring.

They still fit perfectly against each other, just as he expected them to be.

He gently steered her towards the bed, tucking her in all nice and cozy. His hand still caressing her belly in soothing motions.

He’ll have Leyla, one way or another.

Even if she’d never forgive him. He will have her.

As soon as her head hit the soft pillow, Leyla found an odd sense of comfort and relief, her breath eventually evening out. She licked her dry lips, as big drops of tears rolled seamlessly down her cheeks from her eyes endlessly.

Matthias plucked out her glasses gently, setting them aside on the table, before returning.

He hovered above her, planting sweet, gentle kisses on her wet eyelids.

She squeezed her eyes shut tighter, feeling as though her tears were being consumed by a monster.

‘I’ve truly gone crazy,’ Matthias thought to himself as he licked off Leyla’s tears from his lips and smiled down on her.

Her tears still tasted like heaven.


Chapter 131




Road to Salvation




Matthias woke up early in the morning when dawn had not yet risen.

The first thing that came into his mind, as soon as his eyes were familiar with the darkness, was the empty seat next to him. It had been the place where Leyla, who was tired of crying, fell asleep. The place he last saw her in.

Now, only darkness filled the spot.

The moment he realized this, Matthias shot up immediately to his feet. He first went to the closest room. Its door was firmly locked. Other than this one, the other place she could have gone through was the door that led outside to the hallway…

His eyes quickly darted to the window in the room, immediately brushing off the thought of her jumping out the window.

Still, the thought unsettled him greatly, and Matthias moved to quickly take note of what was outside the window. Dust still settled firmly on its surface, nothing was out of place.

The window was still sealed shut, but the unsettledness remained persistent. Matthias could feel his heart beating against his ribcage in anxiety the longer he couldn’t find Leyla…

At an ominous thought, Matthias rushed to the window. He confirmed that all the windows were closed well, but the anxiety did not go away easily. He quickly whirled around to continue his search, when everything settled back down…

Matthias sighed in relief at the sight of her, even though it was a place he least expected her to sleep in.

There she was, huddled up and curled in on herself and their baby, sleeping soundly. He frowned at the flimsy blanket she chose to wrap around her, before chuckling in amusement. Her cries still rang loudly in the back of his mind.

She’d accused his hands of being dirty. Commanding him not to touch her.

Leyla was crouching down on the sofa and sleeping. When he saw her crouching on a thin sheet of cloth, he could not help but laugh out loud.


He still remembered the way she smiled so beautifully in front of the man she accused of being so cruel; she couldn’t bear to even be in the same room with him. And yet it was she who came to him sweetly. She, who had whispered her love to him unwaveringly.

It was funny how far she had to go through for a man she hated so much.

There was a pensive expression on his face, indifferent to any outsiders who would see him at this moment. He’d known it for a long time, even as it had been happening, he’d like to think. That didn’t stop him from finally accepting a fact he’d long turned a blind eye to.

How much of what she said was a lie?

How much of what she said had been true?

Matthias now knew the answer to the question that had continued since the spring when Leyla disappeared.

Everything was a lie.

He wanted to stop loving her. But even with the time away, the emotions that still didn’t fade made Matthias even more heartless.

Matthias carefully approached her, taking great care and gentleness before carting her off gently to lie on the bed. Fortunately, Leyla didn’t wake up, though she tossed and turned before curling up as though to make her appear small. With her in his arms, he could still tell that the woman was too light, especially with a child on her belly.

His hand slowly drifted off of her, reaching out to spread the blanket over to her collar, and wrap it snuggly around her petite body. His motions remained slow and cautious, careful not to rouse her.

Opting out of sleeping next to her again, Matthias pulled a chair instead and sat next to the bed, observing her quietly.

Leyla’s face, who fell asleep quietly, was gentle and clear. Come to think of it, she was a woman who had consistently shown this face to everyone other than him.

A bright, brave, sweet lady. That was Leyla Lewellin, whom everyone knew.

Perhaps, he was the only one in the world who was more familiar with tears than this woman’s laughter.

But there’s a baby too.

It was amusing how much he was clinging on to by using the baby, but he couldn’t let go. He couldn’t help but continue to cling to her, with the baby she was growing.

He didn’t understand it at all. Why in the world would Leyla, who hated him so much, would fight so hard to keep their child with her at the same time?

But matter, the baby was now his only hope.

Leyla was a woman who would never die or run away from her beloved child. So, as long as the child was tied to his side, Leyla would naturally be his.

The most perfect shackle and cage he could ever hope to find!

The child was an unexpected variable he hadn’t anticipated, but it was all that he could see. The child was his means to keep Leyla with him, everything else felt so foreign and strange to him.

Aside from the occasional fleeting sensation of regret.

Yes, regret.

If he had gotten her pregnant earlier, perhaps he’d never had to find Leyla in the first place. She would never have been lost to him.

Matthias smiled like a child holding a candy when the anxiety in his blank face disappeared. His heart remained calm and settled with everything he wanted back in his possession.

Until he started and entered Sienna, he prayed for Leyla to be safe at every moment. That’s how he can kill her. Of course, it was not because of hatred or resentment.

Love.

There was always only one reason why he wanted to kill Leyla.

If there was no way to get her back, and yet his love remained persistent and longing for her…

He’d kill her instead.

It was like a fire that would not stop even after swallowing life. He had to kill her, so he could end it only if there was a clear fact that he killed her with his own hands. So Leyla had to be alive. She shouldn’t have died recklessly, and been stolen from him yet again!

He loved her more day by day. And he wanted to kill this woman as much as that love.

He grew desperate.

Just as he was now.

But the moment he had come face to face with Leyla on that beautiful beach, Matthias also knew.

That he could never kill this woman.

He wanted to kill her, he knew he had to kill her…

but he couldn’t.

And in that moment of despair and joy, he saw the child in her womb.

And it was his salvation.

Had he killed her there and then, he would never have lost her again. But with the miracle of a child…

It opened up a new path for Matthias to keep her with him.

So there was no longer the urgency to kill her, no, there was no longer a need for it. So long as the child existed, so long as he would claim the child his, Leyla would be his willing forevermore.

Matthias slowly reached out and wrapped a hand around Leyla’s face. Leyla gently nuzzled her cheek against his warm palm, as if sucking in his body temperature. Like those enchanting false moments that broke his heart.

Trying to suppress the urge to grab the face with all his might and drag it in, Matthias stroked her pale, tear-streaked cheeks instead.

He’ll be hated forever, he knew, but it didn’t phase him.

He could take not being forgiven for what he’d done. He could take all the insults and degradation if it meant he could get his Leyla back. It could be anything. No matter what pain this choice causes, it can’t be more miserable than the days when he was left alone without Leyla.

In the light of dawn, Matthias looked at Leyla for a long time. From some point on, weak hope filled up.

Leyla will be given the Duchess’ seat. The child would naturally be his successor, and he would enjoy all the power and glory of Herhardt.

It would be all that he wanted.

There were also countless things he could give to Leyla and his child in compensation. It didn’t matter how long he had to do so. He was optimistic. One day, there may soon be a day when Leyla’s mind turns around and accepts him inevitably.

Even if it took a very long time, Matthias could endure as much as he wanted.

When the morning was bright, Matthias slowly bowed down and kissed Leyla’s cheek, who fell asleep.

“I love you,” he whispered on deaf ears.

‘I’m so happy to have you again without killing you, Leyla.’

Matthias’ answer to a woman who despised and hated her quietly permeated into the transparent sunlight.





Breakfast continued in silence.

The sound of the cutlery and the plate ringing regularly, and there was no conversation between the two sitting face to face. Leyla kept swallowing food with a firm face, and Matthias was all about watching Leyla like he was having fun.

“Stubborn Leyla Lewellin has changed her mind not to starve her friend. What a tearful friendship.” Matthias teased her light-heartedly as he watched her eventually empty the plate of breakfast brought to them.

Trying to suppress the urge to hurl the contents of her stomach, Leyla quietly drank the water instead.

She had no more fight left to give to the Duke.

As long as she didn’t die, there seemed to be no way out of that crazy man. No. It was now difficult to be sure whether she could escape him even in death.

She thought he had no more power over her, and yet was proven wrong, time and time again.

If it wasn’t Uncle Bill he was dangling over her head, then it was Kyle he’d use instead. And if Kyle wasn’t enough…

He had no qualms in using his child to bind Leyla. She didn’t want to dwell anymore about what his reasoning was.

Twisted desire. Obsession. Or love. Anything, none of that mattered to her anymore.

She would still be Leyla Lewellin, nothing more than a proper possession that he grabbed and used relentlessly at his will.

“I ate it! In front of your eyes, all my share!” Leyla, who put down the cutlery, spat out coldly. Matthias readily nodded as if he accepted.

“Yes. Thanks to you, Kyle Etman won’t be hungry today.” He hummed, smirking over at her. She gritted her teeth in frustration at him.

“Are you satisfied now?!”

“It’s enough.” He chuckled light-heartedly as he told her. It was a pure, unabashed smile. Any other time it would have been refreshing to see.

But not at this moment.

And not for what he was doing to her.


“Let me go! I want to go home. But I know better than anyone else that I can’t run away anyway.” She knew it was no use, but that’s all Leyla could say.

“You have to get used to this place, Leyla.”

“How can you get used to this prison”?

“You should.” Matthias, who stared at her as if seeing a child whining immaturely, briefly clicked his tongue at her, tutting in a chiding manner. “You could live like this for the rest of your life. Don’t you think it’s better to get used to it?”

“Don’t say nonsense!”

“If you don’t like it, run away again.” He dared her, shrugging nonchalantly at the suggestion of her running away, “I told you I’d let you go without killing you. As long as you give me that child.” Matthias tilted his head obliquely, sitting with his legs crossed. The gaze on her pregnant belly made cold dread run over Leyla.

“Are you truly going to take the baby away from me?” She asked softly, eyes dropping down to look at the bump in her stomach.

“Isn’t the expression ‘taking away’ too much? It’s my child.” Matthias pointed out to her. And Leyla’s fists clenched on her lap.

“…How can you be so sure that it’s your child?” Leyla wrapped her arms around her stomach as if she worried the child would hear. Even if it was of little use, she didn’t want her child to hear the terrible things he would say.

“It’s so presumptuous of you to believe that you’re the only man in my life.” Leyla continued to challenge him.

“So, do you want to lie again that it’s not my child?” Matthias hummed thoughtfully to her.

“There were a lot of guys besides you.” The more serious Leyla’s expression became, the lighter Matthias’ laughter became.

“Oh?”

“Yes. I deceived you. You know that. I’m good at lying to you. I’m good at pretending to love someone like Duke Herhardt, so why would it have been so hard to hide another man?”

Even though she was trembling, Leyla continued to say amusing things in Matthias’ ears. He watched Leyla with narrowed eyes, and one corner of his mouth quirking up as he listened to her theories of having many men on the side.

But he couldn’t hide the ice-cold cruelty in his eyes that once helped his light disposition. It rivaled even the frozen Schulther River in the middle of winter.


“So, whose child do you claim it to be? Kyle Etman?” He casually played with his pistol as he said so, “Then perhaps it is time to make true to my promise and shoot a bullet through his head after all.”

“Ky-, don’t get him involved in this!” Leyla protested immediately at the threat.

“If the father isn’t Etman, do you have any other names for a guy you know?”

“I’m never going to tell you because I know everything you’re going to do.” She seethed at him, “But what’s funny is how you believe that this is your child, who’s been tricked and voluntarily deceived by me.”

I’m sorry, baby.

Leyla kept praying and praying and continuing her spiteful words. But this was the last hope. He wouldn’t be obsessed with a child who’s not his blood. But Matthias soon recovered his wistful expression. The giggling laughter felt joy rather than anger.

“Yes. If that trivial lie comforts you, I’ll be happy to respect you, Leyla.” He hummed at her, his joyful disposition returning.

“If you want to believe it’s a lie, yes, I’ll respect the Duke’s insignificant pride.” Leyla spat back, unwilling to lose in the verbal back and forth between them.

She was so scared that her teeth were about to bump, but she didn’t want to let the child be taken by the shameless and cruel man sitting in front of her.

It was also impossible to take away the child like this.

“Lelya.”

Whispering his name as if he were giving a friendly confession, he slowly raised himself. His shadow, which approached, soon covered Leyla and the child.


Chapter 132







The Only Way







She watched him with great trepidation as he began to approach her and the child in her belly. There was something malicious in his eyes with the way he was now looking at her.

“You misunderstand something,” Matthias hummed as he stepped closer, and closer to her, “I don’t care if it’s the child of another man,” he told her softly, reaching out with a lone hand before he gripped Leyla’s chin.

Leyla struggled to get out of his grip, but eventually, he easily overpowered her. After shaking her head out of his grip, she eventually stopped before she relaxed, feeling her chin being pulled up to make eye contact.

“Whoever the father is, as long as it’s in your stomach, and it’s clear that you’re the mother of the child it’s enough.” He informed her plainly, “So long as you love that kid. That’s enough.”

Matthias’ eyes on her were soft and happy as he finished explaining to her. Before a new glint emerged in his eye…

“And Leyla, if the baby is not my child at all, shouldn’t you stay by its side even more?” He pushed,

goading her even more about the child’s wellbeing. “Just think about what I can do to it the very second you run away after having another man’s child.”

Leyla gritted her teeth, letting out a suppressed growl. The sounds she made, made it seem like he was strangling her, but his grip on her chin was unobstructed.

Matthias began stroking Leyla’s head once more with the other hand. Then, he resumed petting her, treating her like some sort of domestic animal.

“If it’s truly someone else’s baby, a little unsavory for me,” Matthias hummed softly, before breaking out into a smile towards her, “But no matter, I’m resolved to be the father of all and any children you’ll ever have, so worry not about having a fatherless child.”

“I refuse!”


“Has your memory gone bad, Leyla?” Matthias tutted in disappointment at her, his grip on her chin tightening for just a fraction of a second, “I told you, you will live like this forever.”

Matthias lowered himself to match Leyla’s gaze, and her mind flashed back to the sight of him she had witnessed before.

At the moment she saw the snow, Leyla understood what he had said, that the old Matthias von Herhardt was dead.

There was no longer the man who looked at her with the same gaze as the evening of a spring day last seen in Arvis. This man in front of her was now just a completely unfamiliar, and unhinged lunatic.

“Listen carefully, Leyla.” He murmured, kissing her forehead lightly before whispering in her ear, as though to soothe a whining child. Leyla glared at him indifferently, her clammy hands clasped together in an ironclad grip.

Her whole body began to tremble.

“You will be by my side, give birth to my child, and live as my woman. That’s your life.” He dipped down, planting a soft kiss on her pale cheeks this time.

“So you have to learn to live with me, if not for the sake of the child in your stomach,” Matthias straightened up and looked down at her, “After all, who would be foolish enough to support you and say it’s not my child? Don’t you, agree?”

Satisfied with her momentary silence and compliance, Matthias swiftly turned on his heels before vacating the room, leaving Leyla alone as he shut the door behind him, making sure to put the locks back in place.

She got up and felt the cool surface of the door beneath her palms before stepping back from the closed door. Then, in a fit of rage and frustration, she grabbed the candlestick on their dining table and began hacking away at the door.

She didn’t know how long she did so, but in the end, she was exhausted.

Ragged breaths began to escape her as soon as she was alone, staring idly at the closed door in front of her. There were ugly marks on the door stamped on the candlestick, but it was not enough to break the tightly locked door.

After all, she made those marks.

After looking at the door for a long time doing nothing but heave and despair, she swiftly turned around, absolutely tired. Every day, it was like something deep within her was breaking…

When she put down the candlestick, she buried herself deep in the chair before sighing long and hard. The child, who was steadily growing in her belly, finally began to move. She felt its fluttering kicks and rubbed a gentle hand over her growing bump.


“It’s nothing.” She soothed, patting her belly, as though to make it go back to sleep, “It’s okay.” Her voice was light and bright when talking to it, as she stared blankly into the empty room in front of her. With every stroke she made, she felt as though her child was reaching out in return.

She was used to it by now, but the first day she felt her child moving gave her such a shock and scare. She was sent into a quick tizzy, all scared and clueless about what to do, but as time passed, she learned a simple touch to her stomach would settle it down, with a few return soft taps for her.

It was that moment when the fact she was to be a mother finally sunk deep within her.

It was so amazing, that her heart was overwhelmed with happiness. Of course, it was also a little sad she couldn’t tell anyone how she felt, but she figured it was okay.

Because at least she had a baby now. She had everything she ever needed with a baby with her.

She’d never be alone again.

Thinking back, when Leyla was in a good mood, the child in her belly also seemed to dance joyfully for her.

In return, when she became depressed, she could barely feel the baby in her move even a fraction of an inch. Leyla found herself falling more and more in love with the child who understood her perfectly.

It had nothing to do with Matthias.

Soon the child calmed down again, and Leyla tied her tangled hair tightly. She wiped off her escaped tears before she went to fix her glasses as best as she could.

No matter how desperate the situation was, she was now a mother. A mother who is the only family this child will ever have in this world.

Leyla stood up to go and change, she also ate a little lunch that the soldier from before had left behind for her to eat as well. As the days went by, she found that most of her stuff at home was steadily moved to this room.

The Duke was more and more likely not planning to ever let her regain her freedom.

She needed to think. She needed to be calm.

Leyla carefully looked into the room, trying to find something to comfort herself. She even shouted for help, begged the soldiers she heard passing by to let her go, and even tried to break the door in vain.

But no help came.

No freedom or an opportunity to be free presented itself to her. Not even the soldier who kept bringing her few meals to eat when the Duke wasn’t around.

It was getting harder and harder for her to deny her absolute truth.


She knew there was no way out unless the Duke changed his mind, but she didn’t want to give up like this. She can’t live like this forever. She had to protect the child from the man.

But how?

The sound of the lock opening came as the growing anxiety became tears. Something in her broke with every sound of the lock being opened. Leyla reflexively stopped her fretting, before she hurriedly went to bed to lay down and bury herself in the covers to hide from him.

The chain was lifted while she pretended to be asleep, closed her eyes, and relaxed her breathing.

Leyla lay on the side and crouched down and grabbed her pillowcase. Soon after, the door opened and a movement began to come across the room.

Leyla could tell just by the sound of footsteps that the Duke was back.

Leyla focused only on pretending to be asleep. It started because she didn’t want to see the man, but at some point, fear eventually made its way into the back of her mind bit by bit.

She had grown more afraid of Matthias.

It was really like that now. But, oddly enough, Leyla had learned from this fear instead. Then again, Duke Herhardt had always been a fearful being, but he had never been such a perfectly cold and heartless man back in Arvis. She hadn’t expected it until she saw the current Duke.

He had changed.

Immensely so.

She seemed to have broken a part of that man’s heart during her escape. But, if that was true, did it mean that her wish came true?

She remembered when she prayed earnestly that she could be the pain of that man. It would be so unfair to be forgotten as nothing as soon as she was gone, so she wanted to leave him at least a scar.

Or at least break his heart like the way he kept doing to her.

But… she didn’t want him to become like this.

Leyla bit her lips because she thought she was going to burst into tears. She heard the sound of the Duke putting down his military uniform coat and jacket at the end of the bed. Subsequently, the sound of moving a few steps was heard, and the bed shook at the end of the sound.

Leyla held back the scream that was about to burst and tightened her pillowcase. Meanwhile, Matthias lay down behind her back. And slowly pulled Leyla deep into his arms and hugged her snuggly on his chest.


Startled by being so blatantly manhandled in her sleep, she almost struggled, but Leyla endured it well. Fortunately, the Duke seemed to have no intention of violating more of her, hence she deemed it better to endure now. She tried to ignore the way her shoulders relaxed as he hugged her.

She just didn’t want to encourage him more after all. That’s all. She didn’t want him to hurt her or be crueler if he knew she was only acting asleep this entire time.

Leyla only prayed for the passage of time. Or she hoped she could fall asleep like this. But none of the wishes came true.

Time went by slowly and the more her senses remained vigilant to every breath he took. She could feel him so vividly against her skin, that it was hard to fall asleep with him beside her.

Her hair moving like a brush of a feather when Matthias gave her a light kiss at the nape of her neck and then he moved to kiss her earlobes, forehead, and even her cheeks.

His hand was also moving, rubbing and caressing her by the neck, shoulders, and even her waist. It was a slow and soft sensation running through her body, making things warm all around her the more he touched her in her faux sleep.

She was scared and sad.

While Leyla was in a state of confusion about how soothing the strange feeling gave, Matthias’ breathing gradually slowed down. The touch and lips that touched her also gradually stilled, before finally stopping.

This Duke, she remembered so well. It was reminiscent of their nights together back in Arvis.

A silent sigh of relief flowed through Leyla’s lips, noticing that the Duke had finally fallen asleep. However, Leyla stayed in his arms anyway because she was not confident about looking back. His arms were as cozy as before, making her feel all fuzzy and treasured…

It was confusing to her and made her feel even more miserable.

It was not until late afternoon when Leyla began to see the red and orange hues of the sun seeping through the window that she could barely keep herself awake and aware of him.

Matthias was already fast asleep, no doubt with a peaceful face.

This was the memory she wanted to impart to her child about their father. It had still been so ingrained in her mind, that she found herself unwilling to not pass the memory down.

She wanted to give her child all the good points about their father, and leave out all the terrible things he truly was.

She didn’t want to give her child any hurt by telling them the truth about their father.

‘Your father died when you were in your mother’s stomach. But he loved us a lot.’

It was a lie she would readily tell her child if asked about him.

And then she would tell him the more beautiful parts about him, like his blue eyes, his princely smile, and the soft voice he would use on the gentle nights.

It’s terrible that she had to fish out good parts about her terrible nights with him, but it was all she had.

Those nights when he forced her to be with him were both endearing and frightening to her.

But not anymore.

Leyla clenched her teeth and tried to escape from his arms.

She knew she couldn’t run away from him. Not anymore.

Even if she somehow managed to escape out of this room, she may be caught by soldiers even before stepping foot outside of the hotel. And even if she was lucky enough to get out of the hotel, the city was still largely occupied by soldiers who would follow Matthias’ orders without question.

She’ll still end up in his grasp, more miserable than the last time she was with him.

But a small voice in her was still insisting on finding a way.

But what way was left for her than to just accept she’ll always end up with him?

It was at the very moment when Leyla hardened her mind that she found weak hope. Clothes that the Duke took off…

Maybe there’s a key in it!

When her thoughts reached that point, Leyla hurriedly left the bed they were sharing. And just as she reached for the Duke’s coat, something caught her attention in the corner of her eye.

It was a colorful paper box lying on a bed bench.

It wasn’t in this room previously, so it was something he’d just brought in with him. Curiosity got the best of her and wondered if he brought it for her.

Nimble fingers pried the top carefully, to unveil what had been hidden beneath. Once she saw its contents, she felt her hands shake at the sight of it.

She shouldn’t have gotten derailed.

It was a cake. A pretty cake with light pink cream on it.


Her eyes shifted between the cake in her hand and the sleeping Matthias in a frenzy, her mind battling with the sanity and fear mixing up within her mind. Her breathing soon became ragged, as she felt her growing erratic heartbeat.

“Ah!” Leyla yelped as she hurriedly stepped away.

Unfortunately, she still held onto the cake, before it fell all over Leyla’s clothes. With shaky hands, she futilely tried to clean herself up, but it only served to smear more of the sweet-smelling cake all over her. When she came to her senses, she realized that it was not only her hair and clothes now messed up, but also her hands and shoes were stained with cake.

Leyla, who shook her head small, hurriedly rubbed her hands at the skirt furiously trying to erase any evidence of her mess. Once her hands were clean enough, she then began to search the pockets of Matthias’ military uniform jacket and coat.

Even if it was a futile effort, this was better for her. She’ll take getting out of this room even for a moment, even if she’ll end up back with Matthias in the end…

“Leyla~”

A friendly called out to her, and that’s when she froze.

She’d just searched the last of his pockets.

There was no key in sight.

She lifted her frightened eyes and saw Matthias now sitting up on the bed.

He then leaned against the cushion against the headboard. He narrowed his eyes for a moment, but he soon regained smiled amusedly at her. His hands moved to the pocket in the pants he was currently wearing, and then slowly, he took the key out and dangled it enticingly at her.

“Is this it?” Matthias asked her, laugh lines in his eyes, before hardening into a predator as he stared longer towards her, “Is this what you were looking for?”

‘This is it,’ Leyla thought, ‘He’ll kill me now.’

Trapped by the overwhelming fear, Leyla reflexively picked up the pistol under the coat. Not until she had already pointed the gun at him did she realise what she had grabbed in fright.

She felt like she was going to burst into tears at the touch of the cold, hard iron; this was it!

There was no more turning back!

Tears ran freely down her cheeks as she pointed the gun at him.

“Ah, do you like it? My eye for weapons has improved a lot. You could kill someone with that.” Matthias’ voice was as sweet as praising a child for doing good, though equally challenging.

He was unphased even as she pointed a gun at him, still dangling the key in front of her.

“Key! Give me that key!” Leyla demanded, taking a few steps closer to him, emboldened with the gun in her hand.

Instead of looking at her in fear as she expected, Matthias only settled further into cushions, as though relaxing even as she threatened his life. It made Leyla’s hand with the gun shake at the sight of his indifference.

She eyed the key in his hand desperately.

“I can open it up for you.” He offered nonchalantly.

“No, give me the key!” Leyla shrieked at him as she demanded he hands it over to her. However, Matthias only looked at her with an expression as if she were still a spectator of an interesting play.

“Then take off the safety, Leyla,” Matthias advised her, and her hand shook all the more.

“Does this seem like a joke to you?!” She exclaimed, tears running down her face as she pointed a shaky gun in his direction, “If you don’t give me the key, then I’m going to shoot!”

“So shoot!” Matthias encouraged her, making Leyla jump at his insistence. He smirked at her sudden silence.

Leyla only wanted to escape from him, but even her threats to his life seemed useless.

“Kill me.” Matthias urged her, tossing the key in the air and grabbing it again. He was playing with it, juggling the key in one hand as he grinned challengingly up at her.

His last toss made him grip the key hard enough, it made her wince.

“Because at this point, that’s the only way you can escape from me.” He finished menacingly as he looked her in the eye.


Chapter 133




Scary and Sad Dream




Matthias leaned back and closed his eyes as soon as he finished. He remained unmoved even in the face of death at Leyla’s hands.

She trailed the gun at him shakily still, swallowing down the bile at the thought of having to kill him.

She’d never fired a gun before, despite the fact she’d watched countless huntings in Arvis.

He always made killing look so elegant despite her knowing it was a brutal sport.

So really, he should have seen this coming.

Just a bullet. All she needed was to shoot him once, and she’d be free!

Leyla’s finger was now on the trigger. Her hand was shaking so much, but she needed to be firm with this! She was just standing still and aiming at the gun, but she was very out of breath, almost as if she had been running a very long distance.

The tears just kept coming, and she didn’t know what for!

She didn’t know.

Her head was screaming at her to do it!

But her whole body refused to do so.

What was so wrong with what she was about to do anyway!? It’s what that scary, cruel, and friendly maniac wants too! He’s encouraging her to pull the trigger, too. Now if she were to do that, she didn’t know what would happen next to herself and her child.

She’d forever be clueless on what to do or how to do anything! She couldn’t survive on her own!

She couldn’t do this on her own!

Leyla let out a loud cry of frustration, sobbing openly as she dropped to her knees.

Languidly, Matthias opened his eyes, landing on Leyla’s crumpled up and desperate form on the floor.

She looked so adorable, all covered up in cake and cream, while her hands lay limp with the gun she had been threatening him with.

So pitiful, so ferocious, and oh, so beautiful.

While Matthias looked at her quietly, Leyla’s sobbing grew even louder and more desperate. Her grip on the gun tightened up before she pointed it at him again.

A smile made its way to his lips with how stubborn she was being. He eventually moved to finally stand up, to which Leyla tried to do the same thing as well, but only lost balance and further stumbled back down on the floor.

Overpowering her always came so easy to him. From the start, her efforts had remained futile against him.

He was finally in front of her in a few short strides before yanking the gun out of her limp arms. She yelped and sobbed in protest, but he grabbed her by the arm, pulling her up to her feet to drag her.

Before she knew it, Leyla fell onto the bed.

With the gun finally off her hands, Matthias hovered above her prone form on top of the bed. Leyla was still too preoccupied with heaving and sobbing as she lay down limply on the bed, feeling so hopeless about her life.

“I told you to kill me,” Matthias muttered calmly, before he flicked the safety of the gun off, just as he advised her to do before. He then looked down at her limp expression, the sobs still escaping from time to time. “If you can’t do it, I have to do it, Leyla.”

A clinking metallic sound penetrated echoed through the silent room, and Leyla’s sobs intensified, borderline hysterical now. She blinked back tears that kept blurring her line of sight, eventually managing to look up at him with tear-filled eyes.

The gun was now trailed on her forehead instead.

“Do you want me to spare you?” Matthias crooned softly at her as she blinked back tears at him.

She stared at him with a dazed expression, his tone of voice soothing and merciful in her ears. She nodded at him.

Everything felt surreal to her, almost like she was in a dream. There was a fog in her brain, convincing herself none of this must be real.

This was all just a nightmare that could be turned into a dream…

“Then you should be nice,” Matthias crooned at her, bending down to be closer to her.

He looked at her in such a caring way, she couldn’t help but be so receptive to him, nodding in agreement with his condition to her.

She couldn’t say no to him, not when he looked at her so tenderly…

So caringly…

She lost track of how long they stayed like that, but eventually, she heard him laugh. A couple of seconds later, there was a dull thump in the room as something fell to the floor. It wasn’t until she turned her head to see what made the noise, that she saw it was the gun that Matthias had been pointing at her head.

He’d spared her, and thrown the gun away. Its dull silver faintly reflected the bleeding red of the setting sun outside the window.

Tears fell from her eyes once more in streams, wetting the sheets of which she laid in, as the relief began to spread in her body, while the energy gradually drained from her.

A sweet whisper from Matthias broke through the relief in her foggy mind.

“How unsavory it is.” He hummed, referring to the discarded gun, while simultaneously stroking her head lovingly with that sweet, velvety voice in her ears…

“It’s okay, Leyla.” he whispered to her, calloused hands slowly turning her to face him once again, “I’ll make sure to wipe anything dirty clean just for you.”

Her consciousness blanked out before Leyla could witness anything more from him. It was all she could remember once the world faded to black around her.

When she regained consciousness, Leyla found herself sitting in a bathtub filled with warm water.

Groggily she looked around, before seeing Matthias’ face through the wispy steam.

He looked as calm as she last saw him.

“Is it too hot?” He asked as soon as their eyes met. Leyla meekly shook her head in response to him.

She remembered not fainting but couldn’t remember how she got here either.

‘No.’ She immediately corrected herself. There was a faint memory in the back of her mind, but it didn’t seem like it had been real.

Standing up alone from the bed, Matthias went straight to the bathroom. As the sun continued to set outside, she remembered listening to the sounds of water flowing from the bath and the rhythmic thumps of his steps.

Throughout that time, Leyla remained motionless and looked up at the ceiling instead, all fight lost within her, resigning unconsciously under Matthias’ control.

And then he returned by her side.


He patted her head as if praising a good child, before expertly taking off her dirtied clothes at a sensual pace. He’d been in no hurry undressing her, his touch lingering more than he should have in certain places. It was a terrible feeling, but Leyla didn’t refute his touches, just letting them happen.

At some point, the shame she felt eventually faded. Although she hated everything, she just wanted to give him everything he wanted from her so that he may leave her alone.

All those moments felt like a very distant world, a world she thought to be perfect it could only be impossible. But it had all been real. Sitting before the Duke, naked and bare in front of him, she couldn’t muster up a single emotion.

“Eyes,” Matthias whispered at her, and immediately she understood the meaning of the word after brief thought.

When she closed her eyes like a gentle child, Matthias’ hands caressed her face. For a man who would never have taken care of a dog in his life, she expected him to be clumsy, but he washed Leyla quite leisurely and efficiently.

Leyla stared ahead blankly, hunched minutely at his ministrations as his hands moved below her shoulders. Her two arms surrounding the knee were clenched tightly in one another, as the life and focus gradually returned to her eyes. The sound of pouring water stopped, and the two looked at each other quietly.

“Be nice, Leyla.” Matthias reminded her sharply before he gathered Leyla’s wet hair, which was covering her shoulders and chest and handed it over to her back. Leyla trembled quietly as she began to feel cold.

“You promised, didn’t you?” Mathias continued and kept drawing Leyla’s gaze back to him again and again.

He was addicted to any attention she would give him. He craved it desperately.

Leyla, who had been smacking her lips several times now, soon lowered her arms which had been covering her chest away from him. It was almost as if she was finally giving up control to him a second time that day.

It was enticing.

There was no significant change in Matthias’ expression as his eyes continued to rake all over her bare form. His observant gaze was looking at the obvious changes on her body, specifically her skinny shoulders.

A faint hint of embarrassment and satisfaction came to her mind, but eventually faded back into nothingness.

“I’ll buy you that cake again tomorrow.” He said as he drew Leyla’s wandering gaze back to him once more.

Leyla looked at him with a frown of confusion.

The current situation she was in, and the promise to her were so strange and funny to her. All the same though, he seemed like a person who could do anything he wanted to do.

It was his only personality.

“I don’t need it,” Leyla murmured tiredly in response. All she could feel was a sickening sensation in her and pure exhaustion from everything that had happened by far from just this day alone.

It was almost like she was in the middle of another war. One that would only begin again with every new dawn that comes. like another war, would be repeated tomorrow.

“No.” Matthias refused, he was quite adamant in his refusal. It seemed like even her opinions mattered not to him either. “You like it.” He declared confidently and sternly. Leyla chuckled humorlessly.

“And what do I like and dislike?” She asked him rhetorically, “Do my preferences even mean anything to you?”

Leyla put her knees up again and wrapped her arms around them. She further hunched in on herself into the bathtub. That way, in the end, it would still feel like she was denying him something.

Matthias smiled languidly instead of answering her.

Somehow it only served to unnerve her some more. Making her feel so stifled with how friendly his smile continued to appear. It was then that the wound on his arm across the bathtub caught her eye.

Leyla examined the wound, which appeared to be exposed under the sleeve of his rolled-up shirt with her squinted eyes. It was a scar, presumably made not too long ago. It suddenly sunk in her that this man was an officer in the army. One who was capable of taking over the city through a fierce front.

Realizing what Leyla was looking at, Matthias began to pull down his shirt sleeve with a softened smile, but Leyla stopped him by grabbing his arm tightly.

“It must have hurt a lot.” Leyla wondered softly, fingers softly caressing his scar like a doctor who was examining it carefully.

It made Matthias laugh wonderfully at her softness.

“What an odd thing to worry about, when not even a moment ago you trailed a gun my way.” He pointed out in great amusement to her, making her snap her lips shut from her awe at hearing him laugh so purely with her.

“It didn’t hurt.” He relented not a moment too soon, and Leyla’s brows scrunched up, almost as though she was pouting at his words.

“Lie.” she protested weakly

“It’s the truth.”

Matthis soon removed Leyla’s grip on him and moved her hand back in the tub. As soon as their conversation stopped, the sound of pouring water filled the bathroom again as they settled into an agreed silence.

Leyla was looking down at the surface of the murky waters around her with red-rimmed eyes. She wished he would stop now, but Matthias washed Leyla as if he were a boy taking care of his precious toy. He had no qualms nor hesitation to touch her, even when his hands rubbed her swollen stomach.

It was like he was unbothered by the existence of the child in her stomach. Like he didn’t care one bit about it.

Did he come to believe that the baby was another man’s child?

Leyla held her breath with anxiety. The thought troubled her greatly. She had no doubt even her baby was nervous, as it was currently not moving or giving her any fluttering sensations.

Matthias continued to wipe and wash her body down with great ease. Even though he served her like a servant, she was under no illusion that he was still her master.

Befuddled, Leyla eventually closed her eyes, and she opted to just sit still and let his touch caress her body.

Despite that, she could feel her breathing gradually turning ragged.

Matthias wiped Leyla’s cleanly washed body dry and proceeded to dress her. He then dried her wet hair before laying her on a new sheet of the bed.

Leyla mostly had a blank face as he did all this for her.

Sometimes she looked at him with a keen eye, but soon after, she dropped her gaze or turned her head away from him. Other than that, she looked calm as if she had become a doll with no string in sight.

Matthias, who proceeded to dim the light in the room, eventually found A tie, and he went to grab it, before going back to Leyla.

She lay perfectly still and stared at him, blinking her eyes owlishly at him.

With a reassuring pat on the cheek, Matthias gently tied Leyla’s hands securely in a difficult knot, but not before wrapping her wrists around with a soft cloth. He didn’t want her to bruise if she struggled against her constraints.

“Sleep.” He commanded her, before bringing the other end of the rope to the bed’s pillar and began wounding it securely on the post. Matthias then came up beside her afterward, covering her body well with a warm blanket, tucking it snuggly around her.

He then left her alone.

Leyla found herself tossing and turning a few times before she soon calmed down again. She remained in the same position until he returned from the shower. Her eyes were drawn to him immediately, looking innocently clueless as if she didn’t know what was happening around her.

All bathed and dressed, Matthias released the knot on the post but did not release her, at least not fully. Instead, he tied a hard knot only on one of her wrists this time and tied his wrist at the other end of the rope.

Leyla just watched and did not resist again this time, and she still looked exhausted. Considering what happened today, it was understandable.

Turning off the lights, Matthias lay beside her, their bound hands resting right next to each other.

“Don’t go.” Matthias’ whispered in the darkness, his fingers twitching to reach out to her. “Stay with me.”

His tone was so soft, and endearing, that it made her eyes sting at the sound of it. But she would not utter a single response. Matthias grasped her hand, his grip tightening up gradually to keep her further with him.

“Good night, Leyla.” He bid her, kissing her forehead.

The act was too intimate, more than just friendly, and out of harmony with this battlefield between them.

Leyla found herself drifting to sleep as she rocked her gaze back and forth at her tied wrist and his serene face.

She found herself dreaming in a deep sleep.

It was equally a nightmare as it was sad.


Chapter 134




Untold Confession







The Major’s woman had changed. It was an observation the soldier-on-duty, who had been tasked to deliver her food every day, could see as plain as day.

When he would stop by to see her, she would usually, and immediately, beg for him to help her escape. Often too, she would ask after Kyle Etman, demanding to know his current condition…

But now, she would only sit in silence, not even reacting as he stopped by, and continue to stare out of the window with a blank expression.

There was no more resisting or starving, or even attempting to break the door anymore. The woman only ate what was given and would sit calmly in wait. She became obedient, and it made his work easier in the process.

He should be happy, but somehow it was hard for him to do so.

“I don’t know if I can keep doing this.” he fretted guiltily as he locked the door and turned to walk away. Things had gotten ansty as of late, it made him severely nervous. He could only go pale the longer he stood in the hallway after doing his duty, before returning to his barracks.

“I think the woman is a little weird…” he murmured absentmindedly, before halting to a thought. “Shouldn’t I say something to him?

“To whom?”

A sudden voice piped up from behind him, making him jump and turn around in haste, before sighing in relief. It was just another soldier.

“To the Major,” he aired nervously.

Though come to think of it, wouldn’t that be useless? He thought before sighing. Surely the Major knew how much his woman changed. After all, he’d been with her the most, he’d be the one most in tune with the condition of the woman he kept under lock and key.

Still, Major Herhardt’s current behavior looked like a person who just enjoyed every moment. He didn’t appear to be bothered by anything happening behind the locked door.


Additionally, it was getting more difficult to talk so callously about the situation. Lately, the Major had been more and more efficient and invigorated in his work. No one wanted to get in the way of his current productivity.

So unless he were to bring it up first, it was becoming an unwritten rule for everyone in the army to not mention even a pip about the Major’s woman.

“I mean she is carrying the Major’s child, or so they say,” the soldier began to reason out, “So doesn’t it stand to say that it is also the illegitimate child of Duke Herhardt?”

A thoughtful look flashed in their eyes.

Was she truly the mistress of the duke who ran away?

The soldier, who carefully examined the empty hallway, shrugged before lowering his voice.

“That’s what people say.”

“Oh, that’s right,” piped up the other soldier, “I heard the woman in the room was originally Medic Etman’s fiance, the son of his family doctor!” exclaimed the other before letting out a low whistle, “But I guess the Duke went and seduced her anyway.”

“Hey!”

Seeing the long shadow approaching from the end of the hall, the soldier on duty urgently hit the side of the soldier standing in front of him. It was only later that he noticed that the man they had just been talking about had finally appeared!

They couldn’t help but grow nervous, wondering if he’d heard their gossip.

Matthias leisurely approached the direction where two frozen soldiers stood in attention for him. It was difficult to reconcile such dirty rumors with a man who was the epitome of great eloquence, elegance, and grace.

They gave him a customary salute as soon as he neared them, and he responded in return, wordlessly dismissing them before finally disappearing into the locked room they were never to open without his permission.

Relieved sighs left them as soon as he was gone. They eyed each other warily before standing both in attendance as they stood in the hallway of the hotel, where amidst the sunshine, they were once again engulfed in silence.





Matthias brought a book back with him.

She knew what it was, but she didn’t understand what his purpose in bringing it was, so she settled down and stared at the pile of books on the table.

“Read it when you’re bored,” Matthias commanded nonchalantly of her as though he was speaking to her like a child. He picked up a random book in the pile.

“Here’s a mystery novel.” He hummed, laying it out in front of her, “I’m positive it’s something you will like.”

Leyla continued to sit in silence as he picked up another.

“There’s also a book about birds.”

And so she watched, eyes fleeting over the selection of books and their covers with barely an ounce of enthusiasm. Still, she uttered not a word to him.

Snacks, flowers, books.

All these things the Duke had brought for her. So unbecoming of the reality of her situation, she was having trouble remembering why she was being so stubborn.

But she couldn’t bear to point the oddity out. It was clear to her that Matthias was not aware of what this situation was doing to her.

Covered snuggly in the blankets, and tucked in comfortably in the bed, Leyla found herself opening up the book on top of the pile.

The letters and words danced into oblivion in front of her even as she stared at them. But a good excuse to not face the Duke.

Sitting on the chair across from her, Matthias looked at her on the bed with a satisfied expression. Her loosely braided hair flowed down on slender shoulders, bunching up around her hips as it cascaded down her swollen stomach.

This image of her, pregnant with his child and reading in the sun was peaceful and beautiful.

A few moments of silence reigned between them once more aside from the rhythmic sounds of flipping pages. Leyla looked at him imploringly.

“Let me out for a moment.” She begged him, “I won’t run away. I promise.”

Matthias’ eyes narrowed at her, and a tinge of fear emerged deep within her. He was not pleased with the tranquility being disturbed, even by her.

“I want to go home.” She continued, “To Uncle Bill-”


“Leyla.” He cut her off sharply, his voice low and thick, sending shivers throughout her body. “Don’t you remember?”

He leaned closer to her.

“You don’t have a home anymore,” He told her plainly, “Or family left.”

Standing up, he approached her, gently grasping her chin to keep her eyes on him.

“Don’t you see? I’m your family.” He whispered to her, “Leyla, I’m all you have left, and all you will ever need.”

“No!” the instinctive protest escaped from her, “I-I refuse to believe-!”

His grip on her chin adjusted, tightening up around her jaw.

“It’s a dangerous battlefield outside.” He whispered, turning her head to look at the ruins outside their room, “So stay with me. I’ll protect you.”

Leyla’s head was turned back to look at Matthias. A single thought only ran into her mind.

All the bombings she’d experienced could never compare to the absolute terror this man was to her.

“You have to think about your child.” He implored her instead, rubbing her chin soothingly.

Leyla’s face crumpled at his words, lips wobbling with barely concealed despair.

Whenever talking about the child in her stomach, Matthias’ face would take on such a loving and gentle look. She could almost believe he would be a father who truly loved the child.

But only the contrary was true with him.

He’s a man who only sees the child in her belly as a means to satisfy his greed, to shackle her permanently to him.

What an abominable man.

“Please don’t insult my baby like that!” She seethed, wrapping her frail arms around her stomach stubbornly away from him, “I don’t want them to hear such insults!”

It was a futile effort, but she felt the need to do something, despite how useless.

“You think it insulting?” Matthias hummed thoughtfully, but Leyla knew he wouldn’t understand her plight at all.

“There seemed to be a misunderstanding, Leyla,” Matthias rebutted softly, his gaze dropping to her swollen stomach barely even hidden from him. “I adore the child. Thanks to it, I’d been persuaded not to kill you,” He then smiled roguishly at her, “And thus here we are now, as happy as we can be again.”


She heard no malice in Matthias’ voice. With the way he was now, he seemed to be only laying out the pure, cut-dry facts for her. And once again, Leyla lost another ounce of fight in her at his words.

She could only hide in silence again.

Matthias bowed down and kissed her on her forehead. Then he went back to his seat and returned to appreciating just the sight of Leyla in front of him.

Like she was only a piece of art to be ogled at.

Evening came swiftly, and once more he hugged her and secured her back to bed.

With his bare chest flushed against her back, Leyla noticed her temperature was a little warmer than usual.

“I have a fever.” She pointed out weakly.

Matthias frowned, before spreading a palm on her forehead, checking if she had a fever. Leyla only turned back around, her back now to him once more.

“I feel tired, I want to rest.” She declared.

With a resigned sigh, she squeezed her eyes shut.

Now sitting on the bed, watching her back, Matthias gently reached out to put the tie on the table around her wrist once more. Once satisfied and secured with the knot, he laid back down behind her before encasing her in his arms like a trap.

To Leyla, whom he cherished, Matthias told many stories.

He told her how much he knew what she liked, and how he was going to create a world for her. Should there be no such place among the mansions owned by the Herhardt family, he would build a new one in her name.

He could even buy an island for her if it’s what it took.

“Let’s build a tower, and build it high so it reaches the sky.”

“I’ll keep you with me forever to make our heaven.”

“I’ll give you my world. Leyla, as long as you stay by my side, as you are now.”

“I love you.” He whispered in Leyla’s ear, who’d long fallen asleep dreaming about his sweet tortures.

It was still a confession, one that can only be conveyed in this way for now.


But one day, perhaps soon, he may be able to say it while looking at the beautiful green eyes he’d long wanted to keep on him forever. And that day he eagerly waits for it. Leyla won’t leave him anymore when she learns to stop fearing him.

Perhaps it wasn’t long now. After all, Leyla loved this kid that came from him. As soon as the child is born, and would need its father, Leyla will have no other choice than to accept him.

And he’s more than willing to play the role.

To make a loving family for the child she cherishes so much.

Matthias kissed Leyla’s soft hair, grasping tightly and securely one of her hands with pure joy.

Despite the burning fever against his skin, he only ever had one truth for her.

I love you.

Suddenly there was a sound of a sigh, hitting hotly against the cold chill around them. Repressing the urge to suddenly break down in vulnerability, Matthias buried his face in the nape of her neck, nuzzling it snuggly. The fresh scent of roses flooded his nostrils.

She still smelled so sweet to him.

It’s funny to see himself begging for the heart of the woman who only had hatred for him, but he’s undeniably happy right now, with Leyla in his arms.

The night was lovely.

He looked around with a dazed face, not knowing what to do before he settled on pulling her body flush against him instead, wounding an arm around her to securely her firmly against his body.

She squirmed in his arms, but only for a moment. And he found a sadistic form of pleasure in her mindless resistance.

He chuckled, low and quiet in the night.

But there was a hidden urge in him to cry.








Leyla opened her eyes to the sunset. It was a dreamy color that made unrealistic days feel more like a dream. Looking at her forehead, all drenched with cold sweat, she curled up before sighing against the heat.

Her hand went to rub her stomach.

‘Are you okay?’ She asked it, smiling at the soft, fluttering sensation she felt when she stroked her stomach, as if in response to the question. A sense of relief washed over her, along with a minor ache in her bones that began to spread.

The mild fever and chills that began a few days ago were getting worse, she soon noted. She endured well even when she was left alone in the broken house after losing Uncle Bill…

But after her encounter with the Duke, her body and mind felt as if it was on the brink of collapsing. She hated the feeling so much, but her body refused to bend to her will.

Every day was getting scary and difficult to live through.

She felt like this was it.

After Uncle Bill’s funeral, every night that came made her go deeper and deeper into the comforts of sleep to escape the pains in her life. When the house would grow quiet, she was suffocated. And when the strong night wind kept blowing through the broken window, she could only tremble in fear that another air raid would come…

But she still has a baby. She had to protect them, so she tried to hang in there, but there were many moments when it didn’t work out.

Moments even her child wasn’t enough to bring her to care about her life.

And Leyla hated how she truly realized it now she was forever by Matthias’ side.

She was dragged humiliatingly captive. Forced to eat for survival despite her wishes…

-and slept more comfortably in a cruel man’s arms than when she was alone, which sometimes came as an unbearably painful wound.

Above all, she found it unbearable how well the baby had taken to the man who kept imprisoning her.

The baby would soon begin fluttering here and there when they heard his voice. When he’d touched her, she could also feel the baby kick in joy. They moved a lot more with Matthias with her, than they did for her alone.

They didn’t understand how cruel the man was, they were just content with having another being around than just the mother. Because the baby has only ever had just a mother.

Leyla was very upset and guilty about that.

She only found out she was with child once they finally left Arvis. She tried too long, and too hard to pretend she didn’t know that she wasn’t growing a human in her belly…

But eventually, it had grown too big to deny.

Too big to ignore.

As soon as she accepted reality, Leyla grew to find solace with the child, surprisingly. She knew what it meant to have an illegitimate child whose father would never even know its existence, how her life would change irrevocably if she were to keep it!

And what disappointment and sadness she would bring to Uncle Bill once he knew she’d keep the child of her torturer.

So she kept quiet, unwilling to disclose its existence.

She wanted to protect the baby, but she was afraid it’ll look like a lingering regret that she brought to this far place without leaving it in Arvis. Surely Uncle Bill would think so too.

She was so embarrassed.

But it was more crippling to carry the knowledge that she’d never know what Uncle Bill truly thought if she was carrying the Duke’s child. If she had known it would remain such great guilt, she shouldn’t have hidden it from Uncle Bill.

After losing Uncle Bill overnight, the most painful crushing feeling of regret bore down on her chest.

Was the baby lonely like her then? Was that why, even when its father was cruel and heartless, the baby has taken such a liking to him this much?

‘I don’t want you to. You’ll only get hurt.’

She implored it to hate their father.

“Leyla.”

She hadn’t realized she’d fallen asleep, before waking up in confusion. Looking up, she saw Matthias.

The lights were already turned on, lighting up the once darkened room.

She thought he was continuing what he was saying, but she couldn’t hear him well over the fog in her ears. There was just a biting chill in the air…

But her body still felt too hot, she soon found herself out of breath even though she was lying still on the bed all this time.

“Leyla.” His voice that kept calling out her name only grew louder. The child’s movement in her belly also grew in strength. They kicked harder and harder every time Matthias called out for her.

‘What if the baby thought their name was Leyla?’ She thought idly before she laughed at the thought.

What a funny mistake it was if that were true, Leyla thought to herself, before the laughter died down.

Soon, only a hot breath escaped her lips, replacing the soft chuckles she’d let out.


He was still calling out her name, and the child was still moving around excitedly, but could only register the mixed sensations all around her.

The heat, the chill, the fluttering in her stomach, and the soothing sensation of Matthias saying her name…

She missed Uncle Bill, she thought belatedly to herself, before her vision soon turned to black.










Chapter 135




That Name




The military doctor looked at the patient with puzzled eyes.

The woman Was not recovering for several days now. It was difficult for him to find a proper way to examine her condition because he couldn’t use the usual medicine.

Her pregnancy was proving difficult for him to treat her.

“When will the fever go down?” Major Herhardt asked as soon as the doctor stepped away from Leyla.

The military doctor grimaced to face him, swallowing down his nervousness at disappointing the Duke.

There was more than just a fever ailing the Major’s woman. He had been surprised she’d managed to survive so far with such a myriad of conditions happening to her body alone.

Any other average adult would not be at risk of death with this fever. Still, with her pregnancy, and further weakened body by other ailments, it was a different matter altogether.

Death was proving to be more likely, but he didn’t know how to break it to the Major without fearing for his life in return.

On the first day he was called to this room, Major Herhardt’s eyes, who spoke blankly about the woman’s worsening condition, had a cold and shuddering glint.


He hardly looked like amongst the living and seemed just about ready to swallow a bullet up his mouth to follow his woman.

“We still have to wait and see-” the doctor began to stammer when Matthias cut him off rather rudely.

“Until when?” Matthias growled threateningly deep and low towards the doctor.

Ever Since he saw her collapse, he immediately began to nurse her back to health. All by himself, he wanted to do it. He refused anyone else’s aid, snapping at them for even offering to take care of her.

“If we take her to a military hospital in the back, can we treat her?” He urgently inquired, looking down at her matted, sweaty golden hair, and stray locks plastered against her temples as she sweated buckets.

But the doctor shook his head.

“With the patient’s physical condition, the journey itself will be too difficult to endure.” He quickly explained to the Duke, “And if by some miracle we manage to send her there, her pregnancy would still prevent us from treating her with any medicine.”

He wanted to explain more about the woman’s condition, but judging by the Major’s ominous expression, continuing to speak would only gain his ire. This terrifying expression of his, which made him look like a dead man walking, only made him be seen like a cornered animal.

But despite his posture, his expression remained blank and impassive.

“I’m sorry, Major.” The doctor finished with a sullen and resigned tone.

Matthias approached Leyla’s bedside again, instinctively grabbing her hand in his. She remained stubbornly unconscious.

The frighteningly high fever had refused to subside for days. Leyla had stayed unconscious for most of the time. When she was, it was still barely enough to keep her awake for long, unable to eat beyond a spoonful of porridge properly.

She would groan endlessly complaining about the heat and murmur incoherently before blacking out again.

However, Matthias did not give up.

To somehow lower the heat, he wiped her forehead with a wet towel, wiping it and her body off of the grime and sweat that had begun to accumulate. Then, he’d religiously cradle her head and feed the porridge when she awoke.

Leyla would scold him half-heartedly for his manhandling of her, but he let it slide. Day in and day out, he would patiently change her clothes, wipe her sweat, and do the same things again and again with every passing day.


“It’s all right, Leyla.” He cooed softly over her delirious fever haze. Then, breathing raggedly in his arms, she groaned in pain as she struggled to keep her eyes open and stare deliriously around them.

“You’ll get better soon.” He promised. Leyla’s eyes snapped to the light source overhead.

“Uncle Bill.” She called out, eyes unfocused as they stared up at him before she gave him a sweet, sweet smile.

“Leyla.” He breathed reverently.

“Later… in the evening, Kyle-” Leyla’s words trailed off, as she resumed babbling incoherently.

Something cold settled in his chest at the mention of the name.

Kyle.

Despite being unconscious, the name this woman called affectionately stilled the loving caress that was being given to her. Matthias’s hands that had been wiping her sweat away froze in contemplation.

Amongst her fevered ramblings, Matthias inferred she believed herself to be back in Arvis before they began their relationship together as she began babbling on about a few stories he’d already read in her diary, her taking care of the flowers in the garden with Bill Remmer. Having so much fun in the forest and the flower fields. Doing homework with Kyle Etman in their quaint little cabin.

Always only three.

Only the three of them always flashed in her memories as they spent time together, ate dinner, and laughed together.

He looked down and watched her happy expression as she babbled on and off of eloquence. Not a single moment as she shared her memories did her smile fade. Even as the pain worsened, and she’d grown red in the face, it disappeared.

After wandering in such illusions for a long time, Leyla lost consciousness again and fell into a deep sleep. Instead of waking her up, Matthias dipped a lukewarm towel in a basin. The bones of the hand that twisted the towel as hard as possible were turning white as he poured every terrible thought he wanted to do.

When night came around, Leyla called out for other more names, but they stayed mostly the same.

Mom.

Dad.

Uncle Bill.

Kyle.

And yet, not a single moment did Matthias cross her fever-addled brain.

A rising rage awoke in him at the blatant insult Leyla kept showing him even as she was sick.








Outside the makeshift infirmary, a military car came rolling by to a stop belonging to Bergian forces. One of those that dismounted was Riette von Lindman.

He had stopped in front of a hotel standing in the square of the city, stretching a limb overhead as he loosened his limbs up from the long journey. He watched the young soldiers sitting in groups and having a leisurely afternoon smoke or chat.

This relaxed aura in the camp, a different cry from the war he’d come from, immediately brightened up Riette’s eyes.

“Riette Lindman!” A noble officer, who recognized him, approached with a smile as they greeted each other. Riette shook his hand in return with his roguish smile.

“Oh, you’re still alive.” He jested.

“You know how I am.” They lightheartedly rebutted. The two continued exchanging pleasantries and jokes before they sat side by side at a bar on the hotel’s first floor.

After achieving the top priority of occupying Sienna, the Berg army was scheduled to reorganize its battle lines here and march west to attack the capital of Lovita. However, soldiers who had been running nonstop and winning the war were given temporary leave to enjoy some time in a warm resort city in the south as a reward for all their hard work and sacrifice.

Before the start of the new year, the emperor’s solemn declaration that he would win and return Berg’s sons, which he pertained to Sienna city, to his family’s arms, but no one readily believed it.

Now it was looking more and more likely to be true.

“What about Matthias?” Riette lightly winced as he downed a shot of brandy, looking around in search of the duke as he asked for his whereabouts. After all, he was the reason why Riette, who’d been assigned to the rear units who supplied the bulk of Berg Army, came over here in the first place. To check up on his cousin.

“It’s…” The officer, who was laughing mischievously with him not a moment ago, suddenly looked pensive and hesitant. Riette frowned with concern.

“Why? Did something happen? I didn’t hear that he was injured.”


“It’s not like that. Major Herhardt is safe, but…” the officer began to trail off, sighing, “There have been some strange things happening here lately.”

“Oh?” Riette asked, now intrigued, “What could have happened to that boring guy?”

Fingers drummed against the glass.

“He dragged a pregnant Lovitan woman to camp.”

Riette’s hands stilled before he could throw back another shot of brandy down his throat.

“What?” he croaked, Riette doubting he heard him correctly.

“It’s a shock that Duke Matthias von Herhardt, who is not like the other men, would suddenly feel the urge to claim a woman out of the blue! Especially a Lovitan woman.” He grumbled, rubbing his temples in great confusion, still unable to wrap his head around their Major’s behavior. “I can’t explain it.”

“Aw, come on,” Riette prodded, “Don’t leave me hanging now that you’ve told me the interesting bits.”

“In Room 308, go and see it for yourself.” The other soldier grunted, throwing back another shot of brandy for himself, “You’ll know when you see it.”

He drank the rest of the drink and shook his head and sighed. Riette, who was looking at him with a frown, left the bar, alongside the rest of his luggage.

Even as he climbed the stairs and passed through the hallway where the room was located, he did not believe his friend. Riette thought it was certain that he was drunk from all the day drinking he’d been doing. Or perhaps he went a little crazy due to the shock of war. That made more sense than Matthias von Herhardt committing such a Scandal amid a high-stake war.

Soon after, however, Riette was able to confirm the ridiculous reality with his own eyes.

Just as he was about to knock, the door to the room suddenly swung open. He nearly crashed into the military doctor, who was just about to leave the room.

“Oh, is Matthias in there?” he politely asked the doctor, before a sudden burst inside the room gave them great alarms!

“Open your eyes! Open your eyes! Come on!” a demanding yell echoed from inside, before the doctor turned back inside in haste, with Riette following in suit.

What he saw greatly baffled him as soon as he saw his cousin.

His perfect cousin, the ever revered Duke of Arvis, now looked manic as he shook roughly the arms of an unconscious, and definitely, heavily pregnant woman in bed as he shouted at her.


Matthias had Bloodshot eyes, and age lines on his face were more prominent than he remembered. Even the shirt he had on was loose and crinkled. It was unbelievable even when he saw his state with his own eyes.

“Don’t do this, Major! The patient needs to rest!” protested the doctor as he gripped the major’s wrists to prevent him from shaking the woman roughly some more.

“Do you think you can run away if you die?!” Matthias screamed at the woman’s face, “Don’t underestimate me!”

Without any mercy or regard, Matthias shoved the military doctor holding his arm away. He resumed grabbing the unconscious woman lying in bed again.

Riette had no clue what was going on, but his body moved anyway, immediately grabbing Matthias’ wrists to prevent him from aggravating the woman’s condition more.

“What’s going on, Matthias?!” Riette yelled over his cousin’s screams, “What’s the meaning of all this-”

In his shock, Riette abruptly let go of Matthias as soon as he saw who was lying on the bed.

He took a few steps away from his cousin.

It was Leyla Lewellin, the woman whom Riette recognized well enough.

Taking advantage of Riette’s shock, Matthias rushed back to Leyla.

“If you run away to death, I’ll die too! I’ll chase you!” Matthias exclaimed as he shook her unconscious frame roughly, “You hear me, Leyla?! You’re mine! Even if you die, you will not escape me!”

Matthias, who held and screamed at an unconscious woman, looked like a made beast, forced into the last of his sanity. Like a pitiful prey thrown in front of the gun, weighed down by uncontrollable fear and left only with its baser instincts.

Riette reeled back in great disbelief as he watched the madness unfolding in front of him.

This… This didn’t make sense.

As far as he knew, Matthias was a man who had lived perfectly all his life. He was always calculating and composed, always an intimidating predator, and a perfect hunter all his life.

There was no reason to believe he could be anything else than that.

“Open your eyes now. Open your eyes, Leyla!” Matthias demanded from Leyla, who remained stubbornly limp and unwaking, “See who is in front of you before you kill Kyle Etman!” He seethed desperately, his body shaking with a barely concealed rage.


A few days ago, perhaps Leyla could have been roused back to unconsciousness with his current actions, but her condition had greatly worsened with every passing day. And now, even with her ragged breaths and groans of pain…

Her eyes could only remain closed off from him.

Matthias saw this as a slight to him, a stubborn refusal on her part to deny him of her attention.

And it made Matthias want to go crazy.

“Uncle…” Leyla murmured painfully and longingly in her delirium, when she sighed out, Matthias caught the smell of a familiar tang-iron scent. He could only slump back into bed, unable to say anything more to make her see him.

She called out for Bill Remmer a few more times, a smile always following suit before her cloudy green eyes blinked up unfocused in the room. It was almost like he was there with them, about to fetch and steal Leyla away from him.

Matthias looked around with blank and dead eyes, before landing on the window in the room. It must be a bright day outside, yet he saw no light. It was all darkness.

Perfect darkness without even a single piece of light.

Was the gardener truly trying to take Leyla away?

What ridiculous thought, he rationalized, but the persistent fear refused to leave him.

Just as Bill orchestrated the escape from Arvis with Leyla…

He comes back once more to take Leyla back from the man who fought tooth and nail to reunite them.

“Leyla.” Matthias’ called out softly, his tune changed once more in the face of looming death for her. He wrapped Leyla’s heated cheeks with his hands which began to tremble.

‘Leyla, please.’ He begged in his mind as he pressed their foreheads together, before pressing their lips together and tasting the blood that had settled on her lips.

She was whispering once more, weak and soft against his lips.

“Uncle…” Leyla’s lips became soft as if she had met Bill Remmer again.

“Kyle…” she called out with a delirious smile.

Naturally, the name followed. Leyla laughed happily against him, even though he knew in his heart she was about to die.

She was dreaming of beautiful things with a man that wasn’t him.

Matthias flashed back to the girl smiling brightly at Kyle Etman in front of him.

She was the child of Arvis, who grew up to be so smart as she was pretty, her eyes forever twinkling and loving with everything she saw. The woman who escaped from him relentlessly, the woman he was hoping was his but never was.

Was he killing her?

“Matthias.” Riette, who approached him, grabbed his shoulder slightly. It was only then that Matthias noticed the existence of his cousin.

But it didn’t rouse any sense of alarm in him. Just a void remained. Even with Riette in front of him, Matthias’s eyes were just empty.

Matthias’ touch returned to Leyla, being spurned by Riette’s touch on his shoulder.

His hands roamed all over the sweaty hair, the matted red face. His hands lingered on her neck, before moving to her arms, and torso before he finally leaned back.

His hands dropped to the sides limply.

With a terse voice, he finally spoke.

“Bring me Etman. Now.”







“Kyle Etman!”

Kyle hurriedly looked up for the voice that was urgently calling for him. The military police, one of those who put him in this prison, were rushing in, keys jingling as they stood in front his cell.

“You’ve been requested, Private Etman.” the police informed him as they unlocked his makeshift cell.

Deciding to be a little snarky after being imprisoned, Kyle couldn’t help but snap back at them.

“Oh? Don’t I still have more days to serve as punishment?”

“Stop talking smart and come out!” the police barked harshly at him, yanking him up to his feet, “You’ve been given an important job in place of your punishment, so be grateful! Double time Private!” They urged him, roughly grabbing him by his biceps and hauling him out of prison

“What do you mean?” Kyle asked with great confusion, “What mission?”

“It’s Major Herhardt’s orders.” the police grunted at him.


Ah, so he was being released under the Duke’s leniency huh? Kyle wanted to laugh mockingly at the thought. Surely this was just another sick sense of justice the Duke had!

Just about as Kyle was about to snark back at the police, he was interrupted by an explanation.

The Duke’s leniency for putting himself in this warehouse. As soon as he wanted to laugh, the military police continued.

“The woman the Major brought is very sick,” the police sternly explained, “And for some reason, he’s convinced you can help. So get up, Private Etman! Time’s a wastin!”
















Chapter 136




Your Dream Came True







“There’s not much I can do for the patient at the moment, Major.”

The military doctor opened his mouth with an awkward face. It was very embarrassing to have to repeat the same words every day in front of his increasingly cold superior.

“Why?”

The returning major’s answer was also the same.

“As you know, she’s pregnant, so I can’t use medicine carelessly. If something goes wrong, the child in the stomach-”

“I’m asking about Leyla right now.” Matthias interrupted rudely, which ultimately paved way for a newfound tension in the room between the current occupants.


The military doctor flinched upon the Major’s harshness, especially as Matthias immediately shot up to his feet.

Before anything else could happen, the door swung open to reveal Kyle as he finally returned.

Uniform crumpled up, hair unkempt, and dark circles beneath his eyes, Kyle held a murderous glare as his eyes landed on Matthias. But unlike him, Matthias only held a quiet, haunted look in his eyes.

Unlike Kyle, who glared at him as if he were going to kill him, Matthias’ eyes were consistently silent.

The first day he’d been called into the room, he’d witnessed a ruthless quarrel between the two men.

But more so on Private Etman’s part than it did with the Major’s.

Kyle, who saw Leyla lying dead, went half-crazy and attacked him without hesitation.

If only he could kill that devil.

However, even if Kyle cursed, waved his fist, and made a fuss, Matthias did not show any reaction.

‘Save Leyla.’

That was all he said to Kyle.

He ruined her, drove her to the threshold of death, and dared to give such an order to him?! Yet Kyle wouldn’t reject the order.

It’s Leyla after all. Why should she suffer for what the Major did? Even if it was not a major’s order, he had to save Leyla at all costs. But it was, so he couldn’t do anything else about it.

Leyla’s condition has not improved at all. Sometimes, when her consciousness came back from time to time, she would recognize Kyle and say things as if he had returned to his childhood friend, but that was all.

“Focus on Leyla, not the child.” Matthias hissed, “Just think about Leyla, and make sure she’s healed!” demanded Matthias after a glance at Kyle, before addressing the doctor once more.

“But Major, the mother, and the baby’s condition are not separate. Inevitably together-”

“Use the medicine!” Matthias ordered and the doctor clamped his mouth shut at the raised voice, “Use the medicine to lower her fever, and wake her up!”

Finally, Kyle broke his silence on the matter.

“She’s too far along in the pregnancy already.” Kyle seethed at him, “If we use any of the stronger medicine, the child would come out stillborn!”

“So what?” Matthias snapped before he looked down at Leyla, who was breathing hard. “Bring your medicine, Etman.”

“DO YOU WANT TO KILL THE CHILD?!” Kyle asked him incredulously.

“I don’t care what happens to the child,” Matthias admitted truthfully, and Kyle couldn’t help but scoff.

“HOW COULD YOU-”

“You’re here to save Leyla,” Matthias cut off, his tone more ominous than before as he glared at Kyle, “Do what is asked of you and nothing else.”

He’d lost care about keeping the child alive the moment he realized he would lose Leyla anyway. It’s true that when the child dies, the last hope of regaining Leyla by his side forever would disappear.

It’s the thought that made him hesitate most about the treatment he knew could save Leyla’s life. But ultimately…

He’d rather endure the hell of letting her go and live her life than watch her die.

There was nothing else to consider. Nothing else would matter, and that’s what Matthias had come to do.

“HOW CAN YOU TELL ME TO KILL HER CHILD SO CALLOUSLY?!” Kyle persisted, “HAVE YOU EVER TAKEN INTO ACCOUNT HER FEELINGS IN THIS MATTER, OR JUST YOUR SELFISHNESS AGAIN!?” Kyle burst into anger that he couldn’t hold back anymore.

Riette, who was watching from afar, also stepped in to put his two cents in.

“I agree, Matthias,” Riette piped up softly, “We’re already in a war, and if that child that Miss Lewellin has is your child, you have to save it, too.” His eyes were serious when he looked at Matthias.

“If you were to be killed and die, and if that child in your stomach is your child, it would be Herhardt’s only successor.”

Riette spoke in the count of the nobility. It was the right thing to do if you were an heir to a prestigious family. And Matthias von Herhardt was said to be the most perfect aristocrat in this empire.

“Be reasonable.” Riette urged, imploring to the rational Duke he knew Matthias was. After a glance towards both Kyle and Riette, who stood in front of him in protest, Matthias whirled around swiftly to face the military doctor again.

“Give me the medicine.” He immediately demanded it. The calm voice that broke the heavy silence was no different from before. If no one had the balls to save Leyla, he’d do it himself!

“I’ll save Leyla.”

Matthias repeated the cold-blooded orders as if he knew nothing else but that.



‘My dream has come true.’

Leyla thought happily. Even though she knew it was impossible, the dream she had deep in her heart became a reality.

It was the beginning of summer when the forest of Arvis would turn the most beautiful green.

She pedaled her bike excitedly and ran to the cabin. She wore the summer uniform of Gillis’s Girls’ School, where the hem of her blue dress fluttered along the wind shaking the forest.

The old bicycle creaked and stopped in front of the warehouse in the front yard of the cabin. Leyla jumped slightly off the bike, quickly running the remaining distance home.

It didn’t take too long to change her clothes and come out again.

She wore a wide-brimmed straw hat and held a large basket, walking gently toward the deep forest as if dancing. She was going to pick raspberries until Kyle came to study together. She had to make enough raspberry jam to fit the glass bottles before the end of this summer.

Yes, it was a dream come true. At the beginning of summer when she was only eighteen years old. Back when everything was still all fun and happy days.

Leyla hummed and picked raspberries. She also thought about the dinner menu from time to time. For both Uncle Bill and Kyle, she could make their favorite foods. Should she have asked Uncle Bill to catch the chicken?

While thinking diligently and picking raspberries, Leyla reached the riverside. The smell of water tickled her nose as she wiped her sweaty forehead.

Now, these days will continue every day. Leyla could tell that her dream came true and she can live in this time forever.

She was so thrilled. She felt her heart was full when suddenly Leyla heard a child crying.

It was strange.

There are no children in this forest. However, the sound was too loud and clear to dismiss as something she’d just misheard.

Leyla, who hesitated, put down the heavy basket for a while and looked in the direction in which the cry came. And after a while, she spotted a strange child crying. A small and pretty child, who seemed to be around Leyla’s age when she was abandoned by her mother, was crying and walking alone from the foot of the river.

Puzzled, Leyla’s steps faltered before she stepped back.


She didn’t know who the child was. She gently pressed a palm against her pounding chest and shook her head.

She had to hurry back to the cabin. Uncle Bill will be back soon. She had to make dinner for the three of them.

‘But who is that? Why is the child crying?’

Leyla took a step back, suddenly overcome with the urge to cry. In the meantime, the child’s cries only grew louder.

‘What should I do? What should I do?’

She kept biting her lips out of nervousness. Her ears were ringing with the deafening cries of the unknown child.

And then she gasped, pupils, dilating as a vision flashed right in front of her.

It was fuzzy at first until it gradually became clearer and clearer…

And then she saw the blue eyes.

As soon as Leyla realized that it was Matthias who’d been looking right at her, she suddenly became aware of one other thing.

Large, firm hands grabbed her chin and began to pry open her mouth. Naturally, she resisted weakly in protest, confused and unknowing of what was happening. After a while, something smooth, hard, and cold touched her lips.

It was a medicine bottle.



A sharp scream erupted in the whole room.

Leyla’s scream was so loud that other occupants found it hard to believe she was the same woman who had only been suffering, dying even, just a while ago.

“LEYLA!” Kyle called out for her, while the doctor and Riette stood uselessly at either side. They looked at him sheepishly, but Matthias, who was holding down a thrashing Leyla, remained surprisingly cool-headed.

“It’s all right. You’ll be fine soon.” Matthias promised her quietly as he continued to overpower Leyla, who was struggling, and then fixed eyes on the medicine bottle and grabbed it hastily. However, Leyla continued to thrash around relentlessly as she screamed bloody murder against his hold!

“DON’T! GET AWAY FROM ME! I DON’T WANT IT!” she screamed at the top of her lungs.


“DON’T BE STUBBORN, LEYLA,” Matthias grunted as he continued to keep her head still to force the medicine down her throat.

“MY BABY! MY FAMILY! WHO ARE YOU TO KILL MY FAMILY?!”

Matthias’ frown deepened as he looked at Leyla, thrashing and screaming around like he was the devil.

“IF YOU KEEP THIS UP, YOU’LL DIE.” He pointed out to her, sticking fingers at the side of her mouth, to open it up. A frustrated look emerged from his eyes as Leyla started to bite and scratch at his hands.

Hysterical sobs all but replaced her screams, but Matthias didn’t back down one bit.

“Sa-save it.” She wheezed at him, all frail and weakened, limbs as thin as twigs, but her grip on his hand holding the medicine bottle was stubbornly strong as she pushed it away from her.

The desperation in her voice eventually stilled his hands.

“I lied. I lied. I LIED!!!” Leyla rasped breathlessly, eyes wide and panicked as she pleaded with him, “It’s your baby! It’s only ever your baby!”

Tears that flowed nonstop soaked her fever face.

“I know,” Matthias answered without any hesitation or remorse as his resolve remained strong. It was a fact that he knew from the beginning and had never doubted for a moment. And it didn’t have any effect on Matthias’ decision.

He’d kill his child to save her.

Only Leyla was important to him.

Leyla stared at him in a daze, in complete disbelief at the man who now held her child’s life in his hands quite literally.

Matthias was steadfast. He wasn’t backing down.

“No, it’s you… it’s your baby!” She sobbed as she wheezed and pleaded with him to spare her child. Her ramblings turned inconsolable as she continued to

Leyla muttered incomprehensibly.

‘You’re going to kill the baby even though you know it’s your child?! How?!’

“I’m telling you the truth.” she sobbed, but Matthias remained silent, “It might look like you.” She tried again, but nothing. He remained quiet, and his grip on her still strong.

“The baby, it loves you. It loves you, my baby.” She rasped out, delirious and weakened. Still, Matthias remained silent, even as Leyla’s pleas became more desperate.

Of this, Matthias couldn’t comprehend the importance. Leyla continued to spout nonsense for him.

Whether the child resembles him or likes him, it didn’t mean anything to Matthias.

The child only ever served as an excuse to have Leyla by his side without making him kill her, so it was important then, but not anymore.

The child in his eyes now was nothing more than another parasite, trying to take Leyla away from him.

And Matthias could not tolerate that kind of existence. Even if it’s his child doing it.

No one would take Leyla away from him. He won’t allow it.

Renewed with this knowledge, Matthias now climbed over Leyla’s frail form, grip hardening on the medicine bottle.

“NO! DON’T DO THAT! DON’T KILL MY BABY! I’M DYING TOO! IF MY BABY DIES, I’LL DIE TOO!” Leyla wailed as she struggled with all her might. “WITHOUT MY BABY, I WILL BE ALL ALONE IN THE WORLD! I’LL DIE! I DON’T THINK I CAN STAND IT. SO… PLEASE.”

By now she didn’t even have the strength to keep her eyes open anymore, but Leyla…

She still hung on tightly to him. Matthias’ deepened more as he kept looking at her ever-weakening state, a painful lurch in his heart at her statement.

‘What about me?’ He wanted to ask, but couldn’t.

Why can’t he be her family instead? He’ll take care of her, give her everything she would ever desire.

He’d be with her always, so she won’t ever be alone.

He’s right here with her, always had been, and yet Leyla continued to say she’s alone. Had she already considered he’d never be part or important to her life then?

His grip eventually loosened up, and the medicine bottle rolled down from Matthias’ grasp as he stared down at Leyla. His hollow laughter flowed ruthlessly out his lips, as the glass bottle shattered into a million pieces as it hit the floor.

“Leyla, if you want to save your child, you should live, too.” Mathias, who opened his slowly closed eyes, looked at Leyla with a more convincing gaze.

“If you give your life to save the child, it will die anyway.” He told her gently, caressing her chin…

“Because if you die just to save it,” before his hands still and his gaze hardened. “I’m going to kill it.” He promised her. He held her face still for her to look at him, but her eyes had gone unfocused, her lips remained wordless with his threats to her child’s life.

“Listen up, Leyla….. LIVE.” he commanded her in a whisper, “LIVE… if you want to save that child. Do you

understand me?” He demanded of her.


Her hands trembled with feverish heat, but eventually, Leyla found the strength to nod a few times before she lost consciousness again.

Still, Matthias shook Leyla’s unconscious form urgently to confirm her answer. He kept at it, even as it was clear she was no longer conscious.

It ended only after Riette, who couldn’t just watch the nightmare anymore, managed to eventually pull him away from her and forcibly pulled him out of the room.

Everyone in the room could tell that if Leyla were to eventually die…

So would the child in her belly, by Matthias’ hands.










Chapter 137




If I Can’t Be Your Sky







A strange routine soon formed between Matthias and Kyle.

Kyle would step in to take care of her when Leyla came to consciousness, and Matthias would take charge as soon as she fell into a deep sleep.

It wasn’t intentional, but it just came to them naturally.

A wordless agreement between the two of them.

Fortunately, a few days later after the whole kerfuffle, Leyla’s fever was finally breaking, little by little.

The military doctor was relieved that it turned out to not be pneumonia, which was the worst-case scenario for the pregnant woman. He was also quite certain that should the woman die, he too would be killed by the major for his failure.

“All that’s left to do now is to leave it to the patient.” He cautiously informed the Major, who was holding the hand of the woman as soon as she fell asleep.


“To do that,” the doctor started anxiously, “Her comfort is of utmost importance. Please refrain from stressing her out in any way, and not handle her so roughly.” The doctor eventually laid out.

While he was afraid for whatever lashing out the major would give him, this too was necessary advice. If the Major wanted to keep the woman alive, he needed to heed this advice as well.

Matthias stood up abruptly, making everyone else in the room flinch. He remained quiet, before letting go of Leyla’s hand. Kyle, who brought her meal just in time, finally entered the room.

They locked eyes with one another.

As they continued to hold each other’s gaze, the nervous eyes of the military doctor flitted between them, as he gulped down his trepidation. Duke Herhardt and his family doctor’s son. More and more the rumors about the Duke stealing the doctor’s son’s woman were becoming more truthful with every passing time.

Fortunately, the silence did not last very long.

Matthias eventually stepped back, and Kyle finally took over his recently vacated space beside the unconscious woman. And just in time too, as Leyla finally opened her eyes.

“Kyle.” A bright, and pleasant smile spread across Leyla’s lips as soon as she saw him.

“What about the note? Did you bring your geometric note?” She asked him incoherently. Kyle gave her a soft, and despondent smile in return.

She was still half delirious and crazed from the high fever. He’d play along with her until she got better.

“Of course I brought it.” He piped up softly, wiping down gently the sweat from her forehead, “That way, I can get dinner from you.”

“No, not yet.” she mumbled, looking around with a frown.

“Don’t you want to have dinner, Leyla?” Kyle softly inquired, waiting patiently for her response.

“Uncle Bill hasn’t come yet.”

Kyle blinked back the tears stinging his eyes at the mention of him. He cleared his throat for a bit to compose himself before responding to her.

“U-Uncle Bill had told me he’d be running a little late, Leyla.” Kyle excused as he smiled brighter after rubbing his red-eyed face in a hurry.

Matthias watched them from a distance from the bed, hidden from her direct line of sight.

He watched as Leyla smiled like an innocent girl and believed Kyle’s words almost immediately, not an ounce of hesitation. And Kyle was there, carefully feeding her porridge, blowing on every spoonful to cool it down for her.

What a cozy and peaceful sight.

One he’d never had with her at all.

After watching them for a moment more, Matthias swiftly turned on his heels, quietly turning around to avoid seeing more.

As the bright sunlight poured over him as he went out into the hallway, a bitter smile paved its way to his lips.



Matthias did not return to his room until late at night. Kyle had just left the room, and now only Leyla remained in it, deeply fast asleep.

The fever was finally breaking albeit gradually, but at least Leyla’s breathing was no longer ragged and wheezing. She was breathing normally once again. Thanks to this, Matthias can observe her endlessly in the undisturbed silence. Her face was calm, almost as if she was in a pleasant dream. He didn’t know what dream she was having.

But he was certain of just one thing about it.

He wasn’t in it.

He didn’t want to think about the mess around him, but eventually, he found himself in the bathroom, cleaning himself up. He took longer than usual in the shower, hence by the time he got out, Leyla was awake.

The woman was lying still, staring up at the ceiling like an innocent child. He hesitated for a while, but Matthias still approached Leyla.

Upon hearing his nearing footsteps, she turned curiously to look at him. Eventually, it hadn’t come as a surprise to him that as soon as she saw him, her innocent and wide-eyed look was soon replaced by a frantic and unbridled fear.

“No, don’t do it!” She whispered pleadingly at him.

Matthias continued forward, stopping by the bed, and lifted the covers, watching her shrink in fear with his proximity. He found himself not minding it one bit, before pulling her closer and began to remove her clothes anyway, and proceeded to wipe down the building sweat and grime all over her body.

She gasped and whimpered at his touch, thrashing weakly in his grip, but he kept going. She shook his arm off of her weakly, and when she realized that it was useless, she covered her face with her hands.

He could have gone and ordered a woman to do this, their military wasn’t short on staff female nurses after all. But he didn’t want to let anyone else near Leyla.


He hated seeing someone else fretting over her, being with her, touching her, and seeing her the way he did now. It didn’t matter if it was a man or a woman.

Only he must be with her.

Matthias kept carefully wiping her shivering and frail body. As soon as his hands reached her stomach, his frame froze for just a moment.

While Leyla was growing weaker due to her sickness, the child kept growing persistently. He had hoped that somehow she would miscarry eventually and Leyla would be back to full health, but the child stubbornly remained healthy in her belly.

Truly it could only be his child, seeing as it was persistently sticking close to the woman, like he was. Funnily enough, while Leyla would have no qualms in leaving him behind, seemed to be quite enamored with the small parasite she was ready to even die for.

At that moment, an ugly feeling bloomed in his chest toward his unborn child.

He envied and hated the child like crazy. Back then, he only had to be content with Kyle Etman and Bill Remmer. But the old gardener was already dead, and Kyle was no threat to him.

And now this parasite of a child.

He did not doubt that Leyla would put even her favorite birds, flowers, and even grass above him. His situation was truly miserable and pitiful, and frankly pathetic, but he couldn’t get rid of his feelings for her.

‘Should I just get rid of everything?’ He wondered curiously. The urge to do it was strong, to get rid of everything in his way to be with Leyla, despite his rational side saying otherwise.

If he were to get rid of everything she loved, she would have no choice but to stay with him. A crazy thought, but he could do it, he supposed. He’d drive her mad, just as she did when she left him.

Oh.

He hadn’t seen it before.

But one day, his love will eventually kill Leyla, won’t it?

But this was how he loved her. He didn’t know how to love this woman any other way. He didn’t think he’d need to find a different way in all his life.

Matthias fixed the towel and grabbed it as he gathered his racing thoughts, calming down his breathing.

His eyes stared deep into the abyss, even as he laid down and covered Leyla in new pajamas.

“Let’s sleep”. Matthias whispered, sweeping Leyla’s hair over her forehead and cheek.


Leyla nodded at him breathlessly, and soon closed her eyes. She didn’t feel like she fell asleep. She would have just wanted to avoid it. She can’t afford to lose her bearing around a man she hated and feared so much.

Matthias remained by Leyla’s side though, despite knowing how much she hated him.

It was good to see her either way. He loved her so much, about as much as he was sick and tired of himself.



When she woke up, Leyla was in Matthias’ arms again, encased securely and gently in them. The morning sunshine seeping through the window was illuminating them beautifully together.

As her mind gradually focused back to the present, one by one her memories came flooding back to her during her fever.

She remembered vaguely complaining during her sleep. She also voiced her wishes to go out. She also remembered feeling frustrated. She only wanted to get some fresh air. And yet she remembered Matthias giving her a hard, cold glare, obviously not allowing it.

But they were all so fuzzy, they seemed surreal.

Leyla chanced a glance at Matthias, before turning her eyes to look at the sky over the open window. He was still snuggling deeply, his back to the window as his arms wrapped warmly around her. His fingers were absentmindedly stroking and caressing the small of her back, feeling like a small gentle breeze was running through her.

“Leyla.” He called out, snapping her gaze back to his now opened lids. He’d finally awoken, but then he lowered his gaze from hers and turned to the distant sky before he locked eyes with her again.

“Leyla.” He called out in a whisper, almost like her name was the only song he knew to sing. It sounded too sickly sweet in her ears, she couldn’t help but listen to him.

“Your child is okay. I’m happy it’s fine.” He hushed her gently, as he kept stroking her lovingly.

Subconsciously, she sank deeper into his arms, feeling her heart jump with hope with his gentle words.

‘It was only because he panicked after all,’ Leyla thought to herself, ‘He’s only human, the stress surely clouded his judgment. He doesn’t hate his child after all.’

“Still, I need to have it, to have you again.” he continued, before his arms marginally tightened around her frail form, “But I must admit, I find myself rather furious with it.”

Leyla’s heart leaped to her throat in his words, a cold dread slowly filling her.


“I keep watching you cherish it dearly, and yet you keep casting me aside, declaring your endless hate for me, and I can’t stand it.” He hissed, holding her closer to him with every passing statement, “I need it to have you, and yet I hate it so much because you love it so.”

She looked up at him, in a mix of trepidation and confusion. He looked straight into her eyes, as the sunlight cast shadows over his face.

Was she still in a fevered hallucination? Leyla couldn’t help but wonder.

It must be, she desperately wished. She couldn’t imagine any father talking about their child like he was. Surely this was just a nightmare she conjured up in her fever, like the many others she imagined about his torture of her.

“I know better than to do it, but I can’t help but want to lock you up all over again,” Matthias smiled at her, “Even if I hostage that child you bear, I’ll do it, so long as you stay by my side.”

He cupped her cheeks lovingly, staring at her glassy, wide eyes with great adoration.

“I can do anything, no matter how extreme, just to keep you with me.”

He kept talking. About how she drove him to be like this, and how he only knew how to be with her like this. How it pained him to see her suffering so much, getting sick and delirious. And as he spouted about himself, and his treatment of her…

The child in her belly kept moving, almost as if it loved hearing his voice, no matter how cruel his words were. Leyla couldn’t help but be mesmerized by him either.

“But I’m still so happy,” He continued as he kept smiling at her, “Because I still have you in my arms like this.”

Her mind was warring, but her body and child were settled with him.

“I’m like this, Leyla. To you, I’ll be this monster forever.” he grinned, and still, she can’t bring herself to pull away…

“And one day this monster will kill you.” He declared, “And even though I will be the death of you, I can’t help but love you anyway.”

Matthias sighed as he kept muttering nonsense to her, he then kissed the golden hair he had wrapped in one hand.

In the beginning, he knew that he would never do anything to ruin this woman’s hair. He already knew at the moment when he pledged to find and kill her, and if he couldn’t have her, he would kill her and escape with only this piece of her with him as he escaped his crazed longing.

‘My queen, the ruler of my life, how can I kill you?’ He wondered longingly as he stroked Leyla’s face in a gentle caress as if he were an old man trembling with fear in the face of such beauty.


Even when this woman kept hurting him, and tearing his heart apart, he was all too willing to smile and die to be with her. And yet…

His love was only ever poison for Leyla.

There is only one thing Matthias could do for his queen.

“Go then, Leyla,” he whispered, letting her golden locks finally slip from his grasp. His other hand still gently touched her cheeks, imprinting her blinding beauty in his memory, to burn it in his mind for eternity, making him a madman all over again.

If this was where their relationship would run its course, there’s only so much Matthias could say now.

“Get well soon,” he whispered against her skin, “-and leave me then.”

It was all he could do, wasn’t it? It was all he should ever do, and yet still, his heart was raging against it.

He let out a hollowed laugh, chuckling mirthlessly at his last command to her.

Letting her go was a death sentence to him.

He loved everything about this woman.

Her lips, her hair, her eyes, even more so when they’re filled with relentless tears. Even when she trembled at the sight of him, even when others scorned him now for his obsession with her…

He’ll bask in this hell he’d created because it led him to her.

He still wanted to keep her by his side, to take her child and shackle her with him forever even if she’ll loathe him for eternity.

He’ll gladly take up the role of her monster, the villain in her life, and proudly so just to trap her with him.

But he also knew.

The woman he loved the most, the one he was crazy in love with…

She was Leyla, one who thrived more when she was free and beautiful as a bird. Like the girl of Arvis, who for her whole life, sat alone on a rainy day in her quaint cabin, and spent the entirety reading the books she loved.

“Leyla…..If I can’t be your sky,” he rasped longingly, “Then…….. I’ll let you go…..”

Because even if he were to let her go, his love for her will never wane. Not for a long time.

He’ll bring it with him to his very grave, even if it means living endlessly in tortured pain, without salvation in sight.

“But I will love you, and I will endure this loss of you…”

‘Leyla, my dear Leyla, please.’

“So go.” Matthias’ voice was as soft as the wind. Leyla just stared at him with mesmerizing eyes. His agony and beauty were so hypnotizing to her.

“Fly into your sky…far away from me.”

‘Before my love finally kills you.’

He still couldn’t bear to say the words, but for now, he’ll settle for one last parting kiss on her forehead.

“Fare thee well, Leyla.”

The child in her stomach was fluttering light, and actively. It was still dancing enthusiastically to their father’s words. Leyla could feel a warmth wash over her with his kiss on her forehead.

What a beautiful dream this was.

And yet, what sadness it gave her in return.
















Chapter 138




On Such a Beautiful Day








The fever further simmered down, so the time for Leyla’s full consciousness to return won’t be long now. With her health gradually improving, she had taken to sleeping like a log most of the time in her recovery.


But for the most part, Kyle continued to fret over her condition and the baby’s, even when he knew the worst had already come to pass. He knew this because while he was still a novice as a medical student, he had been shadowing his father for a long time. He knew there could still be further complications that could spring up with a patient like Leyla. The fever itself would have taken a great toll on her mental and physical health.

“Uncle…” she moaned, tossing and turning in bed as she called out for her dead uncle. She must be dreaming of the past again, he mused. All Kyle could do was to stay by Leyla’s side, at best.

But the question remained. As soon as her condition gets better, what should he do next?

The answer he’d immediately concluded made Kyle’s stomach churn uncomfortably.

It is pure cruelty to leave Leyla by the Duke’s side like this. But Kyle was only more certain that the man would never let Leyla go. He would go to such lengths just to keep her with him.

Should he run away with Leyla, then? Make a break for it now, and ask forgiveness later for acting so rashly.

But where would they go?

In this time of war, nowhere was safe. The Duke would only be more likely to get himself in a position to raid where they were to reside, and he’d be branded a deserter, sentenced to die for abandoning his post.

Not to mention Leyla was with child. The travel alone could stress her so much either to an early grave, or early labor.

“Uncle Bill, help us.” Kyle quietly pleaded into the wind, raising his head to look up at the ceiling in despair.

What would Uncle Bill do?

He didn’t know. No matter how much he gave it thought, his mind came up blank on any possible solution.

All he knew was one thing, though.

He needed to flee with Leyla, far away from here. He never wanted to subject her to more of the treatment she got at the hands of the Duke.

He needed to come up with a way to escape. There was no other choice left for him.

For Leyla’s sake, and the baby’s, they needed to leave Matthias.

The door of the room opened as soon as he wanted to tear out a handful of hair from his head. And when Kyle turned to look at who’d entered, there he was as expected.

Matthias von Herhardt.

Kyle made a deliberate discourtesy of not greeting, not that the Duke even noticed anyway.

No.

He didn’t even spare a look at Kyle. His eyes already resolutely trailed on Leyla’s recovering form. In a few short strides, Matthias was back at Leyla’s side, stroking her cheeks as though he wasn’t the one responsible for making her like this.

He hated the Duke’s eyes and hands, and how they roamed shamelessly over Leyla’s body.

“I have something to discuss with you.” the Duke spoke up first, interrupting Kyle’s murderous thoughts of him.

Kyle clenched his jaw and nodded tersely.

“So speak.” he offered rather rudely, but the Duke did not react.

“Not here,” Matthias told him as he swept Leyla’s baby hair behind her ears, and finally straightened up once more.

“But leaving Leyla alone-” Kyle began to protest when the door swung open and revealed a young nursing officer who had just entered, immediately cutting off Kyle’s concerns.

Confused at the sudden newcomer, Kyle could only look back dumbly at the Duke.

“I think this is adequate to ease your concerns,” Matthias coolly pointed out, “So come, Etman, there are things I need to discuss with you.”

“I don’t have anything to talk about with Major Herhardt.” Kyle spat, unwilling to follow any more commands from such a monster.

“This is not a request, Private Etman.” Matthias stared at him indifferently, “It’s an order by your direct superior, anything less than obedience is strictly forbidden.”

Matthias’ gaze on Kyle hardened as he pulled rank once more, making Kyle snap his lips shut in an attempt to mitigate instigating the Duke’s ire. Talking back would only prove more troublesome in the future. Leyla needed him, so for now, Kyle will hold his tongue.

But before Kyle could even answer back, Matthias turned on his heels and left the room. Kyle hesitated for a moment before he eventually got up and followed suit.

The discussion between the two men lasted longer than anticipated as soon as they began a baffling conversation.

One that Kyle Etman never expected from a cruel man.








The atmosphere of the meeting held at the 6th Army Command was quite friendly. Military plans prepared for years in preparation for the war were going smoothly, and the important goal of occupying Sienna was achieved early on. It was an achievement that mocked the people who tried so hard to avoid participating in the war at all.

“Since the 4th Army is advancing to the western front, we have decided to keep the unit here as a reserve force to stabilize the rear supply line around the occupied area for the time being.” The commander standing in front of the map said forcefully.

General von Delman, who possessed a lithe body, and wore glasses, looked very fit for someone well over sixty.

“We need to overpower the troublesome guerrillas properly.”

His eyes narrowed as his fingers went up the supply road from Berg to the southern part of Lovita to the end of the baton on the map laid out in the middle of the meeting.

Lovitans in the occupied territories kept resisting back by blocking roads or cutting telephone lines. Occasionally, attacks on supply vehicles or attacks on the Bergs were gaining momentum, which raised the commander’s anger.

“That’s why we shouldn’t get too complacent in managing these occupied areas.” General von Delman reiterated, with a small hint of regret.

He consistently expressed the need to rule the occupied area with fear, but the emperor and the crown prince felt otherwise and did not take stern orders to follow the rules specified in the international treaty.

Amongst the officers in the meeting was Matthias, who sat up straight and listened carefully to the commander’s explanation of future operations and plans.

If the situation on the battlefield remains unchanged, it is likely he will be stationed in Sienna for at least a few more weeks.

Which meant he only had a limited amount of time to send Leyla away within that same timeframe. His breathing turned ragged for a while at the thought of sending her away from him, but Matthias soon regained his composure.


“Major Herhardt.” The commander’s voice cut through sharply into his attention. He’d been grazing his eyes over the commanders in the meeting gaze as he looked through barracks when they landed on the Major.

“We need a messenger to report the situation to the rear units.” the commander began, “And thanks to the guerrillas, protected by the international treaty, making communication difficult, you’d be most suitable for the task.” He finished before his eyes narrowed challengingly at the Duke.

“Besides, aren’t you close friends to His Highness the Crown Prince?”

Regardless of what Matthias wanted, the commander had already made up his mind. He knew he couldn’t do anything to change the order.

The 8th Army in the rear units was directly led by the crown prince. He was the most difficult opponent to deal with, so choosing a messenger was also quite difficult.

“Yes, General.” Matthias accepted his orders without any protest, while his mind was already turning over plans. It would be good for Leyla to leave her room for a while. The fresh air might even do Matthias some good. “I’ll get to it at once.”

Satisfied with his compliance, the general nodded at him in the affirmative before continuing.

The task wasn’t something he would normally assign to a soldier like Major Herhardt. With the rumors going around as well, he was worried that the Major had gone insane from the war as well.

Fortunately, it seemed to be just that, rumors.

Changing his mind to give a lecture on the dignity of a noble officer, the commander concluded the meeting, finally concluding it a little early. At least this afternoon, the young officers of the Berg army would have to thank the enemy for this small respite. To be exact, to the guerrillas of the enemy country who gave him this ever-growing headache.

“This matter is urgent, so you must leave as soon as possible.” He finished with those parting words to Matthias. With a throbbing forehead, he left the conference room, effectively dismissing the meeting.

Matthias stood up from his seat, when the hat he’d been wearing, toppled off his head. When he stepped out of the building after his uniform was neat and fixed enough, the dazzling sunlight almost blinded him as stray rays hit his eyes.

The sun was high up in the sky today, and it made the world shine with it.

Matthias laughed mirthlessly at himself at the thought, was he projecting himself in nature? He wasn’t sure. However, even at that moment, his upright posture and eyes did not seem shaken at all.

“We’re all set for departure, Major.” announced the driver, who had rushed to his side.

Matthias, who nodded briefly, turned around before he climbed onto the mobile vehicle.

The car carrying him soon left the square.








The strange child was still wandering in the forest and crying incessantly. Now the sound was close enough, she could hear it from the cabin.

Is he waiting for her mother? Looking for her?

Was someone looking for the child in return?

Leyla sat on a chair on the porch and pondered over it while enjoying the wind wisping past her gently. Leyla was well acquainted with the sadness of being abandoned by a mother, one that would not return no matter how long she waited.

If they were the same, she could only feel sorry for the child.

However, Leyla could not find it in herself to go looking for the child herself. She usually wasn’t so indifferent, but she feared what she’d find if she would.

“Oh, Uncle Bill!” Leyla exclaimed joyfully and leaped up to Uncle Bill, who came back with a fully-loaded cart. Her skirt fluttered as she skipped along the steps.

“There’s a child in the forest.” She informed him, and he nodded.

“All right. I see.” Uncle Bill replied thoughtfully as he was organizing his muddy tools.

“The child keeps crying,” She pointed out, as if Uncle Bill was deaf to its cries, and tilted her head at him, “What should we do?” She asked him nervously, waiting eagerly for his solution.

“I think they’re looking for their mom.” She piped up, as she stood by his side, watching him clean his tools. “Though it’s most likely they aren’t coming for them.” She finished, with a defeated sigh.

“Then you should go.” Uncle Bill finally piped up, and Leyla blinked at him in shock and confusion.

“Me?” she looked in the general direction of where she could hear the child crying. “But… I don’t know them.” She pointed out, aghast.

“That’s weird.”’ Uncle Bill, who was still looking at Leyla, burst into laughter, looking at her with a wide smile…

Yet it was equally sad.


“Leyla, do you not know them?” He questioned, “Think harder, you might be surprised to know how much you know about them.”

“Really?” She blinked at him, before frowning, huddling closer to her uncle, “So, who is it?”’

“Me? I don’t know.” Uncle Bill shrugged playfully at her, refusing to give her any clear answer.

“Go and meet them. You’ll find out when you see them.”

After saying that, Uncle Bill took his newly cleaned tools and entered the cabin.

She wanted to follow him, but Leyla eventually changed her mind and turned toward the forest path where the child’s cry could be heard.

As soon as she reached the clearing, she saw the child. It was a little boy crouched down on the side of the road in the summer forest where the birds would be singing, all snot-nosed and sniffling.

“Hello.” Leyla, who was hesitant about what to say, called out eventually in a friendly greeting. The child lifted his tear-soaked face and looked up at Leyla. His eyes were wide and blue, as clear and pretty as glass beads.

“Why are you alone?” She couldn’t help but ask, “Where’s your mom?”

Leyla carefully took another step closer, trying to appear friendly, but the child only looked at Leyla without sound or a peep from him.

Who the hell is this kid? She couldn’t help but wonder in confusion. The more she thought further about it, the child looked familiar. Yet different and unfamiliar at the same time.

Who was he?

Leyla suddenly stopped walking. Her heart was pounding and my breathing was disturbed. Leyla quickly whipped her head and looked at the cabin at the end of the road.

Today, yesterday, and tomorrow.

They were all melding together in an endless cycle.

Deep inside her, Leyla knew she would end up only here. Where every day was the beginning of

summer. Here where the buds did not bloom, and the eggs in the water bird’s nest remained the same. The same was true of the rambunctious commotion up ahead with the return of Duke Herhardt, who’d finished his service on the overseas front.

In this peaceful time, Leyla wanted to go back to the early summer of her eighteenth year, and live in it forever!

So she shouldn’t know the child, but she had to look back, and see more of the child Uncle Bill swore she would recognize.

No.

She has to go back. She still had to prepare dinner, and after that, she would study for the test with Kyle.

But…

She thought she knew the child. She should know the child.

More specifically, she thought she knew who the child would end up to be, about 20 years later. Leyla looked at him, she saw him be just like the person she hated the most in the world.

And loved as much as she hated him.

Leyla approached the child hesitantly. As she approached, one step after another…

She felt her pick up her pace before she ran and scooped the child up in her arms, and sobbed relentlessly as she snuggled him close to her breast.

The wind around them shook the forest, whipping around the two ceaselessly. When she opened her eyes again, she was riding her bike on the road leading to Arvis again.

As she turned the corner of the street, a green-colored Platanus road unfolded. A tall man in the uniform of an officer of the Berg Empire was walking leisurely down the road.

At the moment when the sound of the chain winding harmonized with the sound of the wind shaking the leaves, Leyla’s bicycle passed by the man swiftly without a second thought.

But something in her urged her to look back. She’d regret it if she wouldn’t.

And so she did. Leyla looked back bewitched, even though she thought she shouldn’t give in to it. She made eye contact with the man who was looking at her.

The moment made her heart beat faster in her chest and muted all the sounds around her.

Leyla lost her balance.

How fortunate it was that the wheels of the fallen bicycle were spinning in vain endlessly. It was like a mirror of her, and she ended up stuck looking at it, she failed to completely notice him nearing her, until his shadows blanketed her fallen frame.

He approached her. And when she looked up, she knew at that moment everything would begin again for her too. This was her undoing, and her salvation.

So at the beginning of that summer, on such a beautiful day.

Leyla slowly opened her eyes in that clear memory. She stroked her belly first. The child responded immediately in soft fluttering kicks.

‘I’m sorry.’ She sat up and apologized several times. ‘I’m so sorry to say I don’t know you, baby.’

She took a deep breath, and raised her head, before she felt her heart jump much like it did that day.

It always would beat for him, and him alone. She had mistaken it, so wrongly to be terror or great anxiety around him. And maybe there were times it was that, but that wasn’t entirely true.

She knew it now, more certain than ever what she truly felt for him.

“Leyla!” Kyle, who’d just returned back into the room immediately rejoiced as he dropped to his knees beside where she lay.

“You’re awake!” He laughed joyfully, “You’re finally awake.” He praised.

“Oh this is great news.” He beamed at her, before holding up something for her to see. “I have some excellent news for you.”

Leyla looked back at him blankly, before looking down at what Kyle was pointing at. In his hands was a document…

and the seal on it, was the Duke’s.


Chapter 139




Last Chance







Leyla had remained silent since waking up and had been presented with the documents. She read them, and understood them, her face all calm and composed.

She didn’t know whether she should be happy, or surprised. All she knew was that she was neither of those things. Nothing but a blank slate as she read them over, she just calmly nodded her head; still as tranquil as she was from the start.

“Leyla?” Kyle called out softly for her attention. She’d been so silent, that he immediately became concerned for her. He might have inadvertently worsened her condition, springing this all up when she’d just finally recovered.

“What about him?” she finally rasped out, still calm and composed, eyes looking over the room in search of him.

“The Duke’s not here.” Kyle kindly supplied. “He’d been called elsewhere.”

“And you haven’t?”

“No, I wasn’t,” Kyle responded with equal calm, not wanting to aggravate her further. “I left to deliver you the news, he was tasked to relay a message to the rear unit, where his Highness was located.”

When Leyla remained silent, Kyle continued.

“They said it’ll take about three days to complete the assignment.”

“Three…. days.” she echoed back in a hollowed voice, repeated back his words like a child learning how

to speak.

“But it’s fine now Leyla, okay?” Kyle smiled at her eagerly, “You can leave while he’s gone. No one would stop you too, because the duke gave the order.”

“I see,” she mumbled unenthusiastically.

“So you don’t have to worry anymore, Leyla.” Kyle told her soothingly, “Those documents were also drafted by the duke himself. His promise to never go after you.”


Promise. Her mind echoed uselessly. She glanced down at the documents once more and re-read them all over again, her mind still refusing to understand it.

The Duke promised to lay the groundwork for Leyla Lewellin and her child to live without any inconvenience. It was neither out of sympathy, nor a sense of duty for impregnating her after all. Just the bare minimum effort should she allow it. He even added a clause that no one would interfere nor inconvenience Leyla at all, not unless she would allow it.

He also guaranteed that the child in her womb would be named Matthias von Herhardt’s legitimate child, should she choose to allow it. But regardless of whether she did or not, she was free to raise her child as she saw fit.

He concluded it with an irrevocable acceptance of whatever she desired from him. Her wishes would not be contested.

Yet despite this, there too were still conditions she needed to fulfill. Seeing as she’s still pregnant, she will be housed in the safest region in Berg Empire territory. Should she decide to leave at a later time, she was welcome to do so, but only after she’d given birth.

It was his only stipulation, everything else was for her to decide to do.

Whether she’d go to Ratz, she had the Herhardt family lawyers at her disposal to assist in whatever she wanted to make happen.

Choice.

Respect.

Freedom.

All these three were perfectly outlined in the document, something in her twisting and coiling uncomfortably. Freedom to choose and respect for her decisions. She stared at the document that prioritized her will more than anything else. Something like that was non-existent for the entirety of the time she spent with him. This seemed too good to be true, yet why did she feel so empty now he was letting her go?

‘That morning’s conversation was not a dream.’

The single thought made her freeze. Unable to comprehend what’s next now.

“It’s too much to travel now, right?” Kyle asked Leyla impatiently. “How about leaving tomorrow?”

One look in her eyes made Kyle know that she was still too unfocused. He knew it. The news was brought too soon, too eagerly. He didn’t want to push Leyla to make a decision now, not when she hadn’t fully healed yet, but in his excitement, he forgot how fragile she still was.


In his defence, the Duke offering such a thing was completely surreal for him. He’d seen the Duke’s madness, with or without Leyla, and he’d hardly seemed willing to let her go, even when it meant killing his child.

How can he just let Leyla go? A complete 180-decision, and not a moment too soon after he swore he’d kill his child.

Even with the documents, it was still unbelievable. Which also contributed more to Kyle’s anxiety in the whole change of heart. His tune changed too quickly before, who knows how long it would take before he changes his tune again?

He’d been instructed to move in with Leyla while he was away from Sienna. They were already preparing for them a place to stay in, instead of a random house damaged by the bombing.

He figured she could stay there for the time being to recover enough to be able to handle the long journey back to Berg. And then they’d settle in Ratz.

This was the final order the Duke gave him before he left.

“Are you okay, Leyla?” he asked tentatively, and she finally looked up at him, eyes indecipherable and blank as she looked at him.

“You must still be in shock,” he began softly, smiling at her with understanding. “I know this is a lot to take in, I, too, thought it surreal.”

Kyle reached out, grasped her frail fists, and wrapped warm, gentle hands around hers. He barely held back his excitement as he knew well that it was still too early for him to celebrate.

So cold. She still felt so cold.

Where was her warmth?

“But I promise you, this is real. There is no longer any reason for you to be scared.” He beamed at her, excited for her. Now she could be free from the Duke.

He got Leyla back. His insides were giddy, and his heart full. He could almost burst into happiness at her freedom. Things could go back to the way it was before…

That summer when they were still barely adults before everything went wrong and kept going wrong.

A movement and she pulled away from him and placed the documents in her hand on the side table.

She looked at it blankly, before gingerly, she swung her legs over the bed and stood up.

Kyle instinctively reached out to help her stand, but she shook her head tersely in denial.

She wanted no help. But she couldn’t help feeling lost and empty.


So he followed her tentatively, vigilant to help should she need him. She walked a few more paces, sluggish and stumbling quite a few times as she approached the door.

The door that kept her locked in.

Frail hands wrapped around the cool metal of the knob. And she twisted.

It swung open.

The door creaked, and her eyes watered at the sight of the open door. While battered and bruised from the locks it once held, the wood of the door was completely devoid of any of it now. Her fingertips trailed in awe at the indents of the missing locks.

No more resistance in front of her, between her, and around her.

She’d gotten away.

She was truly free of him.



The car stopped once more, its wheels getting stuck in another pit of mud. It frustrated The driver so much with how much it kept happening, that by now, he gave up on getting there within schedule.

“I’m sorry, Major.” Apologized the troubled driver. Matthias only gave him a slight nod of acknowledgment before he got out of the car.

The downpour of rain for the past two days had practically turned the muddied road into mush. But it was the best route they could take, with the rest of the proper roads and bridges turned to rubble by the ongoing war.

“The sun is going to set soon, by then it’ll be too dangerous to move at night.” Said the lieutenant with a concerned look as he observed the skies overhead. Sunset would begin soon.

“If we continue with our course, we’ll reach a base for our unit within an hour.” Matthias assessed. “Let’s stop there for the night.”

“Yes, Major.” Agreed the lieutenant, immediately heading off to help the other two soldiers in pushing their vehicle out of the mud pit, while barking orders.

Matthias took note of the time, before pulling out a single stick of cigarette, and lit it up. He smoked for a moment before he started to ask himself the questions he’d never answer.

Once he returns, he knows he won’t be with Leyla anymore. But that didn’t mean he wanted to waste his time like this either.

But that’s just it.

His whole time and existence will end up being wasted without her by his side.

A bitter smile appeared on his lips, recognizing the growing nervousness in himself. His days will end up like this.

Full of blandness and routine. Nothing will change in his life anymore now that she would leave him.

Perhaps he should also hurry up and let her go as well.

The front here was stable. Even if the guerrilla is in trouble, it will not be difficult to advance because the troops and supply lines in the rear are stable. However, the crown prince was concerned about the overly quiet Confederate forces.

Matthias himself had the same concern.

They had a huge setback from the beginning, and even now, the enemy’s strategic locations are falling more quickly than before. It was an odd pattern. It didn’t add up at all.

While the rest of their troops thought it to be an overwhelming victory, a small voice in the back of his head kept reminding him of the possibility it was a strategic loss instead of the Lovitan forces.

What if there was a trap being put in place? What if at this very moment, the supply routes for the Berg army are being blocked and scavenged, especially now that they’re deep in Lovitan territory?

The crown prince expressed concern assuming the worst case. Of course, General Fondelman, who is confident that there are no more countries left to help the Confederacy, will not back down Emperor’s will.

It was Ettar, the kingdom across the sea, who held the key to the situation. They, who were the most trusted allies of Lovita, have already been sluggish for months and avoiding participation.

It would be nice to remain as a traitor, but it was difficult to be optimistic because Lovita would try to drag them down to the front even if it grabbed them by the collar.

If any counterattack begins, Sienna will turn into ground zero of a full-scale war between the two regions.

Before that could happen, he needed to quickly find a way to send Leyla back to Berg.

“It’s over, Major!”

The soldiers who were ready to depart raised their voices and called him.

Matthias, who finally stopped smoking as he stomped out the cigarette into the cold, muddy ground, began heading towards them when he suddenly stopped with a frown.

His eyes narrowed as he immediately began scanning their surroundings. Noticing the sudden change in him, one of his soldiers thought to point it out.


“Major, are there more prob-” he was immediately hushed when Matthias held a hand up to stop him from speaking any further. The rest of his men also stopped whatever they’d been doing, waiting for what Matthias was seeing to make itself known to them as well.

They were already near the base, but that didn’t matter.

With no warning aside from the ominous churning in their guts, men from all around them sprung up in camouflaged outfits and ambushed them!

Gunshots rang throughout the desolate road, and birds had fled from the trees they’d rested in, effectively disturbing the once peaceful country road.



Three days had passed since they left. Yet there wasn’t a sight of him returning.

Leyla couldn’t help but fret over his absence. Her mind was unable to settle with not knowing where he could be as she stayed vigilant by the window, waiting to catch any sight of him.

With a click and a turn on the door’s knob behind her, her heart leaped from her chest in anticipation, before she saw who it had just arrived.

Her heart felt a little dismayed upon seeing it was Kyle.

Kyle was looking at her with an encouraging and gentle smile.

“Are you ready?” he asked her kindly.

Deep down, he tried not to show his disappointment at seeing how eager Leyla still was to wait for the Duke’s return. He knew that’s why she kept watching by the window.

She wanted to see the Duke return.

“It’s time to go now, Leyla.” He gently prodded. He knew it was still difficult for her to move around, much less travel back to Berg but anywhere was better than staying in what is essentially a warzone. Especially for a pregnant woman.

“Kyle…” Leyla began to protest, but Kyle decided to push forward.

“This is all you need, right?” he asked as he calmly picked up her luggage bag at the end of the bed, trying to keep his tone light and kind.

“I’m… Kyle…” She persisted, and at this, he couldn’t help but sigh.

“You have to leave the man, Leyla.” He urged her, his expression turning serious and pleading as he looked her in the eye.


He wasn’t going to lie to himself, or to her. But since the Duke told him of letting go of Leyla, he’d succumbed to his fantasies of living his dream of being with Leyla.

The war would soon end, and they’d live in Ratz, wed with each other and he’d raise her kid like his own.

And somewhere along the years they’d be together, perhaps raising his child with her too.

They’d be the happy family they’d always dreamed of having. He was on cloud nine until he saw Leyla’s reaction upon waking up.

He was not what she wanted in the end.

“I’m not trying to force you to come back to me.” Kyle added when she saw her beginning to protest once more, “I thought you knew me better than that, Leyla.” he smiled sadly at her.

His wishful thinking was just that. A fairytale-like future that would forever remain in his mind, but never in reality.

He already knew it. He wasn’t going to lie to himself about this either. After all, he’d been her best friend first, before she accepted him as her lover.

And that was the Kyle she wanted. The Kyle she missed. Not him who loved her, but he who was just content to be her friend.

He’d want nothing more than to play the blind fool in love with her. But he can’t forever play the fool or be blind to the truth.

Leyla would never want him to raise a child, not his own. Even more so when she doesn’t love him as much as he loves her.

It was her undeniable truth. Their undeniable truth.

But that didn’t mean he didn’t want to see her find her happiness and heal from all the hurt she’d gone through.

He’d learn to be content as her friend instead because as much as he wanted to be with her, he’d rather see her happy instead.

“All I want is for you to be happy.” He began, a frown marring his features as he looked at her, “And forgive me for saying this, but that man can never make you and the child happy.”

With all the things the Duke did to her, was willing to do to her…

All he’d seen was Leyla suffering just to be by his side. And she’d not had a single moment to heal any of the hurt before he gave her more and newer traumas.

It would mess anyone up. And Leyla was no exception.


“You’re not in the right mindset right now.” Kyle explained to her gently, “Believe it or not, this whole ordeal left you quite unable to make proper judgments as of this moment. So please, can you trust me for now?”

Unable to contest his claims, Leyla fell silent as she fretted over what her head was saying and what Kyle was telling her.

She should be able to understand him. After all, it wasn’t as though Kyle was lying to her.

He’d bullied her, blackmailed, and raped her. Coerced her forcefully or willingly to be with him. It was obvious he didn’t love her at all. Everything was just an obsession and desire thought to be love.

But it wasn’t.

Love shouldn’t have to hurt.

It was not love at all, even when she thought it could be.

Kyle, who approached, held Leyla’s hand. And slowly, but firmly moved toward the door of the room. Leyla followed Kyle in a dazed mood as if walking on a cloud, unable to see beyond her worries about leaving the Duke behind.

To see she had left him behind.

Just as the door in front of her opened up, Marquis Lindman showed up in front of them, making their trek outside the room come to a halt.

“Are you going to leave?” He asked with no qualms, as he leaned against the wall in front of them.

His eyes were sharp and indifferent, even as his gaze landed on her.

“Miss Lewellin, are you going to just leave him?”

“The Duke himself allowed her to leave.” Kyle shot back at him with a stern glare, “So this isn’t any of your concern.”

He blocked Riette from getting closer to Leyla, and the nobleman’s attention shifted to him.

“You think you’re different from him?” He asked Kyle critically, who bristled at the implication.

“We’re in a hurry, Marquis Lindman, so if you’ll excuse us, we have places to be.” Kyle huffed out indignantly, trying to lead Leyla away when Riette persisted.

“Look, I’m not making any excuses for Matthias, okay? He’s sick and crazy for doing those things, but-” He looked pleadingly at Leyla, whose eyes were now on him, looking from behind Kyle’s shoulder.

Looking at him expectantly as if she was just waiting for a reason to stay.

“Ms. Lewellin, he came all this way just for you.”

“Marquis!”

“Matthias wouldn’t do that for just anyone. Wouldn’t give up his marriage, and volunteer for a high-risk mission when he had an out.”

Riette persisted, and Leyla’s heart clenched in her chest.

“Wouldn’t come all this way to get you back if he didn’t have feelings.”

He looked so earnest, pleading with her to understand. But she couldn’t let her hopes get up.

He’s only obsessed with her.

He’s only ever wanted her because she was beautiful and easy to break when he wanted. Nothing more.

“What are you talking about?” She murmured, her heart already filling with treacherous hope.

“He broke off his engagement, just before volunteering to take the lead on this front. So he can come to get you back from Sienna.” Riette informed her.

He looked bashful and embarrassed in admitting it, just as Leyla’s cheeks flushed with warmth and happiness at hearing about his effort to come to get her.

“It changes nothing.” Kyle interjects seriously as he glares at Riette, “He’s letting Leyla go because he knows it’s what’s best for her.”

At this, he turned to Leyla.

“And just because he’s not marrying Lady Claudine, does not negate every horrible thing he’s done to you either.”

“No, Kyle-“

“And if you think it’s for the child’s best interest, then think again as well, Leyla,” Kyle continued, “Do you truly think, after what he just tried to do, he’d make a good father?”

Her child.

That’s right. She had her child to think about.

At the sudden reminder, Leyla looked down to look at her swollen belly.

His feelings, whatever they were, they’re not normal. Whatever he feels for her and her child, would never be.

Perhaps he knew this fact too, and that’s why he finally let her go.

Set her free.

Set them both free of him.

“Miss Lewellin-” Riette tried protesting by urging her to search for his feelings and ignore logic instead, but Kyle stood resolutely between them, calling for her to think rationally rather than with her heart.

“Please, just give him one last chance.” Riette pleaded with her, “Be his miracle.”

Kyle looked at her softly, yet imploringly all the same.

“It’s time to go, Leyla.”
















Chapter 140




That’s All







It was a day later, in the afternoon, when the unit they sent out to send a message to their prince finally returned. Everyone felt relief upon their return, but it soon turned into a grim atmosphere upon seeing the state of their soldiers. Upon giving their report, the higher-ups were made aware about the ambush they encountered. One of them got injured by a gunshot and had immediately been rushed to their makeshift infirmary to get treated.

The others, who had minor injuries, were treated briefly before they immediately resumed their way back to Sienna.

As soon as they arrived, it was only then revealed that the injured party was none other than Matthias von Herhardt. He’d forgone getting treated as he prioritized informing the Crown Prince first of the


recent developments. As soon as Riette heard the news, he immediately made his way towards the infirmary, just in time to see Matthias finishing his treatment.

“I heard you got hurt. Are you okay?” Riette asked with great concern, eyes raking over his cousin’s figure worriedly. He didn’t look to be in pain, or in any way injured at all.

Had he heard wrong after all?

Without bothering to acknowledge, or even answer his question, Matthias just bypassed him with an indifferent expression, carrying the unmistakable smell of disinfectant.

“Hey, answer me! Where did you get hurt? How did you get hurt?” Riette asked after him, hastily matching his strides, “And what happened with Miss Lewellin?! Why did you let her go so suddenly, huh? Answer me!” Riette demanded when Matthias made no indication he was even listening to him.

He remained resolutely silent for a few moments, before half-heartedly answering the questions sent his way before leaving him in the dust once again.

Not even a single emotion was shown on Matthias’ face as he answered the questions nonchalantly.

He’d gone back to that perfect Duke of Arvis persona of his, and Riette didn’t like how he regressed to his usual self.

“Has the war made you deaf, after all?” Riette asked in disbelief, still persistent in getting answers. Real answers.

He’d seen how Matthias was all his life. Known for his stubbornness and wilfulness all his life.

There was no way he’d let go of Leyla so easily, and go back to the shell he once was. Not when he’d seen how crazy Matthias had acted when it came to Leyla. And now he’d just let her go like that? Back in the arms of the doctor’s son, no less?

It was unbelievable. And that’s why Riette couldn’t help but feel so unsettled by this abrupt change. It was so unlike Matthias. The Matthias they all knew to be.

They soon reached Room 308, and Matthias stood in front of it with darkened eyes.

The first indication Riette had that his cousin was indeed affected by these things.

He can’t even hide his current displeasure from Riette right now. The conflict was warring visibly in his expression.

His anger, his acceptance.

His resignation, and his expectations.


They emerged back and forth as if Matthias is arguing deep within himself about how he should handle these things. Anyone else would have missed these minuscule facial changes. But Riette has been watching Matthias all his life.

He’d learned to read him in that time as well. The word was at the tip of his tongue but…

‘Dickhead’ Riette thought instead, unwilling to say anything worse about his cousin, even in the shelter of his mind. He pursed his lips to a thin line as he waited to see what Matthias would do.

Wasting not a moment more, Matthias reached out to grasp the handle of the door and twisted.

As soon as it opened, it revealed a well-lit room, from the shining sun outside the room’s windows.

Every mess he’d seen before he left, was now pristinely arranged and fixed.

There wasn’t even a trace of a woman’s touch left behind.

Not a trace of Leyla was left for him.

Matthias remained there for some time as he had wrapped and held the door handle with whitened knuckles. His eyes wandered all over the room in silence. On Matthias’ face was a slight, yet despairing smile.

He did it. He finally did it.

He let her go, and she left.

And took his purpose and heart with her in the process.

And yet instead of the burning need to have her back, the obsession to know where she’d gone and the madness of her leaving him overwhelming him like it once did…

There was only a calm acceptance washing over him.

Leyla was forever lost to him after all.

She wouldn’t forever be his, after all.

And it made him feel so empty inside. Yet for now, the emptiness was bearable. Manageable.

There was no point in denying it. All he had left to do was to get used to the empty feeling inside him with time. For this is how he’ll live out the rest of his life without her by his side.

Matthias, finally and quietly, crossed the threshold of the room. Riette dutifully followed after him.

“The guts you have, doing such a crazy thing just to end up like this.” Riette finally spoke up, “You left Claudine behind, and insulted her in front of many people, just to come here, and proceed to torment Miss Lewellin. And you let her go, just like that?”


Riette couldn’t help but ask incredulously. The anger in him simmered up to a boil the more he thought of all the trouble Matthias left in his wake to pursue a woman, who he was just going to let leave so easily.

It was insulting as it was despicable.

Matthias only proceeded to unload his things and change his clothes to more comfortable ones.

Riette wanted to keep going, to let rip the insults and curses he had prepared for Matthias when he finally caught sight of the bloodied shirt underneath the thick and dark coat of their army on Matthias.

A shiver runs up his spine at the amount of blood on it.

Ignoring his sudden silence, Matthias removed his bloodied shirt, to reveal his bandaged torso, which seemed to be sporting an ever-growing red spot, albeit minutely.

“That’s where you were shot.”

“It barely grazed my skin,” Matthias answered dryly before he laid down on the bed and he finally looked at Riette, who’d begun to approach him, swearing under his breath at Matthias’ lack of self-care.

“Judging by how you look, you should be hospitalized.”

“This is the battlefield.”

“Exactly. It’s a battlefield. Getting shot could get you killed!”

Riette knew that hospitalization or transportation to the rear units where it was safer was next to impossible being this deep in a war zone, especially with this type of injury during the war. But he couldn’t control his worry over his cousin.

And yet Matthias remained to stare at him unbothered by his still-bleeding wound, leaning against the head cushion.

“You’re crazy,” Riette muttered softly, to which Matthias acknowledged with a mirthless chuckle. At that moment, great fatigue washed over Matthias’ face, broke eye contact with him, and just stared off into the space in front of him.

“I want to rest, Riette.” He answered.

The first real answer he gave Riette since his return. Blinking his eyes back slowly, he could faintly hear his cousin muttering more about his craziness, but Matthias couldn’t find it in himself to contest the claim.

His woman just left him, presumably to be taken care of by someone else that wasn’t him, and would never be him. And he’s stuck here in the middle of the war, pretending he was fine with all of this.

Indeed, only a crazy man would live through this.


Riette watched as Matthias kept smirking to himself before his cousin slowly swung an arm over his eyes to block out the sun from hitting his eyes.

He watched as Matthias’ breathing evened out to slow, and rhythmic breathing, before Riette finally decided to leave him alone.







“It’s hot.”

It was what she said on the last night they spent together.

Leyla, who woke up after tossing and turning, whispered to him with her eyes wide open. Of course, Matthias thought she saw him as either Bill Remmer or Kyle Etman, and looked at her with a disdainful expression.

“It’s hot. It’s frustrating.”’ She kept complaining before she pulled the blanket down, acting like an irritated child about to throw a tantrum.

Matthias moved to stop her before he went to the bathroom and brought a towel soaked in cold water. Lately, he’d gotten good at wiping only the edge of her forehead gently so that her body temperature did not drop too much.

“I want to go out!” Leyla whined again at him, just as soon as he put down the wet towel. Eyeing her dryly, he quickly noted she was still half-asleep the entire time.

Matthias sat in a chair on the side of the bed and covered it with the blanket that Leyla had removed in her fit.

“This is frustrating! I want to go get some fresh air!”

“Not now.” Matthias whispered sternly, even as he soothed and swept Leyla’s hair away from covering her forehead. Leyla’s pale face was as clear as the light of dawn when she asked

“It’s still cold and dark outside, Leyla.”

“But I still want to go! I’m going to do whatever I want!” She huffed out before she blinked back bleary eyes as she stared right into his eyes, “I live to torment you, after all. I need to.” She grumbled, even half-delirious.

Matthias’ chest tightened.

“Leyla-“

“I hate you so much…” she trailed off, “So I’m going to torture you as much as I can.’’

Her threats would have sounded more convincing if it wasn’t for the obvious fact she was falling right back asleep. She was sleep-drunk, and actively insulting him, but he couldn’t help but smile anyway now that she was seeing him.

He could live with her like this, every day. He’d accept her hate if he couldn’t have her love.

“So torture me.” He begged her, even as he whispered the words enticingly at her. Leyla’s eyes only became blank at his answer. Blinking fast as she fought hard to stay awake to keep her torment over him.

“Torture me, as much as you want.”

“Really?” she asked, eyes wide, yet still on the verge of sleep.

“Really.”

She hummed, eyes closed as though she was deep in thought.

Her next words were beginning to sound slurry.

“Of course, you have to.” Her eyes were already half-closed. She proceeded to mutter a few incoherent words after that but soon returned to a night of deep sleep.

Matthias, who had been looking at the figure endlessly, reached out to hold Leyla’s limp hand before he turned to the window, and watched as the morning dawned and the warm sun shone. The window was opened up a little, and let the sea breeze that blew in envelop him in a pleasantly cool and soft feeling.

With Leyla’s hands held tightly, he sat down deeply against the nearby chair, enjoying the sun and wind, and before his eyes drifted closed slowly.

The lovely woman who looked at him not too long ago as though she was pampering him with affection, was about to disappear the moment she woke up. Reality will come again and destroy his fantasy.

Her eyes would continue to look at him with great disdain and rejection.

She’d never change how she felt about him.

And so he planted his last forehead kiss on her sleepy head. Just for this moment, he would think this as a continuation of their lovely times together, even as she revealed her love to him back then to be all just a lie.

Let him have this moment with her.

This would be his last after all.

So that the intimate and sweet time can be kept as the last memory of the time we spent together.

Matthias was content to bring this memory to his grave.

That was enough.

It had to be.

It wasn’t until the long sunset of the impending evening that Matthias lowered his arm from covering his face. His gaze at the rosy sky was as still as the serene evening landscape.

He was alone.

He let her go, and she left. And he was left behind.

That was all.








The person who delivered the gift box to Leyla was the soldier who organized and brought the luggage from home.

“It seems like an important item.”

When Leyla looked at him curiously, he hesitated to explain.

“It was in the box. The box in the kitchen, next to the grocery box.”

“Ah…” Leyla’s eyes widened in realization. It was Uncle Bill’s belongings!

She had ignored it at first, unable to see the last vestiges of the man she considered her father. And then Matthias happened, and she forgot about it completely!

Leyla hurriedly accepted it after thanking him. After the soldier who carried the luggage to the room left, Leyla found herself to be alone again.

She sat on a chair by the window with a box tied with a pretty ribbon in her hand. Her residence was a small wooden house on the side of the road near the beach. Most of the furniture remained intact as if the landlord’s family had rushed to evacuate.

She felt ashamed to be living in such a nice house, so Leyla decided to use the guest bedroom. She wanted to just stay quiet for a while here, and leave no trace she’d live in the house when she would move again.

Because she resolved she would be leaving.

She needed to leave.

Over and over she muttered the words to herself, to remind her not to stay and hope for more. It was just not realistic.

But why did every distance she put between her and him, left her feeling like she was being choked up by a collar in her neck?

Matthias reportedly returned to Sienna a day later than expected. That was all Kyle said, and Leyla didn’t dare ask anymore.

She needed to remind herself it was all over now.

She couldn’t believe it, but it was. Kyle was right. Just because he ended up not marrying Claudine didn’t make everything he did to her valid. That much she could see he was right about.

But her days were still spent with her obsessing over the Duke, even as she watched over the peaceful scenery beyond the window. Gone was the intense sadness, pain, and hate in her heart as the reality of him setting her free finally settled in her.

What was left behind was just the hollow feeling that she was alone.

Again.

It was not until the evening, when the nursing officer was supposed to stop by, that Leyla caught herself looking at the empty road in a daze. She saw the box of Uncle Bill’s things.

And then an impulse came over her!

All of a sudden, she found herself unwrapping the ribbon on the box, and placing it on her knee. As soon as she lifted the lid off…

Her hands began to tremble at the sight of its contents.

In it…

Was a beautiful pair of baby shoes.

‘He knew…’ was her first thought, before laughter and tears welled out of her as she gazed at Uncle Bill’s final gift to her.

To them.

‘I have something to tell you, so let’s have a party.’

It didn’t click in her at all, until this very moment what her uncle meant while saying those words as he kept stroking her head. He must have been trying to welcome the child, with such a pretty gift.

He must have wanted to tell her she didn’t have to hide anything from him at all.

For just as he loved an orphaned girl who suddenly appeared in the mail carriage one day, he was willing to love her child, too.

‘Uncle…’ tears kept spilling out of her, even as she wailed and laughed at the same time.

A few moments later, now calmed down, Leyla got up after scrubbing her wet eyes. The white baby shoes were put back in a box and packed deep into the luggage bag.

‘I’ll live well.’ Leyla promised her Uncle’s soul.

She was alone for now, but not forever. She still had a purpose.

And now every hollow feeling that filled her heart, was soon replaced with overwhelming acceptance and grief at the same time. She hadn’t imagined she’d get this far without him, but she made a promise to Uncle Bill.

She can do anything if he believes her. She’d grow up to become a decent adult and do everything well. He made sure to allow her to be one. Made sure she knew, even as he died, that he believed in her ability and capability.

Still believes in her, even.

So it was her turn now to believe in herself. She had to repay him because he believed her.

“Let’s leave, baby,” Leyla said resolutely to the child who was yet to be born. Uncle Bill wouldn’t want to see his daughter sitting helplessly like this.

The Duke will keep his promise. She knew that.

He was just that kind of man. He was cruel and mean, but he kept his promises, no matter how twisted they got.

Leyla still hated him. She didn’t think she would ever forgive him for the things he made her do. But oddly enough, she trusted him without fail.

Just as his feelings for Leyla were not normal, so were Leyla’s feelings for him.

She hated him, yet she longed to stay with him too.

They were like that. They’d always been like that. And that was not normal. It was not healthy.

She watched as the sunset began out of the window, and finally, Leyla learned to stop closing the curtains from falling before her story would even end.





Matthias stopped on the road where Leyla’s residence could be seen.

He found himself always stopping by. Checking up on her when he could. He would wander on this road several times a day, but he never crossed the line he drew.

Matthias knew it wouldn’t be easy letting her go.

He wanted to see her, but the desperate need in him stubbornly remained. He knew he shouldn’t. But like an addict trying to get clean, he needed to wean her out of his system, bit by bit.

And then he won’t end up looking for her when she’d truly be unreachable for him.

It was still hard for him to turn around and leave her be, not when he knew she was just within reach. He was as presentable as ever and made sure to clean up nicely whenever he’d stop by several times a day but…

He knew nothing would change beyond this.

He’d be stuck always watching her from afar. And he’d have to live with this. He would be okay, eventually.

As long as she lived well, and he could see her, even at a distance every once in a while, he’d be okay.

Therefore, he had to endure this kind of life well.

He knew that sometimes, Leyla would be informed of some news about the Duke of Arvis. The news didn’t shy away from any mentions of him after all, and even if he was broken up inside with her leaving, he didn’t want to appear affected by it. He had a reputation and image to keep after all.

But it didn’t stop him from thinking about her day in and day out.

She was his first love.

And she would also be his last love.

Of course, Matthias intended to survive the life of an empty shell. As long as Leyla is alive somewhere in the world, he would survive being without her.

But he didn’t think there would be a day in this life when he would love and yearn for someone again.

Someone who wasn’t Leyla.

No one else was as beautiful and as desirable as her.


If Leyla didn’t exist, he wouldn’t ever know what real beauty looks like. Even if she’d been gone, no one would ever compare to her. They would all fall short, without fail.

So he’d live as a shell, a sham of a human, for as long as he breathes.

So Matthias turned away again, hoping that this wound would never heal from her. The edge of his coat shook behind him as he walked slowly, the chill of the wind making it flutter around him as he walked away.

Even though he knew he would come back here again, and leave without seeing her once, he visited this place every day in perfect shape, not wanting to look less than his best for her.

Just in case he ran into Leyla by chance.

If he had to be hated anyway, he wanted to at least be a wonderful man physically for her. Even if it was meaningless for Leyla, Matthias hoped it counted for something at least.

Laughing mirthlessly to himself about the stubborn pride he had over his image, Matthias found himself returning to the town’s square.

The air around the Berg Army had shifted. He didn’t know what caused it, but he just knew something had changed since he’d been gone to visit an oblivious Leyla.

There was a sense of urgency, and anxiety in the air, even as the soldiers weren’t actively trying to prepare for any confrontation with enemy soldiers.

“Major!” a soldier called for him, hurriedly rushing to his side and saluting him upon sight of him.

Matthias frowned, sensing trouble already was here. A sensation backed upon by the message just relayed to him.

“Ettar’s army has joined Sienna’s landing operation. An emergency meeting has been called and all commanders have been ordered to attend!”


Chapter 141




I’m Here







A blockade was issued as soon as the war clouds began to roll by. The order was immediately relayed to all civilians. Movement in and out of the city was immediately suspended, hence no one could either enter or escape from the city.

Kyle paced in front of the headquarters with a worried look on his face as he wandered about the barracks.

It had come so quickly and left them all rattled and unprepared, as such, the plan to send Leyla back to Berg was halted.

Everything had suddenly gone wrong in such a short time.

Ettar, who became a traitor and put the entire Berg Confederacy in trouble, eventually decided to participate in the war and sided with Lovita. And Sienna ended up being in the middle of the warzone, seeing as the surrounding regions of both confederates soon began to pick their sides.

Most of the higher-ups feared an imminent recapture of Sienna would soon take place.

Kyle’s expression after checking the watch on his wrist became more anxious. He could no longer afford to wait for Leyla to recover sufficiently, or even wait for the legal documents to come through to allow them to travel back to Berg. There wasn’t any news from command, but the alert that the enemy was just around the corner made things so tense around the barracks, it could be seen plainly by the urgency in each soldier’s actions around camp.

Gone was the easy-going air around the camp before, now replaced with baited breaths and tense postures as everything could go wrong at a snap of a finger.

Sienna had once again become a dangerous battlefield that could be engulfed in gunfire at any moment. Thus the need to get Leyla out of this city right now was becoming more imperative, but how would they break through the blockade?

When the hot bloods in command managed to calm down enough, the officers finally left the privacy of the command tent after the high-tension meeting.

Kyle found Mathias in a heartbeat.


As expected, he acted no differently than usual. They both met each other’s eyes from time to time before they would part ways. This time, Kyle needed him.

“What’s happening in the borders?” Kyle urgently asked after him, strides matching the Major hurriedly.

He needed to have hope they still had some time to leave.

But Matthias’ gaze only hardened. He needed not to say a word more. Kyle knew they won’t be allowed to leave now.

“Then Leyla…” Kyle trailed off with a muttered fretting, but Matthias finally spoke up, interrupting his worries.

“Leyla will leave Sienna soon,” Matthias spoke confidently to him. Kyle frowned in confusion.

“But aren’t civilians forbidden to pass through the blockade as well?” His question was ignored, Matthias continued.

“Kyle Etman, can you drive?”

“What?” Kyle frowned, before hesitantly answering, “Yes, I can. But why are you…” Kyle trailed off as he followed the stern gaze Matthias had off at a distance.

On the other end of his gaze, was a row of rushing ambulances in and out of the camp. This had been going back and forth for a while now since the issuance of the blockade.

As far as they knew, critical patients are being transported out of their camps, and towards the military hospital nearby, yet far enough away to be safe from any enemy attacks.

“Are you seriously thinking-” Kyle looked to the Duke incredulously, who only gave him a pointed stare.

Silence reigned between them as the two men made a wordless conversation.

Whatever the Duke was planning, it was clear that he had already made up his mind.



Leyla closed the luggage bag after checking it one last time.

She then put on thick-soled shoes, as well as buttoned a thick winter coat tightly around her frail body.

All that was left for her to do was to go out to the meeting place at the time Kyle specified for her.

She had finished early with a few hours left before she needed to leave, but her nerves were beginning to become frazzled. Things were progressing much more quickly than she thought they would be, and now she found herself having to escape from Sienna in just a few short hours.

She never expected to be this nervous about leaving Sienna.


Kyle had informed her that he was put in charge of driving an ambulance to transport a critically ill patient outside of Sienna and towards the rear units where the military hospital was located.

He gave her specific instructions that she would need to hide in the ambulance so they can get out of the blocked city. Accompanying them was Marquis Lindman, who had been summoned to return to the rear unit as well.

He made no mention of Matthias at all, but Leyla just knew he was the mastermind in this risky escape plan for her. Who else would come up with such a scheme just so she’d be safe after all?

She can’t be wrong about this.

But it seemed the time for her to leave him had finally come as well.

Leyla had thought about everything over and over again as she prepared to leave. It was all she found herself being able to do.

She’s about to leave this city, the man, and the days of oppression by him would soon be nothing but memories for her.

To forget everything and start a new beginning with her child. There will be no shadow of a Duke anywhere in that future life.

That’s right.

This was the best thing to happen to both him and her.

Unable to sit in her thoughts in silence anymore, Leyla rushed to open the curtains a little. The bright pale white light from the moon immediately flooded the room she was in.

Marquis Lindman said he would come around to pick her up here while Kyle would busy himself driving the ambulance he was assigned to, towards the specified location. She will go with him to where Kyle would be waiting for them.

A simple plan, hardly anything would go wrong if nothing interfered.

And least of all, Matthias will not come to even bid her goodbye.

Her chest clenches at the thought. He was letting her leave. She knew he was a man of his word, but still…

Unbidden, her hand came to rub her swollen belly in yearning. Her child would have to leave behind a good father.

She can’t help but mourn for the bond they would never have.




This should be a secret that only three to four people would know. For Matthias’ sake, Riette had kept his thoughts to himself, but everyone in on it already knew.

Violating the military order given by the commander during the war is a serious crime that cannot be covered, or pardoned by any brilliant acts or miracles Matthias was planning to make during the war. He wanted to know why his cousin would go to such great lengths to do something so criminal that it could lead him to be tried in front of a military court.

And what he was thinking at the moment he agreed to help him do it!

Riette splashed water on his face and wiped it dry after a deep sigh. Across from him, Matthias sat.

Both cousins were now seated and staring at the darkness beyond the window with contemplative looks. Gone was the intense look he had when outlining his plan to sneak Leyla through the blockade moments earlier.

“You can leave.” He dismissed as if he had sensed Riette’s anxiety. Their eyes met each other, but Riette made no move to leave just yet.

“Is there nothing else I can do besides this?” Riette had to ask.

He knew what he had to do. He was just to head to the ambulance and returned to the rear units, where he’d been originally assigned to.

Now if he were to fetch and bring Leyla along on his way to the ambulance, that wasn’t exactly disobeying orders. He’s still hitching a ride out of Sienna in an ambulance, after all. Just an ambulance with a stowaway.

Officers leaving the barracks during a war weren’t necessarily out of place. An officer in a hurry to leave in the threat of war during a blockade even more so. Hence, their leaving wouldn’t raise any eyebrows or bring any unnecessary attention to them.

Not unless they catch wind that Leyla would be coming along with them.

“Well then, I’ll consider this as a debt paid.” Riette sighed, “But not with you, Duke.”

“Debt?” Matthias’ eyes narrowed at his cousin’s words possessively, and Riette would have scoffed in amusement if he wasn’t so relieved to find an ounce of expression in the stoic man.

“It was a while ago when I joked around Miss Lewellin and caused her an accident.” Riette explained, “So I’ll do this one risky thing for her. As penance for my teasing from before.”

A beat of silence reigned between them before Matthias spoke up.

“I guess you’ll propose to Claudine soon now that our engagement is broken off officially, right?”

Riette blinked in surprise.

“H-how can you tell?”

Matthias only smirked at his look of surprise. To be honest, Riette expected Matthias to be a little mean and callous about this, but he seemed so at ease. As if there was nothing to worry about.

“How long have you known?” Riette couldn’t help but ask with a resigned sigh. Matthias shrugged.

“Can’t exactly tell you when I knew,” Matthias replied. But he’d known for a long time that the two had feelings for each other. The pieces just clicked together one day and shrugged the information away. When Claudine had pieced things together between him and Leyla, well, he couldn’t help but laugh at the irony of it all.

“Had you known about it then? Before you got engaged to Claudine?”

“Yes.”

“And yet you went with it anyway?” Riette couldn’t help but ask bitterly.

“I didn’t agree on it for the union,” Matthias said in a matter-of-factly tone. And Riette sighed once again, losing whatever building ill will he had upon the revelation.

“Yes, yes, you were very unfortunate and yet successful back then,” Riette remarked back dryly at him.

For Matthias, marriage was just another means to expand his business. Claudine was no different from entering a school worthy of the family’s honor and succeeding in the family business.

They would have been perfect for each other, Riette thought mirthlessly, if only they got along and saw where the other came from instead of being blinded by their lust and greed.

Riette might have grown with him, but there’s much he’s yet to know about his cousin, but he’s only ever certain about him with one thing, and one thing alone, no matter how long a time would pass.

Matthias von Herhardt loved Leyla Lewellin.

And he let her go because of it.

“I changed my mind. I will never be sorry for you.” Riette declared to him with a stiff smile, and the Duke just shrugged nonchalantly.

“Do as you wish.”

Matthias once again marked the end of the meaningless conversation by checking the time. A faint compassion passed by Riette’s eyes, who was looking at him as if he was a little tired of it.

“I’d rather-”


Before he could even finish, a heavy sound disrupted the silence throughout the deep dawn in the whole barracks. Matthias immediately shot to his feet, then ran to the window and flung open the curtains in alarm.

Another heavy boom, and this time, the building rattled around them. It was getting closer, whatever it was that brought the sound.

“AIR RAID! ENEMY AIR RAID IS IN PLACE!”

Distant screams accompanied soon after as another boom, further away and then another at a different direction came…

“SOUND THE ALARMS!”

“TAKE SHELTER!”

With an alarm sound, a shout rang out to announce the evacuation. The once-quiet hotel was a mess in an instant! The time for the ambulance driven by Kyle Etman to leave Sienna was still an hour away.

They needed to move up the schedule, immediately.

“Damn it! Matthias!” Riette called out as they held onto the furniture when another boom shook the building.

“Go to Etman!” Matthias cried out in urgency as he held still to avoid being toppled by the nearing blasts!

“Tell him to get to the rendezvous point immediately and she’ll be there as soon as possible!”

Another boom, and this time, the screams were closer!

“As soon as she’s in, he’s to book it out of here immediately!”

“What about you?! I don’t think I’ll get to her in time if I’m to relay this message to him now!”

Without an answer, Matthias turned around immediately as he left the room, even as the building shook around them.

Time was of the essence, he mustn’t wait any longer.

“HEY MATTHIAS!”

Riette’s cries were soon buried in binge drinking and alarm sounds.

Matthias ran without looking back. Still in deep darkness, into the streets and hellfire as shells rained upon the captured city.




The roar, which she has never gotten used to, was still too loud even as she clamped both hands over her ears in fright!

As soon as the first bomb dropped, Leyla threw away the bag she was clutching before she crawled under a small table in the bedroom and curled up.

‘Basement! I have to go to the basement!’

Her vision flashes back and forth from the neat room she was in, to the overcrowded basement she hid in before.

The basement was in a town square!

Where was Uncle Bill?

She needed to move!

Was she in the streets? Her shoes were left behind, and her feet turned her socks bloody, didn’t they?

Basement. She needed to get to the basement.

Another boom and Leyla cried out for her Uncle Bill!

She was having flashbacks, she needed to move, she knew she was still safe, but not for long if she won’t move…

But her body was frozen in a hunch as she stayed crawled beneath the table, wailing for her dead uncle to come to get her.

The next explosion had come too close, and all of a sudden glass erupted around her and Leyla screamed!

Gone were the rubbled streets, and in front of her laid the bandaged and beaten-down body of Uncle Bill. The doctor’s voice filled her head telling her he was dying and her distant screams for them to help echoed all around her in deafening madness!

The fire was across the street! The beautiful home across from the house she’d taken shelter in was turning to ashes. Leyla could only rock back and forth as she tried to lull the unborn child in her belly to soothe up.

“Shh, we’re gonna be okay, we’re gonna be okay, we’re gonna be okay…”

She kept saying like a mantra as her eyes stared widely in a hypnotized daze at the fire and debris in front of her.

Her head was bobbing up and down as she couldn’t look away. She could only hug her knees closer, as much as she could.

Her heart was beating erratically, and the smoke and soot started wafting through the broken windows.

Soon, she would suffocate, and her baby would suffocate in her womb.

More bombs rained from the sky, and she kept flinching even as her eyes remained unblinking.

Bony fingers hugged and gripped her arms as she wound them around herself. Nails digging into her skin soon dug too deep as she began to draw blood.

Calm. She needed to be calm.

She has to be calm!

Although her whole body began to tremble, Leyla tried not to let go of her reason somehow.

Tick. Tock. tick. tock.

The still functioning clock was now echoing loudly in her eardrums. Her chest tightened as the air around her began to thin out. She can’t breathe!

She needed to breathe!

How long had the bomb rain been?

Was it over?

Did it just begin?

Was anyone coming to save her?

Where was Kyle?

Marquis Lindman?

Did she have to leave?

She can’t go alone! She doesn’t want to be alone!

What if they left her alone?

The building shook again, matching the tumultuous thoughts she had in her mind before it returned to him.

Matthias von Herhardt.

He would come.

He always came for her.

He’d save her.

He was always there for her, whether she wanted to or not.

He was just like the birds. Always everywhere, anytime.

Surely, he would come. After all, he came here for her once.

If anyone would be with her, it would always be him.

He would cross an entire battlefield for her.

“Hi, Leyla.”

The voice that rose from the heavy ringing in her ears. The moment that gave despair and fear, but more unbearable, was a shadowy feeling that could not and should not exist behind it.

Her feelings toward him were like both sides of the coin.

From the moment she first saw him until now, it was always like that.

A scary and beautiful boy aimed a flash of a gun at her and stepped on her gold coins. The person who made her heart a little more shabby every moment, when she kept looking back even though she didn’t want to see him again.

Holding back tears, Leyla crawled out of the table and hugged the bag. She knew where the location was. However, the question was whether they could get there safely to avoid this bombing.

‘Don’t cry.’

Leyla comforted herself and forced herself out of the shell she made herself become.

She walked out staggering, holding on to the walls and furniture she could grasp as the ground continued to shake sporadically beneath her. However, her vision was getting blurred.

The night when she cried after biting a piece of candy that he gave her began to rise beyond her tears.

It was her first time tasting such a delicious treat.

Why did she have to leave him in the first place?

She had a place where she could cry as much as she wanted to back then. Sure he made her do terrible things against her will, but at least his arms were cozy when they wrapped around her.

She never should have left him.

The hand that hugged and comforted her a little clumsily was warm. It was ridiculous.

Such a shame added to her tears.


For such a long time he held her in his arms and stayed still. She could clearly remember the texture of the sweater on her cheek and the taste of the candy that melted away on her tongue.

When Leyla, who barely stopped crying, raised her head, she reached out and wiped her wet face.

Slowly and gently until she stopped crying.

Leyla looked at him blankly. The child inside her, who cried sadly while biting the last candy she had saved, felt like she had stopped crying for a long time. The taste of the candy that was no longer fishy was sweet. The Duke smiled faintly at the moment she realized it.

It was very strange.

No one in the world likes crying orphans. So Leyla Lewellin has been laughing and laughing.

Now she can smile more brightly than anyone else.

As if denying an unfamiliar feeling, she hurriedly looked away from him. And he stepped down without being as intimidated as before.

The whole time, whenever she left the annex, it was as if she were running away.

Back then Leyla thought it strange. Because she was running away from the Duke. As the shadows of the dense trees grew the deeper she entered the forest path that it even covered the moonlight, she turned around without realizing it.

Going back to take shelter in his arms.

It was a night when the road back to the cabin felt very long. And on that dark road, Leyla looked back and forth over and over again. Every time, she felt like her shadow was growing little by little.

She’s so embarrassed about that.

She hated it.

After cutting off such a long shadow.

Still, the shadows continued to grow and continued to overwhelm her and the path she walked on.

Maybe she was still walking on the road with a long shadow?

Maybe this all was just a terrible dream?

She’d wake up in his arms soon.

Yes, she’d wake up in safety soon.

Leyla reached for the door of the bedroom with her squeezed tightly shut as she reached out for the escape…


However, even before she opened the door, a clearer, and louder voice broke through the muddled ringing in her ears!

“LEYLA!”

Despite the terrible noises around her, Leyla would recognize that voice anywhere!

Matthias, it was him!

He did come for her! He was here with her in the flesh, and she couldn’t help but be filled with unexpected hope!

“Here! I’m here!” Leyla screamed with all her might. “I’m here!”

The door burst open not a moment later! Once again her vision blurred, but with relief instead of terror, as she cried at the sight of the new arrival in front of her!

She’d recognize him anywhere, even if her vision was obscured.

Matthias had come for her!


Chapter 142







Promise






They did not have much time to just stand and take in the sight of each other. In no time, Matthias began to hold on to Leyla as soon as she began to fall.

Without waiting for her expected protests, he carried her limp form in his arms and ran towards the house’s cellar. He had just about enough time to open the basement door and jump down the ladder before the ground above them shook and dust began falling from the ceiling!

The bomb was much closer than before.

Not bothering to find the light in the dark cellar, he immediately put Leyla down, who backed up from the door and leaned her back against the cellar’s wall.

She was dazed, breathing heavily as her body shook with the continued rain from outside.

Immediately he gathered her securely in his arms and drew her away from the shelves where many stored foods were placed in case they fell on her. He caressed the back of her head soothingly, making her rest against the crook in his neck.

“It’s all right.” He murmured soothingly against her temples, breaking the monotone sounds of muffled bombs over their heads. After a while, he felt her begin to pull away, just enough to look up at him.

He cupped her cheeks, and caressed her wet, and flushed skin with the pads of his calloused thumb.

“You’ll be fine soon.” He whispered, resolute and softer.

Even in the dark, she could feel his intense gaze on her, she could see just how deep his eyes reflected his soul, like an ocean inviting her into its depths.

A depth that often made her scared, hate…

And the less acknowledged excitement at the sight of it, especially as he embraced her securely.

Matthias was certain there could be a lamp somewhere to shed some light, but he couldn’t afford to find it. And so, in the thick darkness surrounding them, they endured the long night, relying on each other’s body temperature to keep warm, and their synched breathing for comfort.


The longer they stayed down in the basement, the more Leyla’s eyes gradually got used to the darkness.

Without thinking about it, Leyla reached out for a change and cupped Matthias’ face. She still couldn’t see clearly, yet she could finally make out some of his features. He looked positively unprepared and haggard in front of her.

With her other hand resting against his chest, she could feel his abnormal warmth and sweat rolling down his body, his breathing ragged, and the heartbeat beneath her palms erratic and strong.

He came.

He came running just for her.

There was a sense of glee upon the realization he braved through fields of dropping bombs, just for her.

It made her feel safer.

Made her breathe a lot easier than earlier when no one came for her.

The relief, sadness, and indescribable emotions began pouring out of her into silent, crocodile tears.

It was ridiculous how easily she could tell Matthias apart even amidst her blurring visions. Ridiculous how she waited unknowingly in the middle of an air strike for him to come to rescue her and cradle her in his arms.

She had told herself time and again that he would never take her back. And like a fool, she waited for him to come and get her anyway.

She gripped Matthias’ arm tightly, a wordless plea to keep him connected to her when she felt him begin to pull away from her.

“Hold on, Leyla.” Matthias grunted after a momentary pause, “It’s dangerous right now.” He told her seriously before looking off at a distance, through the only small window in the cellar to catch sight of explosions and rubble in the grounds above.

“I’ll take you to Etman as soon as the bombing stops.” He promised her, gripping her closer to him in tandem.

She felt her heartbreak at his words, as her lips trembled at the implication. He was rejecting her when she wanted nothing more than to stay with him.

She immediately began to protest against his wishes with a shake of her head, but Matthias was no longer paying attention to her.

He wasn’t looking at her anymore.


She wanted to ask what he was seeing, and whether or not he was fine, but the words remained stuck in her throat. Instead, she made do with looking at his side profile instead as he surveyed their surroundings…

Not even sparing her a single glance.

Memories flowed along with Matthias’ heartbeat, which deafened her to the sound of the world collapsing around them.

A man who brutally harassed and hurt her. The person she declared to hate the most in the world. The cruel man ruined her life without any remorse.

That’s why she shouldn’t forgive him. Why she’ll have to live without seeing him ever again.

It was a natural thing to do after the abuse he’d put her through.

What she should be doing.

But…

He was also a man who couldn’t be truly cruel to the very end despite his harsh actions towards her.

How could she have ever thought to resist him?

Even with their lives threatened to be over now, she couldn’t help but look and savor this image of his sweet eyes and warm touch. Her mind fought back with those heartless and affectionate moments they had in the past, tangled in sheets and limbs wrapped around each other.

She wanted to turn a blind eye to it, but it didn’t work out.

It always had been like this.

She’d always been in love.

Even if she thought it couldn’t be, her heart kept yearning for him to love her. Even if it had gone twisted and distorted, clumsy, or even if she tried to deny it with every fiber of her being, she still loved him with everything she had.

She always belonged to him. Both her mind and heart had already been his. All their moments together could’ve been a fairytale if she’d been honest in the beginning.

And now she’s the one begging him to look at her.

‘Look at me.’ Her mind screamed at him, but no words came out of her mouth. Instead, she reached out and cupped his cheek to direct his gaze back to her.

When he finally glanced down at her, he gave her a look of confusion. She looked at him only in a dazed manner, trying to convey her confession.

But after a few seconds, he turned away from her once again.

Even though he wrapped her tightly in his arms, he refused to see her. As soon as he turned away from her, it finally dawned on Leyla.

She’s always been the one looking at him from afar. Always been yearning to be part of his world. And that the time she spent crying out because of him was not just because of pain and shame…

Shaking the bittersweet memories out of her mind, she reached out once more, urging him again to look only at her, gently yet firmly turning Matthias by the cheek once more.

A mirror of his actions to her from before.

‘Look at me.’

“Leyla.” Matthias pointedly stared at her.

“Baby…” She murmured, finally finding her voice once more.

The sound of shell explosions was still echoing on the ground.

“Name my baby.” She pleaded for him, caressing his cheeks like she once did when she laid naked beside him back in Arvis. Her hands began to tremble as he continued to stare at her in silence, so she pressed on…

“I’ll wait for you,” she told him in a whisper, hot breath reaching up to touch his lips, “I’m going to wait for you with my baby, so give it a name. Please.” She begged him.

Blinking up prettily at him in the way she knew he could never resist.

She would never have been able to start anew.

She just wanted to be with Matthias.

It may be a stupid choice. This might not be normal love even, or a healthy one.

But she didn’t care anymore.

This felt too good, to be in his arms like this, to be the wrong kind of love. She doesn’t believe this love is wrong.

She loved this man. She will only ever wish for this man to be by her side.

“It’s all right now. We’ll be fine.” She told him with a watery smile, tears still pouring out of her in a pleading way even as she wet her lips.

“The baby already loves you.” She cooed at him lovingly, “Since I love you, the baby surely will too!”

“Leyla-“


“I love you.” She finally said, smiling so widely and brightly at him. So out of place from the war and air raid happening outside, even as dust continued to rain down on them, blinding her momentarily as she fought to keep her gaze locked on his.

She denied herself of this for so long. She can’t bring herself to stop now.

She doesn’t want to stop. Ever.

“I love you. You were so terrible to me, and I hate you for it, but I love you anyway!” She confessed desperately to him, clinging to his neck, “I love you!” She cried out in a whisper, begging for him to believe her now.

Because she does. She always will.

No matter what hell he put her through, she’d always choose him.

Something shook deep within Matthias’ core the longer he stared at her pleading form. She loved him?

Does she truly love him?

“I swear if this is another one of your lies again, Leyla, then…. I will kill you.” He growled at her, but she

only smiled brightly at him, “I’m gonna kill you, and then myself afterward because I won’t ever be parting from you again.”

“No, I’m not lying.” She grinned widely at him, with a quick shake of her head to dissuade any disbelief he had of her.

“I never lied before either,” She giggled at him, “From the moment I tried to fool you, I already meant everything I told you.”

Matthias continued to stare at her in disbelief, but she continued. This time, she’d tell him how she felt all this time.

“I hated how much I enjoyed everything we did. But I loved all of it. I’ve always loved it. Always loved you.”

One day, she’d give her heart wholly to this man when the war is over. She hated him.

She was afraid of him.

She despised him.

She was hurt because of him.

She was sad because of him.

She wanted to erase him.

She wanted to escape from him.

Sometimes she wanted to die because of him.

But in the end…….

“Then Leyla, you can’t escape me forever.” He grinned back at her, showing her his perfect, pearly whites, and she couldn’t help but giggle up at him now that he believed her. His frown turned upside down into a wide, pure, genuine joy.

Now that he promised he wouldn’t ever let her go again.

She could see now. Her mind and heart didn’t need to be mended back together, because everything was fine now.

This was it.

This was the love she always wanted.

The love of this man.

Maybe she already knew. In the afternoon, when the sea of Sienna was beautifully shining, the moment she saw him coming to her after passing through the hellish world.

“Don’t let me go again.” She told him and brought their foreheads together, then their noses…

Before finally bringing their lips together.

She was back home now. With him, engulfed around her senses, she was forever safe.

They both pulled away, leaving the tips of their noses together as they exchanged sweet smiles.

The crumbling world above them didn’t matter anymore.

“I’ll be waiting for you to come back, and then I’ll forgive you for everything if you come back alive.” She told him sternly with a pout, “I won’t hate you anymore if you do that. And then, we can start all over again.” She finished with an excited grin.

The prospect of their future together…

She can’t wait for the time to come. Belatedly she could tell there was a fast-beating heart in the cellar.

Whether it was his, hers, or both, it didn’t matter.

Their hearts now beat together, and that was all that mattered to her.

“Towards that time, without hate or sadness, we just have to start over with only our love.” She whispered against his lips, and he gripped her tighter in agreement, “You can do it. I can do it, so I’m confident. The baby agrees.” She giggled and began to cry once more.

But instead of longing tears, they were now tears of happiness.

Because who else would she love if not him? Who else would she have a family with if not with him?

There had never been anyone else, but him.

Another explosion came nearby, but Leyla found herself no longer scared. She was with him, there was no reason to be afraid anymore.

Their foreheads rested against each other once more as he breathed a sigh of relief. The tension in his body seeped out of his body the more Leyla nuzzled against him comfortably.

This was all he ever wanted. For her to love him back truly.

Unable to help himself, he brought her up to kiss her passionately on the lips.

Now accepting of her feelings, Leyla eagerly participated and moaned against his lips. This was heaven, she thought with a sigh.

Their hands wound around each other’s bodies, roaming and clutching everywhere they could, clinging to each other as if their worlds would end if they don’t cement this moment now.

“Promise me.” She breathed out, as soon as they parted for breath, and looked up at him fiercely in demand, “Promise me that you will come back to us as quickly as you can.”

“Anything for you.” Matthias murmured to her and planted a kiss on the back of her eyelids as her eyes fluttered close. A bright, and beautiful smile spread over her kiss-bitten lips.

“I’ll come back to you.”

“Promise me, and I’ll trust you. I believe in you forever no matter what anyone says. You are a man of your word, are you not?” She demanded of him, and he chuckled with amusement at her.

“I promise, Leyla.” He breathed out with a wide grin of his own and brought her lips back to his, as he hugged her impossibly closer to him. She cried and moaned and sighed against him all night, but he was now complete.

For the distrust and hate and disgust in her eyes, were now filled with open longing and love and acceptance, just for him to see. For him to take. And it was all he ever wanted in the beginning.

“I’ll come back to you.” He breathed out. “I promise.”







The bombing stopped at the crack of dawn. And as soon as the coast was clear, Matthias wasted no time in leading Leyla through the rubble, hugging her close to him by the waist.

They were long past their due time, and he was certain that no matter how long Kyle and Riette would stall for more in time for their arrival, any more than now would cause suspicion to arise.

The dawn revealed only rubble and smoke in its wake the more the sun rose, but Matthias could not afford for them to stop.

Leyla must still leave this city now, before more attacks come.

It was the only thought pushing him past his limits, even as Leyla was visibly getting more tired from the traveling.

Kyle decided to wait in front of the north gate of the wall surrounding the city. Originally, it was a deserted place, but now that all troops are gathering due to the enemy’s surprise attack, the vicinity has been turned into nothing but a ghost town.

The blue clear dawn light shone on the world, where the debris from wall buildings, and shrapnels from the bombs were slowly revealed to everyone who survived the night. The sound of waves flooded his ears, before Matthias’ rough breathing was all he could take note of!

“Matthias! Come on! We have to hurry!” Riette shouted to a whisper as soon as he caught sight of them.

Matthias need only look at the once to see they just arrived in the nick of time before someone would come to question why they haven’t gone yet. Without stopping for any pleasantries, Matthias immediately rushed to the front of the ambulance, just as Riette swung open the door to receive Leyla’s pregnant form.

But Matthias did not let her go, just gently deposited her immediately in a comfortable position, and wrapped a snug wrap around her shoulders as he sat her next to Kyle.

“Leah.” He spoke up immediately as soon he was done securing her. He squeezed her hand, and brought it up to his lips as he stared into her wide, happy eyes as she smiled at him.

He finally answered her.

She squeezed his hand back tightly, one last reminder of his promise to her.

To both of them.

“And if it’s a boy?” she asked him with a grin.

He merely raised a brow at her, as though he didn’t think it could be anything else but a girl.


“Felix.” He answered plainly after a few beats of silence. Riette’s eyes widened in surprise at the change of air between the two. Even moreso when he realized where the name had come from.

Duke Felix von Herhardt was Matthias’ grandfather. The glorious name of a Herhardt man, who was named as the next successor, and thus led to the creation of the prosperity of the family, which in turn was serving them well for the rapidly changing era.

‘Does Leyla know what it means to pass on the name?’ Riette looked at Leyla, with that thought.

But she only beamed in satisfaction at him, like a good little child who was receiving her well-earned reward. There were tears now flowing down her cheeks, and he noted how reluctant she was to let go, but she eventually dropped Matthias’ hand from hers.

This is how the man who proposed to give the woman everything and the woman who accepted the proposal would part ways. Now, it was the woman’s turn to leave and the man to be left behind.

Damn it.

Riette swallowed a hot breath, spitting out a curse under his breath without realizing it. However, they were out of time for any more sentiments to occur between the couple.

As soon as Matthias stepped back from the ambulance, Riette hurried back to the passenger seat, caging Leyla in securely. With both men beside her, she would now be easy to miss.

Without waiting for more instructions, the ambulance began to move away. Matthias watched them leave, without a glance back to the ruined city behind him.

He was just about to return back to the barracks, when suddenly, the ambulance came to a stop, not a second later, the passenger door flew open, and Leyla came spilling out into a stumble and began running back to him!

He rushed to her immediately, and gathered her into his arms just before she would stumble to the ground!

“Leyla.” He breathed out in surprise, confused as to what she had yet to do. She was only breathing heavily, looking at him wide-eyed and crying. Shaky hands began to untie her braid, and clutched her ribbon.

Wordlessly, Matthias held out his wrist in understanding, watching as she took her time to wrap it securely around his wrist.

He watched her do the same to the birds back in Arvis. And now she was doing the same to him.

That was all.

Leyla couldn’t bring herself to say anything. She believed, if she opened her mouth, she’d only say more, inconsequential things.


Matthias, who alternately looked at Leyla’s face with a white ribbon tied to his wrist, smiled and nodded to her in understanding. It was the same smile with a little playfulness and pride, where he had many moments of holding his breath and looking at it without realizing it.

The alarm to announce the gathering of the army began to ring again, shaking them out of their reverie, and imposing the urgency they forgot they had.

Leyla’s lips began to tremble, unwilling to leave him. Still, he stroked her rosy cheeks, which did not cry, and nodded once again.

“Go, Leyla.”

Smiling as he swept over her hair tangled in the wind, Matthias lowered his head deeply and kissed Leyla’s cheek, which was stained with tear marks

“I love you.” He whispered against her ear, even as the siren of their army threatened to deafen them with its loudness.

That was the last one.

Leyla had to stop turning toward Kyle and Riette, who urgently called her name, telling her there was no time left to waste anymore. Matthias also turned toward the square where the siren rang.

Leyla’s sob, which began the moment she turned away from him, soon came pouring out of her relentlessly. While crying like a child, Leyla walked without stopping or looking back.

She didn’t want Matthias’ steps to be heavy. She thought he would come back lightly if he left lightly.

Like the birds of Arvis that she loved, who returned without fail if she waited.

The ruined city showed its terrible appearance in the clear morning sun.

Before turning the corner of the wall, Matthias turned his head and looked at Leyla. The loose blonde fluttered like a wing behind her running back.

Matthias captured the beautiful golden waves in the gray ruins. And then again, he started walking towards the world that was going to be a battlefield.

The Confederate Army, in which Ettar’s troops fought, landed that morning through the Northern Union’s blockade. It was the day when the largest battle began since the war when the autumn sky of Sienna was dazzlingly clear.


Chapter 143




Time of The Wind







The downtown streets of Ratz turned hectic as more than the usual amount of delivery boys for the local paper ran through to toss out the morning papers.

In a nearby cafe, seated by the window, Claudine gazed through the glass in quiet observation. The air in the once bustling capital had turned sour and somber as soon as the war came, and their men left them behind.

There were mostly children and women around. A common sight she’d finally gotten used to. It didn’t help that the recent news from the war front brought them no comfort at all.

Berg’s army, which had largely dominated the war, had its fortune turned in the latest skirmish. Now, they are struggling against Ettar since they have recaptured the city of Sienna.

And now they’re gradually being pushed further north, where not too long ago, the Union’s latest attacks had largely been successful. Tensions continue to rise between the two nations, and soon no good news will reach them if it keeps up.

Even the fast-approaching New Year’s was not enough to lift the spirits of the families the men left behind, especially when it wasn’t certain they’d be returning home in glory and victory.

The Empire had failed to keep its promise to its people.

“Don’t worry too much, Lady Brandt. Duke Herhardt will certainly return safe and sound.” Piped up one of the ladies she was with within the cafe.

“Of course. No matter how fierce the battle takes place, the Duke will surely return safely.” Immediately added another one of Claudine’s friends after seeing her contemplative look, mistaking it for worry and longing for her fiance.

That’s right. Claudine thought belatedly, to the rest of society, shernpl was still engaged with Duke Herhardt. A minute, and mirthless smile curled up on the corner of her lips, unseen by those she was with.

Officially, they were still engaged, and therefore Claudine von Brandt had every right to worry about the safety of Matthias von Herhardt, as is expected of his woman.


Even though deep inside, she was more than hoping he would meet his demise instead in this war and never return again.

Perhaps a little earlier, when she had still been less bitter and more amenable to his presence, she would have wished otherwise. But not anymore. It only became increasingly clear how less likely he would return as her soon to be wedded husband.

Still, she had an image to uphold, and a pretense to act; loathed as she is to act as though she cared about the Duke.

She often wondered what news would arrive next. A question she asked habitually to herself whenever a new one would arrive in the form of Riette’s letter updates to her.

He was still in the warfront, and she hadn’t heard anything of him aside from the ones he sent her, but he was always more than generous in relaying to her the events that he was witnessing.

Even when she didn’t ask it of him, he still gave her more than she knew she deserved. Even Matthias was less generous than this, even when they were properly engaged.

And through Riette’s letters, she had learned about Leyla’s whereabouts and current condition. That Matthias had indeed, and eagerly took part in the war because that was where she would be found.

And found her indeed! The big bad Duke had finally been reunited with his lowly orphan girl. The anger she expected to come had long since dried up. Not even news of Leyla’s pregnancy ignited a single spark of anger in her anymore.

Officially they might still be engaged. But Claudine was no longer in the running to be the next Duchess.

She’d never been in it. Belatedly she wondered why Matthias even agreed to wed her when he had no intention in following through in the end.

This engagement had long been over.

Claudine now accepted the fact that she desperately denied, even though she knew it would happen eventually. Truthfully, she would have been fine with their engagement being broken off…

If only it didn’t lead to Matthias’ happiness.

Why was it, after everything he’d done, he got to have his own happy ending? She didn’t want them to be happy.

She wanted them to remain miserable as they should be. They were the disgraceful ones, the ones who cheated, and couldn’t stay away from each other even when they both promised themselves to another.

They shouldn’t have a happy ending, when they were the only ones in the wrong.


They should both just stay back in Sienna and die in the war. It was the only thought that consumed her in the long nights.

A loathing wish for Matthias, and his lowly orphan girl, to die and perish. Never to be with each other for all eternity.

Eventually, even if their engagement would be broken off officially, Claudine was still able to make a fresh start. Keep her reputation intact, and get engaged anew to a more suitable candidate. While not a widely acceptable tradition to do so, marrying her deceased fiance’s cousin, it wasn’t too bad of a reputation that she couldn’t just brush off.

She resolved to pen him her reply soon.

Even though in the present, Claudine was actively taking part in her friends and ladies’ conversations, her mind was stuck back in her room, with the latest letter Riette had sent her.

More specifically, his penned confession.

In it, she realized that despite his parting words to her that he’d let her go, he still held onto his feelings for her strongly.

She thought she’d lost him forever, and she allowed herself a momentary relief at the knowledge he still loved her. But she couldn’t bring herself to write back to him so quickly.

They lost too much time, trying to do what they thought would be better for themselves before.

This time, she wanted to convey her returned feelings for him perfectly. It’s the least she could do, for whose heart she broke so selfishly for.

Because she wanted this marriage to work.

For this engagement to go beyond just a mindless agreement. An engagement where her mind and heart were both in agreement.

A union that was both formed out of love and honor for a change. A far cry of the faux engagement she had with the Duke for years.

And should Matthias cry, perhaps she will shed some tears, but only out of joy, instead of sorrow.

Soon, the time came for them to leave, and one by one, the ladies around her began to go home. The time for social gathering and afternoon dallying with one another had remained to only be mere formality.

Their day to day gatherings were only ever meant to be for show after all. They found no need to keep up with the pretenses, not with the influx of news about their lost sons, husbands, and brothers to war.


A cold and gloomy winter soon rolled by, making the endless funerals day in and day out an even more somber occasion. The only genuine gathering left in Ratz, was when they’d go out and send their condolences.

Which was really, why she’s even out here in the cafe in the first place.

Waiting for her by the main street, was her vehicle. She got in, and the chauffeur immediately closed the door behind her before they began to drive back home.

Just when the car turned around the corner of the boulevard between the Museum of Natural History and the Museum of Art, Claudine was immediately shaken out of her immersive thoughts at the woman she’d just seen around they corner of her eyes that passed outside her window.

It was a blonde woman, wearing thick-rimmed glasses and bundled up warmly, plainly walking down the street. She was already quite a distance away from her now, with her back turned, but the figure eerily seemed familiar to her anyway.

“Miss, what’s the matter?” The maid, who was looking around, asked her when she noticed the look of alarm in her mistress’ face. Claudine, who looked like a cross between suspicion and contemplation, immediately shook her head before she leaned back against the car’s seat.

“Nothing.” she quietly replies, mind running a mile a minute.

‘Is it Leyla?’

The last news she heard from Riette’s letter was that Matthias found Leyla, who ran away, pregnant with the Duke’s child, and he’d caught her.

‘But did he send her here? That guy?’

“It’s nothing.” She reiterated when the maid still looked unconvinced that nothing was wrong.

Either way, Claudine didn’t want to take any part in their affairs anymore. She’d learned that only getting involved with them brought on more shame than satisfaction. She’d settle only with thoughts and wishes that they’d both have their happy ending tarnished by the war.

Today was just a normal day.

Ad when nightfall came that night, a new, and hopeful wish overtook her normal thoughts. Instead of wishing for Matthias to die, she wished desperately to receive more news from Riette…

And this time, she will give him the answer he deserved from her. She’d keep it short, and succinct, so he can get it quickly.

And as if her prayers were finally heard, the maid who brought her mail, suddenly burst through her bedroom, with a wide, open smile, in her hands an envelope, scrawled with her name by a familiar penmanship.

“My Lady! Marquis Lindman’s letter has arrived!” she announced gleefully.

Claudine, who had been leaning against the bed and drinking morning tea, shot up to her feet like an excited girl. Barefoot and running, the letter was snatched out of the maid’s hands with an excited squeal. The maid’s eyes crinkled knowingly at her with a smile as she met her mistress’ eyes.

Claudine blushed a little and began to look for her slippers and wore them. While the maid turned a blind eye to her mistress’ momentary lapse in proper decorum, the door swung open once more without warning. It was the Countess Brandt.

“My dear, Claudine! What are you going to do?!” immediately wailed her mother as she strode into her daughter’s room!

It surprised Claudine because her mother was the image of proper etiquette and manners. She would have beaten Claudine’s hands with a stick for bursting unannounced into another’s bedroom. Before she could even ask what was wrong, Claudine found her arms filled with her sobbing mother, and caught sight of this morning’s newspaper haphazardly tossed on the table.

Great trepidation began to fill her.








When it was time for a boy to read the newspaper to come, her heart jumped. It happened on its own without checking the time. Today, Leyla wandered in front of the house with an anxious face. Soon after, the big eyes of the newspaper delivery boy looking over the street shook nervously.

On that clear autumn day, the ambulance that hid Leyla escaped the blockaded Sienna safely.

She parted ways with Marquis Lindman as soon as they arrived in the rear supply unit, and also bid goodbye to Kyle at a military hospital across the border between Lovita and Berg. Once Leyla found herself bereft of companions, she ended up relying on a piece of paper with an unfamiliar address, before she got on the train headed back to Ratz.

It was reminiscent of when she came to Arvis on her own. Travelling alone, just like she did as a child.

The sadness filled up to the end of her neck was overflowing, but Leyla did not cry. She wasn’t alone because she had a child now in her belly. And there was Matthias too.

A giddy feeling filled her up as she remembered their kisses.

Soon, they’d be reunited once more. So Leyla had to recover her health, give birth to the child, and wait for him with the child. It was as easy as that! And while she waited for his return, she could do whatever she wanted in the meantime.


Every day, she waited eagerly for him to return, and made sure to take care of herself without any worry at all! She had nothing more to worry about after all. Matthias was returning to her. And with that in mind, Leyla was able to endure day after day on her own, in her quaint new house.

The time for the season to change would soon come, and the child kept growing in her womb. In no time, she’d be giving birth, and finally hold their child in her arms!

Oh how she wished he’d be back in time to be with her during that time too! She was as desperate as she was excited for his return.

But despite her newfound freedom and luxury, she was still a little scared. If anything happened to her during childbirth, what would happen to her child if Matthias hadn’t returned yet? Of course, Matthias made sure there were butlers and the Duke’s lawyers at her beck and call while she recovered and lived in this house, but they were not partners with whom she could rely on her heart.

“It’s okay. Everything will be fine.” As Matthias had done to her, Leyla whispered to the child in the stomach. It was then that light and fast footsteps began to be heard.

A boy delivering newspapers was running from across the cold street.


Chapter 144







Perfectly Brilliant Light







“How are you doing, Claudine?” asked Countess Brandt in a hesitant voice, her red-rimmed eyes looking at her carefully. The maid who’d been serving them immediately dropped her gaze to the floor, recognizing this moment to be a private affair between her mistresses.

This time between them was a tenuous moment.

“It’s…” Claudine began to speak up softly, before trailing off, a far-away look in her eyes. “It’s a difficult time, but I have to endure it well.” She diplomatically answered, nodding tersely as though she was trying to convince herself to do so.

“That’s right. We should all do that.” Her mother interjected, also preoccupied with her thoughts and feelings to notice just how broken their daughter had turned out to be in the latest news that befell them.

The war might as well have dropped a bomb on their house.

“Well then, make sure you are eating.” Her mother added, patting her on the hand absentmindedly, “Think of what he would want for you.” She commanded offhandedly, before breaking down into more sobs.

Recognizing the order for what it was, the maid hastily excused herself to prepare them a meal, despite the knowledge that Lady Claudine wouldn’t touch a single food that would be prepared. Still, she needed to make sure her Lady would have something to eat to keep her strength up for these difficult times.

After hastily preparing easy-to-eat foods, she immediately went back up to her Lady’s room, and softly knocked on the closed door.

“My Lady, I have brought you something to eat and drink.” She announced, when no answer came, she knocked again. “My Lady?”

A beat of silence came before a loud wail began to erupt inside the room! Worried about her mistress’ well-being, she burst through the door to come to her aid!


“Oh, my Lady!” she fretted almost immediately, the tray in her hands dropped in her haste and spilling its contents on the floor!

Crouched pathetically in a fetal position, still in her sleeping gown and hair loose and barefoot, laid her mistress, Lady Claudine, sobbing her heart out, a letter clutched tight against her breasts as though she was trying to merge with it.

“Leave me alone!” she demanded upon the sight of her maid, her eyes turned into a sharp glare almost immediately but lost some of their intimidation at the tears that persisted to escape from them. Mary sharply halted in her steps, appearing to hesitate in obeying her mistress’ wishes.

She can’t possibly let her mistress wallow in her sorrow alone.

“But-“

“Out! Get out, Mary!” She screamed, tears still pouring out of her.

Mary wanted to protest.

“But you…”

“Please…” she begged, softly this time as she sobbed, “Please just leave.” She pleaded before she went back to curling on her room’s floor, hugging the letter back to her chest.

The protest left the maid’s heart in a quick second at the sight of her broken-up mistress. She thought that Lady Claudine could remain graceful in her grief, but she too was just human. And when a loved one dies, no amount of grace can hide the pain one truly felt in their passing.

Deciding to finally give her some space, Mary softly closed the door behind her to leave her mistress alone for now.

Even as she closed the door behind her, Claudine’s cries echoed ominously throughout the empty corridor as she cleaned up the dropped tray of food before leaving.

Claudine, for her part, could barely remember why she ended up crying on the floor so pathetically. As soon as her mother had taken leave, she opened up the last letter and read it. She was just reading the letter. Yet after the sleepless night she had, and when the morning sun rose to a new day, she found herself weak, and unable to bring herself to even rise from where she laid catatonically.

The only thing that convinced her was the sight of his unopened letter.

She needed to read his last letter. And so with shaky hands and a broken heart, she opened the last letter she would ever get from him.

[I love you, Claudine.]

A phrase he’d penned her multiple times, in every letter since the war happened.


[I know how afraid you are, what you’re afraid of. And I cannot promise you that it won’t come true, because, in reality, I’m no miracle worker like Matthias. But I have to believe that whatever hardships may come our way, we will endure because of my love for you. I’ll shoulder everything you’re afraid to face, my love, because that’s just how much I want to be with you. I plan to drown out all your problems with my love alone, if only you’ll have me.]

He’d promised her a million times he’d return. Promised how his love for her would make him endure the war.

And now he’s dead, and she’d yet to give him her millions of confessions in return.

The obituary in the newspaper brought by the Countess belonged to Marquis Lindman, not Duke Herhardt. News of Riette’s was listed along with many others and arrived just as his last love letter did. There was another unexpected air raid, the paper had announced, and this time, they targeted the rear units, which were largely undermanned.

The rear unit was caught so unprepared, housing most of the army’s patients, that Riette had been counted along with the many casualties to be shot and killed in action.

“He’s not dead… he’s not…” She muttered absently under her breath, the letter clutched tightly in her palms.

Another night came, and then another day rose, still, Claudine found herself unable to part with the letter, still huddled pathetically on the floor, sobbing wildly in grief and mourning.

How long has it been? A day? Two?

Did it even matter anymore?

She supposed it didn’t.

What was the point in trying to live such a miserable life anyway? Even he, who wrote her such enthusiastic love letters, ended up dying alone and far away from home.

She wished to read a different man’s death, and wished for Riette to return. And yet had always been cruel to her, because her Riette was now dead, and she dreads to see the Duke’s return home.

Just when she was ready to say she loved him too.

He was ripped away from her before he could even call himself hers.

“I love you… I love you… I love you…” She repeated like a mantra, the light gone from her eyes, yet her tears far from stopping.

There was so much she needed to say, so much to apologize to him for…

And now she’d never be able to say it.

Why him?

Of all people, why did he have to die?

“I love you.”

The more she re-read the letter, the more the emptiness in her heart threatened to overwhelm her. The line of him declaring his love for her kept flashing back and forth in front of her, she had to let it go.

But the moment she did, she found herself unable to breathe a moment more, her chest tightening so painfully, she reached out for it in a panic, that she fell from her chair!

The threat of a sob began to escape from her, and as soon as her fingers brushed upon the edge of the paper, she gripped it tight and brought it down to her chest, and gave in to the overwhelming despair swallowing her whole!

The only warmth in her stemmed from the flimsy paper in her grip. Just ink and paper were all she had left of him. Like his touch still lingered on the letter, she wanted to will him back to life, to be back with her…

Close to touching…

Close to confessing…

Memories of his fading voice and laughter only made her scramble around to keep him tightly anchored to her.

Wound up so tightly, she felt something in her break…

Ah, so this was how it was.

This was how it was to be truly heartbroken.

And when something is broken, nothing will ever be the same again.

“I love you,” she repeated, her hopeless plea carried off by the silence, unable to reach its recipient.

How cruel fate was to her, that the world should keep turning when hers had just ended before it had even begun.



The memory that remained buried deep within his heart served as Matthias motivation to survive, his sole raison d’etre. Like the beautiful golden wings of a butterfly fluttering in this solemn gray world, it illuminates this painful and arduous path of his to the place where he needs to return, back to that place where he truly belongs. He slowly opened his closed eyes, staggering for a bit as he tried to stand up. The afternoon sun seemed to be teasing his eyes with its bright, irritating ray of light.


A fellow soldier, who had been by his side shooting at the enemy a while ago, was now covered in blood; their unmoving body had collapsed on the cold, hard ground. The dark-red blood flowing from the corpse’s fragmented head and chest caused by the artillery shell wetted Matthias’ military boots. If he was the one who stood in front of the window just now, he would have been the one who was now lying there as a shattered, cold corpse.

Life and death would always be a second away from one another. Did Riette also feel the same way before his life trickled away like grains of sand in the wind?

Did he expect that he would die before Matthias?

For a moment, the dead comrade’s face shifted into Riette’s, before returning back to its real face.

After exhaling deeply, Matthias picked up his gun lying on the floor and turned around. Another shell flew in with a rumbling sound which shook the stone walls around him, hinting its imminent collapse. He, however, persistently continued on his way, completely ignoring the danger surrounding him.

Unlike the information he had received from the intelligence reports, the enemy commenced their attacks in broad daylight in an attempt to recapture the city occupied by Berg a few weeks ago. The city possessed a junction where three railroads intersect making it a key point of supply; which meant that it was a place where multiple fierce battles were bound to take place.

Schwip

With a shout that couldn’t escape from his mouth, an enemy soldier completely fell down without even knowing how he died.

Matthias stepped out behind a pillar located opposite to the now lifeless body of the enemy who couldn’t even utter a single scream before his life was extinguished. He proceeded to stand behind a nearby wall, the warm rays of the sun together with a gust of cold wind wrapped around his tired body. The wall on the other side was already half collapsed by the enemy’s artillery fire and the wall where he stood behind would face the same fate soon.

When they had difficulties breaking through the enemy’s defensive line, the army would resort to breaking down all the small-scaled walls to enter the opposite side’s territory. Doing so reduces the enemy’s defensive structures and lessens any potential threat of ambush. He was well aware of such tactics since it was one of the most common strategies that the Berg army would use when advancing on enemy’s territories.

However, Ettar’s participation changed many parts of the battlefield.

Initially, the Confederate forces had been powerless since they didn’t possess a mortar that could break down the castle’s thick wall. But, thanks to the weapons provided by Ettar, they were now attacking vigorously with weapons that could even rival Berg’s and implementing the same tactics that Berg used without hesitation.

“Retreat! Retreat!”

“Retreat! Retreat!” A desperate command to retreat was ordered to the troops, who were deployed to defend the wall, rang out accompanied by the unending sound of gunshots.

He found it a little ridiculous that they finally issued such a command after half of their troops were already dead. If it had been ordered at least an hour ago, then perhaps more people would have listened and survived from this unexpected ordeal.

Matthias, with a mirthless smirk on his lips, hurriedly moved towards his destination. If only he could, he would have run with all his might but his injured body prevented him from doing so.

‘Did I get hurt?’

He tried to remember, but he couldn’t recall any instance where he could have sustained any injuries. His dizzy head was also still reeling from the recent explosion that their troops had just experienced, inhibiting his mind from thinking too deeply.

In the end, their commander failed to properly grasp the enemy’s firepower. Just a while ago, their side firmly believed that their enemy was not reckless enough to continue deploying their troops to attack the defensive wall. Thanks to this firm belief, they became the perfect candidates for betrayal, to turn one’s allies into rats trapped in poison and dedicate them to the enemies. However, it was difficult to fully put the blame on the commander’s shoulder since no one had expected the Confederation to be in possession of the same weapons as Berg’s; not until the Lovita army fired the first mortar.

As his vision started to blur once more, the beautiful wings appeared in front of him again; fluttering mesmerizingly amidst the chaotic scene.

Ever since the day he had left, Matthias had always seen the golden wings in his vicinity as if it was his guardian angel. Thanks to this, he still firmly believed that there was still a chance to successfully counterattack and turn this hopeless situation around despite their armiy’s complete disastrous defeat. He was convinced that he was still alive thanks to his lovely little bird waiting for him back home.

“Leyla.” With his lips smiling softly, Matthias uttered his beloved’s name sweetly. Just saying her name filled his being with sweetness enough to drown his whole being

The time to blink his eyes was getting longer and his urgent movements changed slowly to a pace similar to a person enjoying a leisure walk. As soon as he became aware of his sluggish body, Matthias’ tired body immediately fell flat on the sun-heated stone floor like a doll whose strings were suddenly cut off.

He struggled to keep his drowsy eyes open and finally noticed the path where he came from. Dark-red streaks flowed on the rubbled walls and destroyed paths which he had passed. It took him a few more blinks to realize that it was actually his blood.

It was his blood, it was him that left those bloodied traces….


The blood flowing from his left shoulder, perhaps due to an embedded shell fragment, had now completely soaked half of his military uniform. Spilling this much blood would be deemed a serious injury, but his muddled brain couldn’t even perceive any pain, much alone comprehend he’d lost so much blood until the critical moment. Fully comprehending his current situation, his throat let out a short and sudden voice.

It was a giggle mixed with his ragged breath, ironically laughing at his current situation. He was fully aware how bad this turn of events was and its potential end result; his death.

He leaned his battered body against the railing and gave his all to keep ahold of his slipping consciousness; the smell of rusted iron began to intermingle with his breath. His hand, which grabbed his hair like he was trying to tear his head off, gained more strength as he continued to inflict pain upon himself.

Matthias leaned against the railing and tried to hold consciousness. The smell of rusty iron began to seep out of his breath. His hand, which he grabbed like he was tearing his head off, gained strength.

‘Wake up!’

He relentlessly commanded his muddled brain while pulling his hair harder. However, even after doing so, his eyelids only felt heavier with every passing second. The sound of the mortar, which should have been close to where he was, felt like a faint noise that came from a distant place.

‘Wake! Up!’

He wanted to fall asleep for a second, to just take a quick rest. He would just let his body recover for a bit, then he could finally get up and continue once again.

“Leyla. To you. I’ll be back, I promised. So.. just for a bit…….”

‘FUCKING WAKE UP NOW!!!’

By the time his eyes were almost closed, Matthias caught a glimpse of a ribbon fluttering in front of him. It was the same ribbon that Leyla had put around his wrist, his talisman that protected him without fail since that day.

When Leyla’s image of tying colored threads together while searching for various bird nests in the forests and rivers of Arvis came to his mind, his lips, which were shut in a flat line, let out a genuine and lighthearted laugh full of joy. She always enjoyed seeing the birds return back to their nests and she would always become happy and be filled with overwhelming joy once she saw those birds. She was so unlike him…

A lonely kid.

He stared at the fluttering ribbon with blank eyes. He thought of her life full of loved ones who once left, but never ever returned back to her lonely self that was waiting earnestly.

He now finally fully understood.

The reason why Leyla loved Arvis’ migratory birds so dearly.

‘Leyla….’

With his voice also gone, Matthias whispered his beloved’s name with quivering lips.

He promised her,

He said he will definitely return.

Leyla said she believes him and will wait for him…’

And he would give his all to fulfill his promise, no matter what cost.

‘I have to go back, I need to go back. I must!!’

He stubbornly lifted his injured body, biting his lips hard to the point of bleeding. Even with his hazy consciousness, the sound of artillery fire penetrated his mind continuously.

He began to walk once again towards the wall where dust clouds rose and broken bricks were rolling around. His legs were twisted together and his body stumbled repeatedly, but he never showed any signs of stopping on his path. Taking a few shaky steps after he just got up, he , in the end, collapsed once again.

Matthias supported himself against the stone floor with his blood-soaked hands. A slight giggle erupted after taking a few rough breaths. When he opened his closed eyes that he hadn’t realized were squeezed shut, his vision blurred by fatigue became a little bit clearer.

Tears and sweat mixed together as it slid down towards his chin and dripped down to the back of his hand.

‘Just one more time….’

‘Get up… one more time…’

Whenever he blinked and tried to focus his dazed eyes, tears continuously flowed down from his eyes, flowing down towards his chin and dripping at the back of his wet hand. Each drop felt hotter than the last, stimulating his muddled brain bit by bit. He found his desperate situation funny, so Matthias repeatedly let out a dry laugh; his breath accompanied by a thicker smell of blood.

‘You have to live!’

He repeatedly whispered to himself quietly.

‘Leyla, for my Leyla, you have to live!’

He had to live because she was still waiting for him.

It took him more time than before to finally be able to support his body and in the end, he finally managed to get up once again. After rubbing down his wet face, he straightened his back and began to move forward, taking a step after step. His bloody eyes were now half closed from exhaustion, but Matthias never stopped walking.

He had to go.

Even if he would also become someone who had failed to return back to his lonely bird’s life.

Even if he would also become someone who had failed to return back to his lonely bird’s life.

He needed to keep his promise till the bitter end.

He wanted to be forgiven.

He wanted to return to the place where Leyla was, to stand beside her. To that place where they could start once again with their love for each other, where their love story would begin and unravel through thick and thin.

Matthias moved quickly with renewed vigor when he finally caught a glimpse of the stairs below the wall. At the moment when his foot just stepped at the stairs, the mortar’s shrapnels, which battered the solid wall one after another, finally broke through the wall accompanied by a loud explosion! In the collapsing world, he caught a glimpse of the brilliant golden wings fluttering in the wind.

‘Leyla…’ He whispered with a smile. This was the last sight that was burned to his memory before everything went black.

News of the battle in the city of Lovita was not d

elivered to Berg until a few days later.

The newspaper, which featured a photo of Duke Herhardt donning an officer’s uniform on the frontpage, began to spread rapidly throughout the streets a day before the New Year.


Chapter 145




New Year’s Eve







The morning paper, which had been delivered since early in the morning, lay untouched on the table even though lunch had already passed for quite some time. Like a buzzing bee, Leyla had been hovering around it from time to time in a nervous fret.

Whenever she tried to reach out and open it, she would end up turning around and walking away in fright. This scene had occurred multiple times already since early in the morning.

In an attempt to somewhat ease up her anxious mind, she would every now and then talk to her only companion, which was the unborn child in her womb. She couldn’t help but to speak to them at every available moment she had, even as she warmed up a cup of milk to distract herself. She turned her head towards the windows, flipping open the curtain slightly before immediately drawing it shut once again. In the past few hours, she had been doing such random actions repeatedly, including tossing a few more pieces of firewood into the fireplace.

Finally running out of chores that she could use as an excuse to distract herself from the crippling anxiety, she finally managed to return her attention back to the morning newspaper and opened it at long last. She apprehensively stared at the newspaper for a long time and finally made sure his picture was fortunately not included on the list of those that passed away in the war, which was what she noted immediately after checking repeatedly. A huge sigh of relief finally escaped from her soft lips, her hands that were gripping the paper were now notably shaking less.

Reading the list of names of those that had passed away once again, she closed her eyes and finally breathed in deeply. Ever since she read the news about Marquis Lindman’s death, realization dawned on her that perhaps the next paper that would arrive might be bearing Matthias’ name instead. As much as she didn’t want to see this thought become reality, there was no other way for her to know but to regularly check for his name on the papers.

“Hi, Ms. Lewellin. Or should I call you Duchess now?” Riette turned to greet her dryly in a drawl, just before he had to leave and return to his unit. “When we meet once again, I guess your baby will have already been born. I’ll go see you both once that happens, you’re going to allow me, right?”

“Of course.”


“Thank you.” He thanked her, this time sounding genuine in her ears. “And I’m sorry.” He added shortly after.

“Sorry? For what, Marquis?” Leyla tilted her head in confusion, and Riette, on the other hand, only smiled sadly at her. At first glance, his smile, that was only lightly uplifted on one corner of the mouth, slightly resembled Matthias’.

“Just for this and that.” He told her with a wink, pertaining to all the schemes with Claudine that he participated in, while also apologizing on behalf of his beloved. Leyla couldn’t understand why he apologized for something that had long passed, but there was no time left for them to have a long conversation.

“Ah! I hope that the baby will only look like the mother. Especially if it’s a son!” After taking a few steps away from her, Riette looked back and shouted. “Think of it as a wistful wish for my nephew.” He jokingly shouted with a playful smile as he left.

That was the last time she ever saw him, her last memory of the playful Marquis. And that would be how she would remember him forever, playfully smiling while bantering back and forth with her. Leyla removed her glasses and put them down at the end of the table then rubbed her eyes wetted by tears so hard they began to hurt, her hands that were tightly clenched were as cold as ice.

The obituary, which she was only able to check after a long time, did not contain any familiar names that she knew. A sigh of relief flowed out from her once again, but her anxious heart still could hardly calm down. She didn’t like feeling this way, so she decided to go outside for a walk.

Leyla walked slowly through the residential area and towards the park at the end of the museum. When she reached the final term of her pregnancy, her ability to move was compromised by her bulging belly and that made her take quite a long time to walk even at such a short distance.

“Look at your mom. She’s just like a penguin waddling around, right?” She burst into laughter when she saw herself reflected in a shop’s show window.

“Oh! You must not be able to see because you are still in my stomach. Don’t worry, we’ll see each other soon, right? By that time your mom wouldn’t be a penguin then.” Such a funny image occurred inside her mind and she smiled happily once again.

After taking a short break, she continued walking carefully once again, waddling around like a penguin threading on ice. She noticed that there were more people like her walking around on the streets decorated with various festival ornaments, when typically, during this time of the year, the majority of the residents stayed inside at the comfort of their homes with their loved ones. Perhaps they were also like her, trying to distract themselves from the dreary and suffocating atmosphere that the war had brought to their homes. However, she could still see the affectionate faces of lovers and families out and about, showing their odd excitement and hopeful expressions on the upcoming year-end and New Year holidays. Not even the war clouds overhead could dampen their faith for a better tomorrow.


“Shall we eat something delicious for dinner tonight?” She immediately inquired her baby, trying to shake off the desperation in her bones.

“What would you like? Would you like what I like? Or perhaps something your father does?” Even if she patted her stomach repeatedly, the child inside her belly continued to be unresponsive. Feeling a little lonely, Leyla walked more vigorously while slightly kicking the floor.

“Come to think of it, mom doesn’t know what dad likes. I should’ve asked him at least once.” Her sullen words were accompanied by a white mist from her breath as it scattered in the air.

“I actually had a lot of questions for him. I will definitely ask him a lot when he finally gets home.” She murmured with determination while walking a bit faster, however, among the people walking on the street, she was still the one with the slowest pace. Just as she turned around in the corner in front of the museum, some boys skidded past the streets with shouts of news!

“An extra, an extra!”

Almost everyone in the streets froze upon the announcement. At this point everyone knew that any news would only be more updates about the war, and any update most likely came bearing misfortune. Leyla began feeling a dreadful pit in her stomach, churning uncomfortably as the worst thoughts immediately began racing in her head. With her tense and worry-filled mind, she missed the fact that she had been handed a newspaper it ended up falling to the snowy ground.

She needed to pick it up but even as her fingers twitched, her body refused to listen to her will. However, her eyes could still see the headline and the picture on the front page, which made her vision turn blurry as the strength on her feet slowly left her.

[Duke Matthias von Herhardt was killed in the battle to defend the southern front]

She blinked her eyes at the horrible sight in front of her, hoping that her eyes were only playing a trick on her. But, the awful news was still there as if it was embedded deeply into her eyes as if someone was poking a knife right through them. Deafening ringing persistently rang out in her ears as the world around her blurred out completely.

‘He promised. He made a promise to me’ She repeatedly stated his vow inside her head.

‘He wouldn’t break his word. He told me he will definitely come home.’

‘He can’t be dead. He can’t! He wasn’t allowed to die just like this!’

“Miss, do you need help?” A middle-aged woman approached Leyla, who was standing still. She picked up the fallen newspaper and kindly placed it in Leyla’s hand then continued back on her away again.

However, the newspaper fell back to the ground once more, slipping out of her fingers again as she refused to believe that everything was real. Leyla, who finally couldn’t hold back her grief, also fell down along with it.


She gasped for air, trying to make sense of the news, she knew that he mustn’t be dead, that it was not real. She tried to get back up, but she could only feel hopelessness and was unable to find the strength to get up from the freezing ground. She wanted to erase the memory of seeing the news, but she could only continue staring at it and nothing else. Shaky fingers stroked his picture on the newspaper, as if trying to summon him in front of her by just reaching out to his picture.

“Oh my god! Hey, are you okay?!” The middle-aged woman from a while ago shouted in astonishment after she worriedly turned around once again. The eyes of the passers-by followed her figure that was running towards Leyla.

“Everyone, help me!”

All they could see was Leyla struggling to breathe as she clutched her stomach desperately. The woman tried to hoist her up to her feet but Leyla was stubbornly unable to move.

“We have to move her to the hospital! I think her baby is going to come out! Come on!”



“Lies! I don’t believe it, I don’t!” Elysee von Herhardt’s sharp scream shook the spectacular parlor that was unusually silent. The Herhardt family had gathered in a hurry after they heard the news of Matthias’ death and all of them were currently focused on the grieving lady.

“I understand how you feel, but please…”

“My son didn’t die! That can’t be true!” She shook her head vigorously in denial that her gracefully tied hair became messy. “Hurry up and tell me! No, he can’t do this to me!” She hastily approached her mother in law and hopefully asked, trying to deceive herself that the news of her son’s death was just a bad dream.

“My dear…” Norma stared at her sobbing and pleading daughter-in-law as her eyes also slowly turned red due sadness. She had lost her husband, her son, and now, even her grandson. She had lived far too long and suffered so much for the same terrible reason over and over again. This was not the first time she received such news, but the deep sorrow that could break her heart to pieces that accompanied it was something she would never get used to.

“Let’s accept it, Elysee…” Norma lifted the handkerchief in her hand and wiped away Elysee’s tears. “…We should do so for Matthias’ honor. You know that, don’t you?” She resolutely declared, either to support a fellow mother that had lost her son, or as a message to her own self just to prevent herself from breaking down; or both.

Unlike her cool-headed words, her voice was shaking with grief, her eyes holding back the tears. Elysee stared resentfully at her mother-in-law, but soon sobbed with compassion, and eventually she collapsed due to shock.

The news caused a grave disturbance in Arvis.


Every servant and employee in Arvis ran about wildly and frantically upon the news of their master’s death. Messages of condolences from various business partners and clients immediately flooded the estate. Hessen, who had taken the duty of dealing with them, could only absently take their well-wishes as he sat numbly by his desk from dusk until dawn.

“Mr. Hessen, a call from the lawyer, Mr. Stauff, has arrived. He’s looking for you in a hurry.” As the sorrow that he had been trying to suppress began to rise, a servant suddenly delivered an unexpected news.

Stauff, a lawyer in charge of Herhardt’s internal affairs, was the person who helped Leyla settle in Ratz in accordance with the will of the Duke. It wasn’t difficult for him to guess why the secret conspirator would contact him at such a late hour Hessen tucked in his sorrow deep down his heart and went to answer the phone. He couldn’t break down now so it was not the time for him to mourn yet. For now, he still had a job to do.

“Ms. Lewellin is currently in the hospital. It seems that her labor has started suddenly and it’s already been a while.” Hessen’s eyes grew bigger with the sudden news.

“Isn’t it too early”?

“That’s true, I think it was caused by the shock of hearing the news of the Duke’s death. I also just received this news, I’m contacting you in advance before I leave to Ratz.”

“I see. Thank you, Mr. Stauff. I’ll do my part, too.”

Hessen put down the receiver with trembling hands. A child born on the day the news of his father’s death was delivered to the whole empire. He gently closed his eyes in an attempt to hold back his tears.

Should he reveal it?

The Herhardt Family would soon be embroiled in great confusion and quarrel over succession because of the sudden death of the Duke. If the soon-to-be-born child was a son, he would become the only successor of the Herhardt family. Thinking of the current circumstances, the child’s existence was very important and should be revealed. However, the Duke had already given his orders regarding this matter. He ordered that he would respect Leyla Lewellin’s choice, leaving everything for her to decide. In the end, even if he was no longer in the world, Matthias von Herhardt was undeniably still his master.

Hessen stepped out into the dark hallway with her lips tightly closed.

A child was born on New Year’s Eve. As if proving his existence, he let out a loud cry on a deep night just before the bell rings, which marked the end of the year and the beginning of the new year.



The nurse firmly held out the newborn child wrapped in a white cloth to the arms of the mother, who endured the pain of childbirth alone. Leyla’s face was ashen, and she was still half-conscious by the time


the nurse presented her child to her. Finally seeing their beloved child, her heart couldn’t help but to feel torn with a bittersweet happiness and despair.

“The baby is healthy.” The nurse smiled and told Leyla, before she gently handed the baby to the new mother, who cradled the child stiffly in her arms. “He’s a little small, but there’s nothing wrong with his health.”

“Really…?” Leyla asked the nurse, anxiety clearly shown on her face. Her lips trembled with apprehension as she stared at her child. He was a child who had suffered a lot already even since he was still inside her womb. Additionally, he was also born earlier than what was scheduled.

“Of course. Here, look at him.” The nurse stepped back after adjusting Leyla’s posture so she could hug the child comfortably. It was only then that she carefully lowered her gaze and finally looked at the child in her arms.

When she gently stroked his black hair, the child wiggled his small body as if silently protesting against his mother’s actions. The deep dark color of his hair made his skin appeared paler than what it is. Leyla, who had spaced out for a while, gave a light smile and proceeded to stroke her child’s cheek. The soft texture made her wonder how it could be possible for his cheeks to be so soft as her eyes slowly got teary again. Suddenly, a faint sound of bell ringing enveloped the room, and the frowning child in her arms gently opened his eyes.

It wasn’t too long, but she clearly saw it.

‘Blue…’

A pair of beautiful and clear blue eyes.

More tears poured out of her eyes, wetting her cheeks and smiling lips.

Accompanied by the sound of the bell announcing the New Year, Leyla cried while laughing, either due to happiness or sadness, or maybe both, she didn’t know. Their beautiful baby inherited his father’s pretty blue eyes.

‘Our son….he’s so pretty…’

‘Please come back.. Come back home to us.’ She pleaded desperately as she cried


Chapter 146




Summer Again







Winter soon passed, then spring came and went like a breeze…

Now the time for summer has arrived once more. The war had eventually come to an end with the Northern Union coming out as victorious, however, both sides suffered enormous casualties during the war. Whatever advantage both sides had gained from the war was nothing compared to the losses they had suffered in the end. The citizens could only comfort themselves by thinking that their friends and loved ones died fighting for what they believed was right.

A single golden tower was erected as the symbol of victory that would mark the end of such a historic war.

“What is the use of such honor in the face of sorrow?” A noble lady lamented as the procession of returning soldiers ensued. Many family members had come to greet their long separated relatives, finally reuniting with them once again. Still, messages of condolences and fond stories were exchanged here and there for the families who had forever lost their loved ones. Amidst the many questions that were asked at the moment, the most prominent was…

“Who would succeed the Herhardt Family?”

Any recent mention of the late Duke would often lead to the issue of his succession. The topic was both considered taboo and intriguing for everyone who had visited the Herhardt Matriarchs to give their condolences. Without a successor left behind after the Duke’s passing, his loyal followers had taken to vaguely answering any questions regarding succession, not willing to reveal any future plans. As much as they had wanted to proceed with choosing a fitting successor, the current figurehead of the family, Elysee von Herhardt, refused to choose until her son’s body was returned and buried in their home estate.

Until then, the seat of the Duke would remain vacant for the foreseeable future.

“They shouldn’t delay deciding for the successor of the Duke for far too long. If he had only married Lady Brandt the year before last then this tragedy wouldn’t have happened.”

“Marriage doesn’t guarantee that Lady Claudine will have a son though. Alas, they are still a very prestigious family in the end.”

“I guess that’s true.” Everyone either agreed or disagreed with various stories regarding the issue.

“Although I guess it’s also a relief for the Brandts, if their lady had gotten married in a hurry before the Duke participated in the war, he would have made their daughter a widow.”

“How’s Claudine doing?”

“I heard she’s going to have a new engagement soon”.”

“Oh, already?”

“There’s no reason for her to delay when the engagement with Herhardt Family has been nullified anyway. Count Brandt must have been very diligent to be able to find a pretty good marriage so quickly.”

“No matter how good the marriage candidate is, he couldn’t be better than the Herhardt Family’s heir. I felt so sorry for Claudine and Count Brandt when I heard the news about the annulled engagement.”

Multiple individuals exchanged their opinions with a feeling of compassion and relief. Suddenly, enthusiastic cheers began to resonate from the other side of the street.

Before long, their lost husbands, sons, and lovers were finally able to march their way back home.



The park currently felt desolate and empty since the people of the whole city had gone to greet the returning army. Thanks to this, Leyla was able to enjoy a leisurely walk more than usual. The sound of light footsteps walking slowly with the sound of the wheel rolling of the stroller, and the sound of the wind shaking fresh leaves harmonized like music in her ears. As she left the street lined with trees, she raised the shade of the stroller that casted a shadow over her sleeping child. The child, who was born smaller than normal, now grew up well and healthy, and the days where she was filled with worry had long passed. He was such a blessed child because he didn’t catch any illness even once and had a gentle personality.

Leyla continued walking and deliberately chose the way around the boulevard. The sound of footsteps continued along the quiet road. She was not confident, nor up to the task of seeing the returning army. Still in deep denial that Matthias wasn’t going to return to her side in the end, she became more unwilling to go greet the soldiers marching back home to Berg.

“The weather is so nice today, right?” She whispered to his sleeping son for no reason. Her breath gently moved the child’s soft hair. “Mom likes summer.”

She shared offhandedly, before looking down at her baby. “How about you? Well, I guess you still don’t know autumn yet.” She hummed thoughtfully, a rueful smile showing on her lips, before her smile began trembling due to sorrow.

Not even the child in her arms could stop the deep loneliness festering inside her.

She continued talking quietly to her child who was sleeping soundly, when suddenly, she finally realized that the residential area where their house was located was now in front of her after looking around. The house, which Matthias had decided for them to stay temporarily until he returned, had now become her and her child’s home. The Herhardt Family’s lawyer and butler tried to fulfill everything that the Duke promised to become a reality, allowing Leyla and their child to live a stable life.

The days she’d had since then had been peaceful.

Uneventful.

In the end, these boring days will continue in the future, because he was not here anymore.

He was never coming back.

Realizing the depression trying to flow inside her heart once more, Leyla hurriedly walked as if running away from the feeling she had long hated. In the end, it didn’t take a long time before the sadness disappeared once again like a bad dream, and she finally realized her shoelace had already been untied.

With a small sigh, she leaned down and began to tie the loosened string. As soon as she was about to tie a knot, unexpected memories came inside her mind like a raging flood.

A day she once spent together with Matthias in a strange city, where everything was so bizarre. His image kneeling in front of her as he tied her loose shoelace came to her mind as if it happened just now.

His quiet blue eyes…

The warmth of his long fingers….

The texture of the shoes she wore….

and the neat knot he tied that would shake along every step she took….

As the memory became clearer in her mind, her eyes became blurry with tears once more. She didn’t wipe the tears away, but let it fall freely from her eyes as he cried her sorrow out until nothing but numbness was left once more.

After catching her breath, Leyla hurriedly finished tying up her shoelaces and stood up. Breathing in deeply, she gripped the handle of the stroller and began to walk again, feeling lighter and more determined than a while ago.

Just as she arrived at the front of her house, the redness in her eyes now barely noticeable, she noticed a tall man donning a military uniform standing at the front of her door.

Her breath hitched, and heart stuttered.


The man slowly turned around, and although Leyla beamed at the sight of him, the excitement inside her died down a little upon the realization that it wasn’t the person who she was waiting for.

Still, she couldn’t help but to smile once again upon seeing him return home.

“Kyle!” She greeted warmly, before the sleeping child fussed and opened his eyes upon the commotion.



Kyle stayed inside the sunny living room together with Leyla’s child as she diligently prepared tea in the kitchen. The baby did not cry in front of him, but despite Leyla’s assurances that he was a gentle child, Kyle felt a little skeptical.

He would have believed her, if it wasn’t for the way the baby was looking at him. Almost like in a distasteful manner, the child seemed uncomfortable at the mere sight of him. It was a bit jarring to Kyle too, to see such a familiar face in a younger human being, but he still smiled and cooed at the child to the best of his abilities.

“What’s his name?” Kyle asked Leyla with a smile, who had just arrived with the tea as he bounced the baby on his lap.

“Felix.” Leyla answered with a sullen smile. Kyle handed the baby back to her, as she hugged the child and sat opposite of him.

The two exchanged some mundane conversations with each other, with a friend who they felt that they hadn’t met in a long time. Wars, in some way, had its way of making time stretch longer than they actually were after all. Kyle smiled at the fact that he was able to face Leyla now in a comfortable manner.

“It’s a great relief to see you home safely.” Leyla told him with a smile.

“You too.” Kyle, who quietly put down the teacup, also looked at her with a smile.

“I’m so glad that you have recovered your health and that you gave birth to a healthy child.”

“It means we kept our promise to each other.” Leyla beamed at him widely.

“I know.” Kyle’s voice dropped to a whisper as his eyes turned a little red due to the memory of last autumn that he remembered due to Leyla’s words.

Originally he received a vacation certificate and planned to visit her, but it was canceled due to a sudden change in the permit. Leyla, who had not fully recovered and just gave birth, was going to be alone with her child. Kyle wanted to stay with her but she assured him that she was going to be fine alone with a bright smile.

That day, he promised he would return as he said his goodbye. He left and was assigned to a military hospital on the border.

“Let’s meet again in good health.”

The moment he held her hand, Kyle finally burst into tears that he couldn’t hold back. She comforted him until he cried his tears dry. She told him he needed to hold his luggage tightly, to be brave. He knew her slender back was also shaking, but Kyle decided to pretend that he didn’t notice. That was how the two of them bid farewell to each other.

“Are the Duchesses of Herhardt aware about Felix’ existence?” Kyle, who was looking at the child laughing in his mother’s arms, asked worriedly. Leyla shook her head, determination in her eyes.

“Are you going to be fine? Raising the child on your own?”

“I’ll wait until he comes back.” She answered him resolutely.

He was a little taken aback by her answer, before nervously wiping his hands on his lap. “Leyla-“

“He promised. He made a promise to me.” She snapped almost immediately, cutting off anything he had to say. She then patted the child’s head, before laughing suddenly.

“He promised he’ll be back. So, I will wait.”

“Leyla…that person…” Kyle continued softly, before trailing off as he watched her eyes begin to be filled with tears.

“I know. I know, Kyle….” Her watery eyes glistened with tears, but Leyla did not lose her smile. “…But I

still want to wait. I thought he’d definitely come if I waited. I know it doesn’t make sense, but I will still wait.”

‘What should I do with this fool waiting for a man who has already died?’ Kyle stared at Leyla with an indescribable look.

He personally went to the place where Matthias was last seen. He braved the terrible battlefield himself when they realized the Duke hadn’t returned only to see the walls had all been turned to rubble and dust. It smelt like a day-old tomb as allies and enemies alike were strewn about just anywhere.

Almost everyone was wiped out.

Still, Kyle kept going because he was a medic, they needed to see if there were still survivors that they could save. Had he been anywhere other than the field hospital and was transporting critical patients during the raid, he would have become part of the casualties in the end.

There was a lot that he wanted to say to Leyla, to make her understand, but he chose to keep his silence instead. They changed the subject and talked about typical everyday stories once again, but Kyle and Leyla knew that it could never be the same as before. When they realized that, they felt more comfortable with each other. With the war over, recovery from the trauma they had garnered during the war was their greatest concern.

Leyla needed this time to recover most of all.

He clapped his hands, and gave her a smile. “Well, I need to get going. My train’s almost here.” Kyle informed them before he stood up and gathered his things.

“You’re going back to Carlsbar, right?”

“Yes. I’m going to stay with my parents until I return to school.”

“I see.”

“Take care, Leyla.” He said with great wishes and concern, before winking at the baby. “Felix, take care too.” Kyle smiled and greeted the two people who escorted him to the front door. This time, he reached out his hand first, just like what he did to a strange girl he met in the garden of Arvis, which was full of rose scent in the summer.

It was really time to say goodbye.

The day that changes one’s life may come accidentally, just as it did many years ago with him. But when that same reason appeared once again in front of him, he hoped he could greet her comfortably despite past sorrows. He could now finally accept the fact that despite his heart still longing deeply for Leyla, parting from her was what’s best for him to do. It was the best for both of them.

“Thanks, Kyle. Take care too.” Just like on that fateful day, Leyla held his hand with a smile. The child, who was looking at the two people shaking their hands with a curious face, also burst into a clear smile.

Without any remorse or grief, Kyle turned around and began to walk along the not-so-hot summer road as a cool wind blew past him.

He didn’t look back until he passed the corner of the street.



A luxurious black car stopped in front of the military hospital in southern Lovita. An old gentleman with a tired face came down when the driver in uniform hurriedly opened the door of the back seat.

“Thank you for coming.” The waiting officers bowed their heads at the old man. It was none other than the King who asked him, someone whose lineage was from the royal family of Lovita and a prestigious nobleman, to such a remote place. He said there was a serious issue to be confirmed and it was a royal order, so he had to follow it.

One of King Lovita’s beloved nephews was seriously injured during the war and was being treated at a military hospital in Berg. When the royal family of Lovita asked for prompt repatriation, the Kingdom of Berg demanded that conditions must be offered. It was an absurd task entrusted to him to inspect said ‘conditions’.

The reason was because he was the cousin of Catharina von Herhardt.


“I’ve already confirmed his identity through our most verifiable means, but I must ask for your final confirmation.” The officer who led him to the quiet ward politely explained.

“This is it.” Their footsteps stopped at the door of a certain hospital room at the end of the hallway.

When he nodded, the officers who came with him knocked briefly at the door.

As soon as the door opened, a young man, who was reclined in an upright seating position, was revealed. He was looking outside while smoking, white wisps of smoke billowed around the room. He slowly straightened himself up at the arrival of visitors. The daylight behind him made it difficult to identify him with the shadows in his face, but physically, he appeared healthy and in good condition.

These days, one can never be too careful since the war had turned many good men into insane people upon the slightest of sounds. Despite the patient not looking like a sick person anymore, his arrival to the hospital wasn’t easy. The officer who found him even had to drag his battered body to the hospital for treatment. The officer knew he was an enemy, a part of the Berg army that they’d just wiped out, but he was a medic first and foremost. He only saw a patient whose life he could still save.

And so, they cared for him and nursed him, even as he remained unconscious for a long time due to severe blood loss and injury. Whether by miracle or sheer force of will which made him survive such a massive attack on their camp, the man kept breathing. And now here he was, awake and physically able to move and was able to smoke too. His status alone allowed him the privilege of staying in the hospital rather than being sent to their concentration camps for POW.

The Herhardt Family said they were ready to hold a funeral as soon as the war ended and the Duke’s remains were recovered, but it seems they were fooled by a scammer. If not a scammer, which sane man would let himself be treated as a dead person and for what reason?

No matter how chaotic the war was, all military doctors who believed in a swindler’s words and participated in such acts should be governed by strict military law. As anger began to soar inside the old man’s chest, the young man threw his lit cigarette into an ashtray then began to walk slowly towards the group of officers. As soon as he thought that the young man’s straight posture and elegant steps were real, the old man suddenly stumbled and gasped for breath.

The young man, who glanced at him after a while, looked very calm.

The moment the old man bowed his head and greeted the young patient with a slight smile on his lips, the said young man burst into a ridiculous smile.

It was the only answer that he could give.


Chapter 147




The Color of My Happiness







Matthias watched as the trees swayed against the wind outside, his gaze contemplative as he sat in the car and observed how much the world had changed, yet not. Spring still came, and what had once been dry and brittle was now verdant with life. The border was the biggest surprise, however. Though he expected passage to be facilitated now, the car was allowed forward with barely a look and none of the previous, strict inspection procedures.

Berg lay ahead, untouched by the war, an alien planet to eyes that had seen too much destruction and loss. As if nothing had happened, life continued on there, undisturbed. By the time the long-distance trip ended in Ratz, his mind was already far away, rehashing recent events. Flashes of the collapsing wall that caught his fall as he lost consciousness were followed by his first, hazy moments as he woke up in a military hospital in Lovita. The terrible pain that greeted him allowed for an amazing realization. He was still alive.

“If I am alive, I will come back to Leyla”, was his first, fully-formed thought.

Painkillers were generously administered by the frazzled, but efficient nurses. Nonetheless, his greatest comfort was knowing what the future now held. Happiness flowed such, after so long with so little of it, that Matthias would smile and laugh through the pain, uncaring if that made him seem a bit mad. When he finally fell into a restless, medically induced sleep, he dreamed of Leyla. It’s such a beautiful dream.

The pain gradually eased, but Matthias remained in bed for quite a while, his recovery slow. By the time that he was able to move freely, the flowers that he stared at through the tiny window near his cot were in full bloom. Spring had arrived to grace the world with sun and colour again.

He knew war made simple things complicated, so it was likely that his news never arrived at Berg. Any new communication, as well, could just as easily fall prey to the conflict, lost forever. With no way to inform his survival, he chose to stand by and plan. For the next two seasons, Matthias didn’t exist in this world. What made the wait bearable was thinking of it as a time in which he was laying the foundation for getting Leyla close to him again, and the both of them to a place without a single shade.

Of course, it was still hard.


Leyla and her family were probably heartbroken by thinking he was dead, and that knowledge ate at him as he laid alone in bed late at night. But as with everything surrounding Leyla, Matthias couldn’t regret


his choices, not when he knew – hoped – they would allow him to make his way back to her. It’s still like that, now. It will forever be.

“We’ll be there soon, sir,” the driver informed him, voice calm, as they entered the boulevard in front of the museum. Matthias was overwhelmed. He kept his expression shuttered, but the redness on his eyes gave his emotion away. Uncharacteristically, he fidgeted with his clothes, straightening his posture as he rubbed creases away. His eyes caught the residential area by the end of the street and he knew it wouldn’t be long now.

But not yet.

He had a few things left to finish first. Nothing that would take a long time. The picture of grandiosity, Herhardt’s mansion in Ratz appeared as the car approached. The driver slowed down as they entered the path through the meticulously cared garden, and Matthias’ lips tilted into a pale smile.



Elysee von Herhardt couldn’t let go of the doubt until the end.

She knew it was unlikely to be a mistake, but she was too afraid to believe it. After having accepted her son’s death, she spent a long time waiting for his remains to arrive so she could hold the dignified, emotional service he deserved. But now, everything has changed.

“Matthias will come back alive!” She said out loud, as if the words would sink into her brain if she sounded them out. They did not.

Still, if the news turned out to be false, she wouldn’t be able to stand it. There was a reason why this matter was kept strictly confidential from the outside, as well, and Elysee wouldn’t discard this being some kind of mistake. She needed Matthias, in the flesh, to truly believe it. Check him over with her own two eyes. Only then.

“The car just arrived.” Hessen reported, hurriedly entering the drawing room.

The two duchesses looked at each other with a mixture of anxiety and nervousness, overwhelmed by the expectation of what came next. They heard the large, front doors open heavily, followed by the staccato sound of footsteps. Elysee stared at the door of the drawing room, holding her breath, eyes already filling with hot tears. And Norma was no different.

The women could swear they were able to recognize the steps, and they couldn’t belong to anyone else. They didn’t have to wait long for their miracle. The door opened slowly, revealing the unharmed, very much alive face of Matthias. He cautiously approached the women, who stood there, in shock, for a few moments. Elysee, however, soon broke down into tears, overcome with emotion.

The sun shone bright on the expensive carpet, invading the room through half-open curtains, illuminating this miraculous moment with a glow that seemed nothing short of divine. Without being


prompted to, Matthias strode towards his crying mother and enveloped her in a hug, soon followed by his teary-eyed grandmother.

“I’m back, mother, grandma. I’m back, now,” he said.



Leyla quickly finished preparing for the picnic by packing blankets and lunch boxes. She wore a straw hat with a wide brim and a ribbon tied snuggly under her chin. The leather bag she wore across her shoulder was full of a delicious, fresh assortment of fruits and pastries. Her braided hair hung behind her back, a simple, but neat hairstyle. Her little boy was cradled on one arm as she left the house, a healthy, pink-cheeked baby.

As if to make up for the time he was stuck inside his mother and had his growth limited by her body, the baby grew as fast as weed left unchecked. He looked bigger than other children his age, and she was already sure he would grow to be as tall as his father. As much as he was already getting too heavy to carry for long, Leyla couldn’t help but be gladdened by the thought. She wanted her boy to be strong.

It was a typical summer day in Berg, with very bright sunlight softened by the cool wind. Leyla walked toward the park, skilfully pushing a baby stroller. The child was excited and babbling, perhaps in a particularly active mood today.

“Was he like this when he was a baby?” She thought to herself.

Truthfully, Leyla couldn’t imagine Matthias von Herhardt, as a gentle and bright kid, like her son is, no matter how young he was. Perhaps, somehow, he had been an elegant baby at Felix’s age. She laughed at the silly thought, approaching the crowded park. Weekends were always busier around here, many people enjoyed the free time to go out and see the nature. Leyla smiled at her chubby little boy, and Felix smiled back adorably. That was enough.

Fixing the bag, Leyla turned the stroller to the direction of a quiet and pretty clearing, where she would have a little privacy to be with her son. On the road, by the front of the park’s centre fountain, she bought bright, colourful balloons from a stand. Felix’s blue eyes grew round when she tied the balloons to the stroller and she smiled at his reaction.

For Leyla, blue was no longer the colour of sadness. Now, it was the colour of happiness, the colour of her greatest love in this world. From the first moment her child opened his eyes and greeted the world, that was it for her. But no. She remembered a quiet morning, a face so very close to hers as she laid side-by-side with him, looking deeply into his eyes, the quiet hanging undisturbed. Maybe blue became a happy colour for her a long time ago, in a moment she couldn’t help but remember.

“Wow, the balloon is so pretty, don’t you think?” Leyla grinned as she looked upon her child, who was staring at the balloon, transfixes. Her soft, lilting voice caught his attention, and he smiled with excitement.


The balloon shook against the wind as they entered a quiet, peaceful stretch of woods in the park. The soft, nature sounds mixed with the laughter of mother and child, flowing together easily.



As much as had happened, Herhardt’s masterpiece miraculously returned to life was no different from before. Without hesitation, Matthias von Herhardt said something he should never say.

“Leyla is here.”

His tone was so calm that Elysee von Herhardt doubted her ears for a moment.

Earlier, Matthias spoke calmly of his injuries, treatment, and repatriation. He apologized for causing great concern and damage and failing to fulfil his proper responsibilities, though his tone would indicate that what happened was not remarkable in any way. Even after he had returned from the threshold of death, Matthias still managed to keep surprising her. On one hand, that was a relief.

“But what does he mean Leyla?” She thought, confused.

Unpredictable, as life was, his words were too. Elysee’s mother-in-law arrived then. The two women shared uncomfortable glances, minds confused with unlike thoughts, filled with uncertainty. Matthias glanced at them and continued to speak in a low-pitched voice.

“I have a child, too.” He proclaimed.

If their minds were confused before, they lost all reasoning now. They were shocked, their faces full of disbelief, looking at the brooding man as simultaneously they let out a gasp.

“I-Oh my God… Matthias?” Elysee, voice laced with surprise, hardly supported her wimpy body on the sofa’s armrest. She sat upright, head raised. Her gut feeling was right, she guessed right. She knew he was too invested. Even if she had guessed the relationship between the two ages ago, Elysee comprehended that the existence of the child was an unexpected truth.

Matthias, eyes holding decisiveness, looked at the old lady that barely blinked at the words he had uttered without consideration just like he had done again. “Don’t worry, we’ll go about it the proper way. I will marry her.” Another declaration from him. Another surprise for the women who glanced at him with astonishment.

“Matthias! Do you even know the weight of your words?!” Elysee wailed her son’s name, as if mourning what he could have been. “Tell me! Huh?”

Nothing. Matthias didn’t consider answering. Human nature is rebellious, once you get its taste, you crave it more until it leads to chaos. With a deep sigh, Norma ultimately leaned her back against the chair, body tired and mind blanked.


“The illegitimate child… Alright. I know it’s not a light thing. But Matthias… there are many other ways to deal with this kind of problem.” Elysee assured.

“Elysee is right, Matthias. If you think so because of the breakdown of the mixture with Brandt, feel free to go back to other great infants and children..….”

The old lady, who was continuing her words with her head in her hands, frowned as she trailed off. She tried to give it a thought but felt contrary to her own opinions. No matter how much she pondered, she understood what was peculiar.

Matthias, the man who could have reached out to Lovita’s relatives as much as he wanted, why let go of their hands and stayed in the hospital of his enemy’s country?

What else did Matthias gain in reciprocation for watching the news of the Duke of Herhardt’s death spread to Berg? Perhaps thinking the same way, Elysee von, Herhardt turned to her with an awestruck face.

“I know it’s hard for you two to accept.” Even in the face of suspicion and reprimand from the two old ladies, Matthias remained silent. Just like when they were finding out about his relationship with Leyla, the woman for whom he was ready to give up everything. Perhaps, he knew the significance of silence and the answers it gave. He understood human nature, loud and rebellious, contrary to tranquility or maybe he was just waiting for the right time to utter words.

“But the world is changing. I think a lot of things will change, perhaps quicker than they have in the past.”

“Matthias…”

“Actually, it doesn’t matter even if it doesn’t change.”

In Matthias’ attitude, it was difficult to find any willingness to persuade his opponent. As if to say that it is nothing more than a notification of the decision he had already made. His steady gaze, carrying determination, looked at Elysee. He waited for a few seconds, parting his lips as he talked.

“If it’s so hard to accept, I won’t stain the Herhardt name with my stubbornness. Perhaps that will ease your worries a little.”

“What does that mean?” Elysee von Herhardt, who was barely able to speak, asked sharply. Her hold on the armrest tightened, perhaps she knew what was coming next, or maybe she just wanted to hear the words from her son.

“I won’t live as a von Herhardt.”

“Matthias!” she snapped.

“I will leave the name of the Duke of Matthias von Herhard as it is now as it belongs to an honorable nobleman who has oxidized for the empire… I’m not that man anymore.” he continued undeterred.

Oh my god.

The joy of seeing his son, who returned with nothing different, disappeared without a trace. It’s none of your business how the world is changing, but the fact that the war completely changed her son seemed certain. He seemed foreign like she was not seeing her son but a menacing man. And the fact that Matthias is not threatening to hit.

Her son, who decided to become a perfect successor and lived a life perfectly, seemed to have decided to become something else now. Something she never thought of, even imagined it. So she knew that he would definitely make it out of it at all costs, it reflected through his eyes.

The son, who they thought was dead, came back alive. Happiness that came like a divine feeling had vanished into the quietness. And now, there were two options. Either you lose the son or accept his decision.

“This is my decision. It won’t change.” Matthias looked at the two with a determined look that cemented the sincerity of his words.

Herhardt’s two duchesses, glanced at each other, confused as to whom would initiate the step toward the child who had professed his choice.

“Now, you two decide.” With a face that still had no agitation, Matthias politely declared. “I’ll follow that choice.”


Chapter 148







The Bird Is Back

(END)






The park in downtown Ratz was large enough to contain lakes and forests, giving a peaceful scene for the city’s residents and visitors. A place that could become someone’s healing and personal one, away from the world’s gaze.

The western part of the park, with the most beautifully blended lake and forest, was Leylas’s favourite. The vista from there resembled Arvis at first glance. It sparked a flood of memories, one might say full of pain, but it remained the most beautiful and missed place on earth despite all the pain and suffering it had given her.

That place was still a part of her…

A piece that she would never forget…

Leyla unfolded a blanket, spreading it, under the shade of the tree, and took out the packed baby’s lunch box. The first picnic she went on with Felix, it was just the two of them, yet it was brimmed with care and tenderness.

She didn’t mind that this moment might not be in his memories, as he was still young, but she was assured that he would always carry the fond memories of his childhood with him, and this moment would be one he treasured for the rest of his life.

Leyla had a lot of things she wanted to give her child, the things that include happy moments with his mom, kind words, gentle touches, and a smile. The things she had wanted from her mother but never received them. She wanted to let her child know that there is someone in the world who will love him no matter what, someone who would be there for him against all odds.

Just like Uncle Bill did for her.

She would do everything for her baby.

Leyla would take on two jobs till he returned, eat well, laugh a lot, and cheer up. She would never make him a child who was half-loved without a father.

Never.

Leyla opened Felix’s lunch box before digging into her own. She watched him, happy and content, as he played cheerfully after his meal. His being focused helped her as she could eat peacefully without a need to rush.

The child crawled over to her when she took a mouthful of fresh peach, she had bought for dessert, sweet and delicious. He tilted his head, grazing at his mother through big blue eyes, every time she bit into and chewed on the peach.

Leyla looked at him, blue eyes staring back, in a daze. She saw the face of the familiar man staring back, the memory of the man superimposed on the child’s face grew uncontrollably large and clear.

All she could see was him… the same blue eyes that once looked at her with hope.

“I’ll be back. For sure.”

He made a promise, the promise, she was waiting to be fulfilled.

“I love you.”

A confession to which she had not answered. She didn’t know why but as she stared at the blue eyes, her lips parted, as she uttered the same words the man had once.

“I love you…”

Leyla lifted her glasses and discarded them on the blanket, before turning to the child and whispered.

“I love you so much.”

The moment she confessed, she felt unfamiliar like something had changed. Perhaps, because she could utter those with sincerity, and meant every word.

The child giggled, maybe he loved hearing his mom’s confession. A smile formed on her lips, eyes brimmed with tears, as she cradled her son in her arms warmly and protectively.

The baby’s sweet smell touched the tip of her nose as the child provided her mother happiness with his blissful giggles. And Leyla hugged him tighter even, feeling content with her son in her arms.



Two feet stopped at the entrance of an apartment, the man stared at the door. He lifted his hand, bringing it closer to the door, to knock.

“Hey, are you…” Just passing by the neighbor’s house, the woman gave the man with an oddly suspicious gaze. He stopped, disturbed by a voice, as he turned his head in her direction. “Did you come


to see the baby’s mother who lives in this house?” Her question, voiced with a look of relief, was tinged with wary interest. The man, with cautious, turned his attention to her.

“Yes.” He answered short.

“The blonde little baby mother in the glasses. Is that right?” Another question, she asked.

“Yes.”

“Oh, you must be a baby daddy who went to war! Right?” She, who was looking at the man’s face carefully, shouted with delight.

He must be the baby daddy. Oh my…

The woman thought, her brows raised, without waiting for a response, she scrutinised him and immediately began to fuss. “What should I do? Her husband came back from the battlefield and she went out.”

“Is her house empty?” he asked, voice deep and serious, glancing at the door.

“She went out with her baby earlier. I heard they’ll go on a picnic in the park.” She clapped her tongue with regret. Even at that moment, her gaze wandered over the man’s face, who lifted his brows, gazing back at the woman.

‘So Leyla was true when she said that her son looks nothing like her. But, his face looked familiar. Where the hell did I see that guy before?’ She thought. “Well, the baby’s mom often goes to the park. It usually comes back around sunset. Why don’t you wait at my house until then because we’ll be in trouble if the roads cross?”

“No, thank you.” The man declined the offer, looking in the direction of the park for a while, he came down the stairs and stopped in front of her. “Thank you, ma’am.” The man nodded and passed past her without so much as a backward glance. A black car was waiting at the curb, and as he got closer, an occupant hurriedly opened the back door

He was clearly no average Joe. She spent a long time staring after the car as it drove away, unable to escape her unsatisfied curiosity.

“It’s definitely my first time seeing him.” The afternoon breeze carrying her murmur ran up the quiet weekend afternoon road.



The child, who had a good day of eating and playing, drifted off to sleep with an angelic face beside his mother. Leyla watched her son, lying face to face as he dozed off. She lifted her hand and caressed his head.


The child’s hair was in mess and she could clearly see, the fingerprints stamped on the glasses, through her blurred vision. Leyla cautiously approached the end of the blanket. She began fixing her glasses and wiping them off, then loosened her messy hair.

It seemed that the child had the same fondness for her hair as his dad had. It wasn’t simply his appearance that resembled that of his father; he seemed to have adopted many of his father’s quirks. Of course, his kid is more aggressive in his approach.

He probably found something intriguing about her dazzling blonde hair, so when Leyla held him in her arms, he grabbed her hair and pulled it. He was happy and smiling cutely but she felt sorry for loose strands of hair that had-been-tugged-without-mercy in his chubby hands. There was a time when she hated if someone would, by mistake, pull her hair. She never thought a time would come, she would be happy with her hair pulled out.

With a smile on her face, Leyla began to gently untangle her messy hair using her fingers as a comb. It was useless to tie or braid, so she thought she would rather cut it short, but he didn’t like it. The fine blonde hair flowed down her shoulders and back, gracing her beauty, wrapped in the collar of a white dress.

For a second, Leyla stopped paying attention to the braid in her hair and instead stared blankly at the late afternoon sun filtering down through the verdant leaves. The calm water of the lake was also colored brilliant gold as the soft waves played with light.

“Pretty.”

A modicum of awe flowed out of her lips at how the world looked; serene and lovely, like something out of a painting, as if those hellish days when shells rained down from the sky and shots rang out, were nothing more than fleeting dreams.

Leyla sat in silence with her curled knees to her chest, her eyes drifting over the lake and the birds gliding lazily over it. Wild rose bushes wafted their pleasant scent on the breeze as it blew across the park. The rustling of the thick leaves in the wind seemed eerily reminiscent of a bicycle chain.

It was a perfectly beautiful summer day, yet for some reason…

It felt so weird…

Unfamiliar.

Memories of the blue-eyed man stuffed her heart.

‘How could he do this to me?’

‘He’s not here. He’s not coming back.’

Her eyes narrowed, staring at nature when the child’s cry roused her. She looked at Felix, who had just woken up, was looking into the air and crying. She soon realized why her child was so upset : The


balloon, which had been tied to the stroller’s handle, flew away in the wind and hung between the branches of the tree. The rope seemed to have come loose.

“It’s okay, Felix!” Leyla soothed the child in a powerful voice, caressing his chubby cheeks. “Don’t cry! Everything’s okay!”

Perhaps surprised by his mother’s courage, the toddler stopped weeping. After wiping her son’s tear-streaked face, Leyla sprang to her feet and ran over to the tree where the balloon was hooked.

“Wait a minute! I’ll get it for you!”

True to her word, she’d do anything for her child’s happiness.



Finding Leyla was easy. He felt strange as he couldn’t believe he had found her in this big park, with one vague clue that she was somewhere.

But he did.

He found her, sitting on a blanket under the shade of a tree, as she watched the scenery of the forest and the lake calmly. A place where it was difficult to be crowded because it was too remote. Even she played up her bravery, he knew his beautiful bird was actually quite timid.

Matthias then recognized the existence of another person, his child. While he was still watching his son, Leyla began to go somewhere with a strong step.

Left alone, the child tilted his head and looked at his mother’s back. Matthias took another step towards him. By the time he reached the side of the blanket, Leyla had already made it to a tree standing a short distance from it.

Just when he was beginning to wonder she was going to do, Leyla started climbing the tree. Matthias noticed a balloon dangling from a low-hanging limb, and finally realized what she was trying to do.

He picked a low, low laugh, and the child sitting quietly in the blanket raised his head. Matthias followed the child’s gaze and turned to look at him. The child arched his brow and gently blinking his eyes.

Matthias looked at his son, before turning his attention to Leyla, who was seated on a branch and preparing to catch the balloon.

And he began to take an unhesitating step toward her.



Though it was difficult for Leyla to reach the balloon, she was able to just barely grasp the string through the tree’s thin, looming branches. She smiled to herself at the accomplishment as she descended, landing on the ground safely.

“Felix! Look at this! Mom…”

Leyla, who had turned her head at the sudden noise, was frozen. She could not form coherent thoughts, let alone speak the moment her gaze met blue eyes.

A man stood not too far from the tree.

He was looking at her as he stood alert, with his back straight, and an arm behind his back. Their eyes met and he tilted his head, almost as if in invitation.The rather crooked and playful gesture, was in stark contrast to his elegant appearance.

Leyla gasped. She had suspected, but now she was sure.

It was him.

He has returned.

Her heart thundered in her ribcage, fighting to jump into his arms. Her head, though, remained blissfully blank as she stared at him. It was ridiculous how her mind was in denial , and yet her heart had reacted to his presence.

It was him, in the flesh – there was no doubt.

It couldn’t be anyone but him.

He was here.

Leyla stared at him, still clutching a balloon. She had placed a hand on the tree for support, and it continued to tremble like a leaf as she stood in a trance. The beady blue eyes crinkled near the corners as they continued to gaze at Leyla, indicating a smile.

Wordlessly, he slightly raised the hand that had been behind his back. There were ribbons tied in the sleeves of the jacket and shirt, and they fluttered in the soft evening wind.

It was very scenic, but still…strange…

She had dreamt of this moment every single day without fail, conjuring up fantasies of the second their eyes would meet again. She had had enough time to play out each scenario over and over: how she would welcome him, wrap him up in her affection till it got hard to breathe for both of them.

She had it all planned out, so why ?

Why were her feet frozen?

Why was her mind empty now, when she had thought of nothing else for so long?

Perhaps, there was no answer, not that she wanted, or he needed one.


Leyla bit her lips, trying to control the tears that brimmed in her eyes, and just used all her strength to stare at him. Matthias’s signature grin graced his face as he slowly opened his arms, unsure if that was the right move.

She couldn’t comprehend whatever happened next, and even her memories of the next few minutes were blurry, the details dim.

All she remembered was her feet treading on the ground, tears streaking down her cheeks, and running towards him. Her vision may have been a blur, but her heart could see and feel with perfect clarity.

Her golden hair was flowing as she ran towards him,faster, and faster, like he would disappear if she even paused to breathe.

Her heart continued to thump, erratic and unstoppable. She might as well have been choking on the words she had prepared for him, yet they refused to make their way to her lips.

The moment she finally landed in his arms, a soft cry escaped her, not unlike the sound of a child that finally finds its beloved object after searching for so, so long.

All her speeches and declamations went down the drain. Just one word was enough. Her one truth:

Matthias.

“Leyla,” he murmured, tightening his arms around her, pulling her closer as if they could melt into one. A balloon, that she had missed, rose high with the wind. Its string mimicking the ribbon tied on Matthias’s wrist.

The child looked at the pretty balloon floating around, with eyes that resembled his father’s. He watched the balloon float away, pouting and grimacing as if his tears had the power to bring it back. His mother certainly did.

The balloon flew higher into the sunset sky and eventually disappeared from view. The child’s eyes, sparkling with curiosity, turned to his mother and father who were still wrapped in embrace, even as his mother continued to weep.

The child kept turning his head from side to side, seemingly in pain, as if he couldn’t decide whether or not to cry like his mom. Eventually he burst a broad smile.

The lake was calm and clear as the birds slowly circled above the still water, the sky above them was a vibrant palette of reds, oranges,

The bird is back.

It was a long and pleasant summer evening with little to do, and they for sure would make the most of it.
